_	Greer expressed the view that 'stronger measures were necessary' and published a letter from the Prime Minister, who said he was 'determined to take whatever action is shown to be necessary'.
_	In the late nineteenth and early twentieth century, the view that politicians ought not to intervene against hunger was increasingly challenged by campaigning journalists, with some academics and politicians also calling for or organizing intervention against world hunger, such as U.S. President Woodrow Wilson.
_	In legal drafting it is usually used to indicate that the person expressing the view that precedes the phrase may not adhere to the hypothesis following it.
_	The Karramiyya also held the view that the world was eternal and that God's power was limited.
_	Similarly, he was not against progress in the sense of objectively justifiable social improvement, but did oppose purely fashionable progressivism, and in particular what he called "chronological snobbery", the view that the superiority of modern values can always be assumed automatically and without investigation.
_	Commenting on Crawford's editorship of "Antiquity", Hawkes expressed the view that his "skill in steering between over-simplification and over-specialization has enabled the Magazine to succeed admirably in its role as go-between for experts and public".
_	Terrorism experts regard the view that Abu Nidal himself was such agent as "far-fetched".
_	Benneter had piqued much political ire by expressing the view that the German Communist Party could be a potential coalition partner for the SPD, a statement that put the status of the youth organization into jeopardy.
_	He states that no reputable scholar supports the view that Toscanelli's letter refers to a Chinese ambassador.
_	It contains a critique of the view that markets, left to their own devices, will provide socially optimal solutions.
_	In this book, Conquest supported the view that the famine was a planned act of genocide.
_	In the pages of "The Thunderbolts", Dr. Henry Pym has expressed the view that the Man-Thing is sentient, though difficult to communicate with.
_	Another expressed the view that "[t]he decision in this case can be viewed as merely the application of the "Saamco" principles to complex factual circumstances.
_	As the referendum approached, many "Yes" campaigners began to predict defeat, and some even expressed relief after the French rejection of the treaty, taking the view that this would prevent the Netherlands from being the first or only country to obstruct the course of ratification, even though they also expressed dismay that the French result had given the "No" campaign greater legitimacy and acceptance, and had suggested to the public that the Netherlands' standing in Europe would not be significantly damaged by a "No" vote, with some going as far as saying that the Netherlands would look like a fool in front of the rest of Europe.
_	Representationalism (also known as indirect realism) is the view that representations are the main way we access external reality.
_	One of the most notable aspects of Justice Black's jurisprudence was the view that the entirety of the federal Bill of Rights was applicable to the states.
_	Shaw took the view that God is a process of continual self-overcoming: "if I could conceive a god as deliberately creating something less than himself, I should class him as a cad.
_	Chomsky's claim is based upon the view that what children hear—their linguistic input—is insufficient to explain how they come to learn language.
_	Loy goes on to argue that the view that suffering such as that undergone by Holocaust victims could be attributed in part to the karmic ripenings of those victims is "fundamentalism, which blames the victims and rationalizes their horrific fate," and that this is "something no longer to be tolerated quietly.
_	Both Post and Beilhart rejected the doctrine of the religion but they embraced the view that illness was an illusion and could be overcome by mental suggestion, prayer, and self-sacrifice.
_	Chiricosta said that other scholars relied on "this 'matriarchal' aspect of the myth to differentiate Vietnamese society from the pervasive spread of Chinese Confucian patriarchy" and that "resistance to China's colonization of Vietnam ... [combined with] the view that Vietnam was originally a matriarchy ... [led to viewing] women's struggles for liberation from (Chinese) patriarchy as a metaphor for the entire nation's struggle for Vietnamese independence."
_	Some scholars take the view that "they may not have been Isamailis at all at the outset, and their conduct and customs gave plausibility to the belief that they were not merely heretics but bitter enemies of Islam."
_	Kaye v Robertson [1991] FSR 62 is a case in English law, expressing the view that there is no common-law right to privacy in English law.
_	Founding editor of the "International Journal of Children's Rights", Michael Freeman, also argues that the ultimate causes of child abuse lie in prejudice against children, especially the view that human rights do not apply equally to adults and children.
_	In 1834 Rupp published a treatise on "Gregory the Bishop of Nyssa – life and opinions" in which he represented the view that the worship of God is independent of a concept of God.
_	When the United Nations adopted the Universal Declaration of Human Rights (UDHR) in 1948, Saudi Arabia refused to sign it as they were of the view that sharia law had already set out the rights of men and women.
_	Thus the Hon'ble Court was of the view that if contempt petition was proceeded with, then any decision could prejudice the accused or the prosecution at the hearing of the appeals.
_	The result caused debate concerning the relative merits of Manna and Solario, with some correspondents expressing the view that Solario had been beaten in the Derby only through a lack of fitness.
_	Historians long ago abandoned the view that Eisenhower's was a failed presidency.
_	However, "there was no support for the view that the MBTI measures truly dichotomous preferences or qualitatively distinct types, instead, the instrument measures four relatively independent dimensions."
_	This reflected the view that as a general matter there was usually a tradeoff between quality and quantity.
_	The Vedic thinkers held the view that the universe is merely an idea, a "kalpanā" ('phantasm') or projection of the mind of the creator; even the experience of birth and death by the Jiva is a "kalpanā" ('hallucination') created by ignorance.
_	Although there was strong opposition to the West London Tram scheme, most subjects expressed the view that congestion on the Uxbridge Road corridor was a major problem and thought that improvements to the existing bus services would be desirable.
_	Christian universalism is a school of Christian theology focused around the doctrine of universal reconciliation – the view that all human beings will ultimately be "saved" and restored to a right relationship with God.
_	Most researchers in the field long held the view that formula_7 for any positive real formula_8 since by using the additivity property of logarithms formula_9.
_	This is the view that there are never any real moral conflicts and that there is always a third alternative.
_	Taylor rejects the view that Bryan was a "pioneer of the welfare state" and a "forerunner of the New Deal," but argues that Bryan was more accepting of an interventionist federal government than his Democratic predecessors had been.
_	The most notable critics of the view that genes play a direct role in human behaviour have been biologists Richard Lewontin Steven Rose and Stephen Jay Gould.
_	Several historians and commentators hold the view that Bush was one of the most consequential presidents in American history.
_	One follower of the group has expressed the view that, "We have to make sure that as a nation our blood is pure.
_	He went on to support the view that the cause of death was two bullets hitting Bhutto in the abdomen and the head.
_	It took the view that "[i]f a public right was involved, the applicant must show that he had suffered special damage as a result of the public act being challenged and that he had a genuine private interest to protect or further".
_	On 11 November 1563, the Council of Trent condemned the view that "the marriage state is to be placed above the state of virginity, or of celibacy, and that it is not better and more blessed to remain in virginity, or in celibacy, than to be united in matrimony".
_	Other modern historians favor the view that the terem was a relatively recent innovation, some even going so far as to call it “short-lived” and hardly predating the Time of Troubles.
_	In "Heller" the majority rejected the view that the term "to bear arms" implies only the military use of arms:
_	Lord Denning MR preferred the view that the documents were to be considered as a whole, and the important factor was finding the decisive document; on the other hand, Lawton and Bridge LJJ preferred traditional offer-acceptance analysis, and considered that the last counter-offer prior to the beginning of performance voided all preceding offers.
_	After the race, Charlie Hills expressed the view that Ghanaati had run well in what was described as a "vintage" running of the Group One event.
_	On June 21, 2018, a leaked memo showed that the ACLU has explicitly endorsed the view that free speech can harm marginalized groups by undermining their civil rights.
_	Cook takes the view that evidence independent of Islamic tradition "precludes any doubts as to whether Muhammad was a real person" and clearly shows that he became the central figure of a new religion in the decades following his death.
_	Montgomery Watt supports the view that he was executed for concealing the treasure.
_	Ephesus, the Council of Chalcedon reaffirmed the view that Jesus Christ was a single person, but at the same time declared that this one person existed "in two complete natures", one human and one divine.
_	Having served as Kennedy's personal press secretary, McAndrew's role in this story was widely questioned; some broadcasters and journalists aired the view that she had turned on her former employer, and dubbed her "the blonde assassin".
_	Gyekye challenges the view that in African thought, community confers personhood on the individual and thus the individual's identity is merely derivative of the community.
_	During the 19th century, as social norms started to change, the idea that it was desirable for dignified men to respond with violence when they were insulted or ridiculed started to lose traction and was replaced with the view that while those responses may not be ideal, that they were a normal human reaction resulting from a loss of self-control, and, as such, they deserved to be considered as a mitigating circumstance.
_	Taking the view that airplane like operations do not translate to airplane-like appearance, many TSTOs have first stages that operate as VTOL or VTOHL aircraft.
_	The authors take the view that the three digits represent the second, third and fourth, whereas other researchers see them as the first, second and third.
_	The Lion Rock Institute subscribes to the view that "policies from a free market perspective", such as defending property rights, lessening government interferences on the market, and advocating low taxes rates and minimal restrictions on businesses, "will contribute to a freer and more prosperous future for Hong Kong".
_	Note that the ending can be added at the end of a noun phrase even when the phrase does not end with its head noun, as in "the king of England's"; this property inclines many linguists towards the view that the ending is a clitic rather than a case ending (see below, and further at English possessive).
_	He wrote that the Court rejected the view that the citizen suit provision of the statute conferred upon “all persons an abstract, self-contained, non-instrumental ‘right’ to have the Executive observe the procedures required by law."
_	Thatcher said: 'In his retirement Harold Macmillan occupied a unique place in the nation's affections', while Labour leader Neil Kinnock struck a more critical note: 'Death and distance cannot lend sufficient enchantment to alter the view that the period over which he presided in the 1950s, while certainly and thankfully a period of rising affluence and confidence, was also a time of opportunities missed, of changes avoided.
_	It took the view that an employment contract requires that regard be had to the economic reality of the relationship, looking at factors such as whether uses one's own tools or takes on business risk.
_	Writer James Hayward has made an extensive study of this curious story; in "The Bodies on the Beach", Hayward makes a compelling case for the view that the burning seas work was driven substantially by the needs of propaganda and was a sophisticated bluff that became Britain's first major propaganda success of the war.
_	McCulloch, in 1833, advanced the view that "nothing contributes more to facilitate commerce than the safe, speedy and cheap conveyance of letters."
_	This report received much criticism, beginning with the view that it was a hasty reaction to these allegations.
_	On the other hand, historians such as Ulmanis biographer Edgars Dunsdorfs are of the view that someone who disbanded Parliament and adopted authoritarian rule cannot be regarded as a positive figure, even if that rule was in some terms a prosperous one.
_	Once there, he quickly formed the view that an unprepared and ill-armed Romania facing a war on two fronts would be a liability, not an asset, to the Allies.
_	Pharmacists were twice as likely as medical GPs to endorse the view that "if a patient has decided to end their own life then doctors should be allowed in law to assist".
_	In 2014, journalist and terrorism expert Peter R. Neumann maintained, citing Syrian records captured by the U.S. military in the Iraqi border town of Sinjar and leaked State Department cables, that "in the years that preceded the uprising, Assad and his intelligence services took the view that jihad could be nurtured and manipulated to serve the Syrian government's aims".
_	Hamel takes the view that it was the Hebrew author who reacted to and adapted this mythological material to communicate his own, quite different message.
_	The Football League also took the view that a spread of talent was necessary to sustain the interest of spectators.
_	Introvigne expressed the view that these incidents were "more a product of juvenile deviance and marginalization than Satanism."
_	In the case of Harold Brown, the Lyman couple, and the Ezell-Vandersluis couple, the movie tells the story of how they began as traditional farmers working as part of the system that uses animals for food or other human purposes, but then came to the view that such practices are cruel and unethical.
_	In 1923 Archibald Meston stated that the Nerang tribe was called the 'Talgiburri', and Germaine Greer cites the authority of Margaret Sharpe for the view that the root of "Talgiburri", namely "talgi-" represents "dalgay" (dry), taking therefore this reconstituted "Dalgaybara" to mean 'people of the dry sclerophyll forest, rather than salt-water people.
_	He formed the view that at the third attempt to land, the crew adopted a low flight path hoping to keep the airstrip in sight below the cloud layer, but were deceived by the difficulty in assessing height over a glassy sea and put the left wing tip into the water turning onto the runway approach.
_	Scott has frequently argued that CFS and related conditions should be recognized as legitimate illnesses, and rejects the view that they are "learned behaviour designed to help the patient avoid facing life".
_	He took the view that research was yet to be done to determine whether "scoria found in non-archaeological contexts" could "carry incisions that might be confused with stone tools"
_	Since some votive offerings have been associated with the remains of the Mycenaean construction, R. Catling expressed the view that they were votive offerings to the hero or heroine of the Bronze Age.
_	Pliny starts with the known universe, roundly criticising attempts at cosmology as madness, including the view that there are countless other worlds than the Earth.
_	Defending this conception further against the view that "person" designates a certain kind of organism, DP argues that at one time the only kind of airplane was a wooden, propeller-driven one, and the only kind of computer was a vacuum tube model.
_	In July 2011 the Queensland State Government released a statewide infrastructure review which re-stated the view that a new and larger jet runway airport will be necessary to support regional development in the Toowoomba, Darling Downs and Surat Basin regions.
_	In 2001, General Musharraf issued the executive decree and, in which, President Tarar was of the view that such decree was unconstitutional and illegal.
_	In hindsight, he was of the view that the conversation revealed what was finally to break the siege: the terrorists expressed remorse that, unknown to them, they had made their move on the auspicious day marking the investiture of Crown Prince Vajiralongkorn, King Bhumibol Adulyadej's son.
_	Hodges rejected the view of repentance as a "change of mind", holding instead the view that it is a God-fearing decision to turn from sin: "Repentance is the decision to turn from sin to avoid, or bring to an end, God's temporal judgment" ("Harmony with God", p. 57).
_	Some pilgrims expressed the view that this "new" Saint's statue should not stand in such proximity to that of the Blessed Mother.
_	In 1998, Helmut Rix put forward the view that Etruscan is related to other members of what he called the "Tyrsenian language family".
_	M. Renard advanced the view that Janus and not Juppiter was the original paredra or consort of Juno, on the grounds of their many common features, functions and appearance in myth or rites as is shown by their cross coupled epithets
_	In "Manifesto of a Passionate Moderate", Haack is highly critical of the view that there is a specifically female perspective on logic and scientific truth and is critical of feminist epistemology.
_	Psychophysical parallelism, or simply parallelism, is the view that mind and body, while having distinct ontological statuses, do not causally influence one another.
_	This legislation is based on the view that a woman could change her mind about an abortion once she witnesses the development of the unborn child through the latest technology.
_	In 1946 there appears have been conflicting suggestions of why the town was called "Estcourt" - one body of opinion favouring the view that the town was named after Captain Estcourt, a member of the party who established the military outpost in 1847 and the other favouring the view that the town was named after Thomas Estcourt MP in 1863.
_	The American historian Gordon A. Craig expressed the view that Hillgruber's choice of the word "Ende" for the Holocaust suggested that the Holocaust was "something that just sort of happened".
_	Viswa Sadasivan has expressed the view that the scheme serves a function and purpose in the current socio-political climate, though it should not be viewed as a permanent solution for Singapore.
_	Some scholars argue that the view that Pakistan recognized Jordan's annexation is dubious.
_	Contrary to this position, he could not unobjectionally be termed a "right winger"; for example, he expressed the view that "Palestinians" were legitimate Israelis, because they were, arguably, merely Jews and Hebrews of Muslim religion or faith.
_	Presley rejects the view that transgender women are not women, or that they should not take part in the feminist dialogue and says that transgender people should be judged on their merits, like other people.
_	There is the view that this process can yield phenomenological anecdotes that can trigger an understanding that is beyond or more effective than what we could grasp intellectually because of the creative insights and understanding of a phenomenon.
_	Taylor was a proponent of environmental determinism with the view that "physical environment determines culture."
_	Such theories share the view that there is an identifiable original intent or original meaning, contemporaneous with the ratification of a constitution or statute, which should govern its subsequent interpretation.
_	Modern scholarship takes the view that Aesop probably did not compose all of the fables attributed to him; indeed, a few are known to have first been used before Aesop lived, while the first record we have of many others is from well over a millennium after his time.
_	Warner Bros. listed his birthdate, throughout his career, but Clifford McCarty maintained that the studio publicity department had altered it from January 23, 1900 "...to foster the view that a man born on Christmas Day couldn't really be as villainous as he appeared to be on screen".
_	Positivism was the view that only the methods of the natural sciences could provide knowledge of human nature and society (Kaelber, 2004).
_	The research by Hirschi and others, cited above in the section on the home environment, is also consistent with the view that lack of attachment to school is associated with increased risk of antisocial conduct.
_	In particular, the presence in V4 of orientation-selective cells led to the view that V4 is involved in processing both color and form associated with color.
_	One school is sometimes called "exclusive legal positivism", and it is associated with the view that the legal validity of a norm can never depend on its moral correctness.
_	A second school is labeled "inclusive legal positivism", and it is associated with the view that moral considerations "may" determine the legal validity of a norm, but that it is not necessary that this is the case.
_	From Larkin's perspective, the significance of Salvador in Pampangan was not his relationship with the revolutionary past, and he takes the view that Salvador "had little concern either for the politics of independence or for the politicians who hovered around the issue.
_	This group of Christians believes in "Christian exclusivism—the view that biblical Christianity is true, and that other religious systems are false."
_	Hitchens stopped the procedure after 11 seconds and subsequently endorsed the view that it was "torture."
_	By the end of his life, Volkogonov had "firmly committed himself to the view that Russia's only hope in 1917 lay in the liberal and social democratic coalition that emerged in the February Revolution."
_	In 2006, Duncan maintained the view that Australia had an obligation to appropriately manage its own, domestically produced nuclear waste.
_	Moreover, according to Maimonides, the quavering blast ("Teru'ah") is actually twice the length of a sustained blast ("Teki'ah"), while Rabbi Joseph Karo holds the view that the quavering blast is identical in length to that of a sustained blast.
_	Assouline also expressed the view that the ancestral figure of Sir Francis Haddock reflected Hergé's attempt to incorporate one of his own family secrets, that he had an aristocratic ancestor, into the story.
_	Most Christians believe that only parts dealing with the moral law (as opposed to ceremonial law) are still applicable, others believe that none apply, dual-covenant theologians believe that the Old Covenant remains valid only for Jews, and a minority have the view that all parts still apply to believers in Jesus and in the New Covenant.
_	He attended the inaugural meeting of the new group, in Brussels on 24 June, where he expressed the view that he was uncomfortable with some members of the group having possible links with extremist groups.
_	The scholarly consensus favors the view that the masque was designed by Inigo Jones, though no firm historical evidence necessitates this conclusion, and data on the masque's design elements are not extant.
_	In the 1751 "Encyclopédie", Jean le Rond d'Alembert echoes the view that Grandi's reasoning based on division had been refuted by Varignon in 1715.
_	Following Parker's description, the view that these birds represented a good species (as opposed to aberrant individuals or hybrids) gained some ground; the 'species' was listed in the Shorebirds volume of the Helm Identification Guides, for example, although with a note indicating that the possibility of hybrid origin could not be ruled out.
_	In the first half of the 20th century, a number of socialists in the United States began to hold the view that the Soviet government was transforming into a species of Red fascism.
_	Other people involved in the movie's production who have expressed the view that Deckard is human include:
_	The two most common interpretations of "Late Spring" are: a) the view that the film represents one of a series of Ozu works that depict part of a universal and inevitable "life cycle", and is thus either duplicated or complemented by other Ozu works in the series; b) the view that the film, while similar in theme and even plot to other Ozu works, calls for a distinct critical approach, and that the work is in fact critical of marriage, or at least the particular marriage depicted in it.
_	One such position is organicism: the view that living beings exist, but there are no other objects with parts, and all other objects that we believe to be composite—chairs, planets, etc.—therefore do not exist.
_	If the Commissioner of Police is of the view that it is "necessary or expedient in the interests of public security or order, for the maintenance of supplies or services essential to the life of the community, that special precautions should be taken to prevent the entry of unauthorised persons", he may declare a place or premises within a security area to be a protected place.
_	The law takes the view that good faith must not only be done, but must be manifestly seen to be done, and zealously patrols the conduct of directors in this regard; and will not allow directors to escape liability by asserting that his decision was in fact well founded.
_	The party takes the view that economic freedom is fundamentally linked to cultural and political freedom, but it should not be allowed to conflict with development.
_	However, in 2010 he repudiated that stance, taking the view that New Zealand should move towards a republic once the Queen's reign ends.
_	This was grounded in the view that Austria had never been a nation in the true sense.
_	An asp is absent from the painting, but many Romans held the view that she received poison in another manner than a venomous snakebite.
_	This position does not contradict the view that some things do exist, but points out that different 'languages' will have different rules about assigning this property.
_	German law took the view that companies should only be recognised as having legal rights under the law where their "real" seat was.
_	In linking together the two topics of economic development and cultural change, the founders and staff of the Center took the view that cooperative, interdisciplinary research would be required to address the relevant issues.
_	The obstacle to ethnoconvergence is ethnocentrism, which is the view that one's culture is of greater importance than another's.
_	Departing from the view that he, who by the Economic Observer referred to as the Father of Transformation Telkom, establishing STT Telkom.
_	This story explains the theory of forms with their different levels of reality, and advances the view that philosopher-kings are wisest while most humans are ignorant.
_	Davy had already sympathised with the view that heat was associated with molecular motion rather than with Joseph Black's caloric theory of heat but he rejected Herapath's paper with some coolness, uncomfortable with the implication that there was an absolute zero of temperature at which all motion ceased.
_	Geoffrey Robertson, QC, suggests that when Greene left the BBC in 1969, contrary to the view that it was because of disagreements over the appointment of the Conservative Lord Hill as BBC chairman in 1967, whereby she could be given some credit for his departure, it was more to do with a political struggle between the BBC and Wilson.
_	Particularly in early incarnations, transformational syntax adopted the view that phrase structure grammar must be enriched by a transformational grammar, with syntactic rules or syntactic operations that alter the base structures created by phrase structure rules.
_	Identity can be the view that people hold about themselves.
_	Traditionally, and certainly prior to the end of Apartheid, the NG Church held the view that homosexuality is a mental health issue or a sinful state of being.
_	The police tend to the view that Alexis's death was suicide and that he had cut his own throat.
_	The tribunal found von Leeb and his co-defendants not guilty on the charge of devastation, taking the view that "a great deal of latitude must be accorded" to a commander in a tactical situation such as the one that von Leeb found himself in.
_	However others like Abdul Aziz Dehlavi hold the view that Ali should be considered an Imam of his own time when he was appointed as the fourth Rashidun Caliph.
_	Though some modern musicologists, such as David Brown, dispute the view that Tchaikovsky wrote the "Pathétique" as his own requiem, many others, notably Milton Cross, David Ewen and Michael Paul Smith accord it credence.
_	Given the strong show of government support for Ong, commentators expressed the view that Ong's victory meant a victory for the PAP and the continuation of its values and style of governance.
_	However, recent analysis has shown that the accent has much older and local roots, the investigation uncovered findings in conflict to the view that the accent has strong origins outside of the local area, as summarised:
_	He has expressed the view that the Vincenzo Armanno described by Passeri should rather be identified with the Dutch painter Herman van Swanevelt.
_	In an interview to the German business lawyer journal "JUVE", Siegfried Bross, former judge at the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany, expressed the view that EPO's organization giving its president excessive powers is "principally incompatible with the European Convention on Human Rights (ECHR)" and that EPO's president, Benoît Battistelli, acted in 2015 against an EPO staff member "without legal legitimacy".
_	The rationale underpinning the law was the view that prostitution was a form of violence against women so the crime consists in the customer paying for sex, not in the prostitute selling sexual services.
_	While many take the view that a ‘good’ photograph (technically) has deep blacks and bright whites, ‘it ain’t necessarily so’.
_	Press reaction reflected the view that abandoning basic system reform had broken a promise..
_	The only exception to this among Jewish communities is in the Beta Israel (Ethiopian Jews); a 1999 genetic study came to the conclusion that "the distinctiveness of the Y-chromosome haplotype distribution of Beta Israel Jews from conventional Jewish populations and their relatively greater similarity in haplotype profile to non-Jewish Ethiopians are consistent with the view that the Beta Israel people descended from ancient inhabitants of Ethiopia who converted to Judaism."
_	Sammelan serves to support the view that all religions can coexist in harmony.
_	This statement expresses the view that God is the one who enjoys the ultimate rasa, or spiritual rapture and emotions.
_	In "The Literal Interpretation of Genesis", Augustine took the view that everything in the universe was created simultaneously by God, and not in seven calendar days as a literal interpretation of Genesis would require.
_	The author of Judas expresses the view that this sort of substitutionary justice pleases the lower gods and angels.
_	Kennedy voted against the Conservative–Liberal Democrat coalition in May 2010 explaining in an article for "The Observer" that he "did not subscribe to the view that remaining in opposition ourselves, while extending responsible 'Confidence and supply' requirements to a minority Conservative administration, was tantamount to a 'do nothing' response".
_	In the field of psychology, nativism is the view that certain skills or abilities are "native" or hard-wired into the brain at birth.
_	Twin Earth is a thought experiment by philosopher Hilary Putnam, first in his paper "Meaning and Reference" (1973), and then in his paper "The Meaning of 'Meaning (1975), to illustrate his argument for semantic externalism, or the view that the meanings of words are ultimately not purely psychological.
_	Hershey was famous for protesting the muscular dystrophy telethons of Jerry Lewis, which enticed the view that people with muscular dystrophy were not worth living.
_	In 1868, she wrote a letter to "The Revolution" (a women's rights paper edited by Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Parker Pillsbury), supporting the view that abortion was an institution supported, dominated and furthered by men.
_	Ruth Henig writes, "most historians of the Paris peace conference now take the view that, in economic terms, the treaty was not unduly harsh on Germany and that, while obligations and damages were inevitably much stressed in the debates at Paris to satisfy electors reading the daily newspapers, the intention was quietly to give Germany substantial help towards paying her bills, and to meet many of the German objections by amendments to the way the reparations schedule was in practice carried out".
_	He was of the view that, now the focus was on water supply, sanitation, physical infrastructure rather than knowledge connectivity.
_	Horse behavior is best understood from the view that horses are prey animals with a well-developed fight-or-flight response, but can act like predators to defend their territory or herd, as when chasing or biting weaker horses, ponies, mules, small animals or people in their way.
_	For his part, Jay Hinman from "Perfect Sound Forever", was of the view that:
_	These authors claim that the "result assumption" (see above) is inconsistent with the view that there is no measurement problem in the predictable outcome (i.e. single-outcome) case.
_	Skeptical theism is the view that we should remain skeptical of claims that our perceptions about God's purposes can reasonably be considered good evidence of what they are .
_	But other historians like Elliot, Cousens, Majumdar and Vaidya have held the view that there was coercive conversion during his reign and destruction of temples was a reflection of the more basic, religiously motivated intolerance.
_	Mimran also expressed the view that considering the enormous sales volume of the brand in Canada, to not attempt an entry into the U.S. market and beyond would be a matter of "shortchanging ourselves."
_	However, the heterogeneity of members within the Negativicutes, as well as the distribution of molecular signatures, supports the view that the Negativicutes are in fact an independent class within the Firmicutes, with Clostridia as their closest phylogenetic neighbours.
_	In "Chng Suan Tze v. Minister for Home Affairs" (1988), the Court of Appeal took the view that an objective test applied to the exercise of discretion conferred by the ("ISA") on the President and the Minister for Home Affairs concerning the detention without trial of persons thought to be a risk to national security.
_	The ACJC supports international law, opposes all forms or racism (including anti-Semitism and Islamophobia), and desires to counter the view that any criticism of Israel's government and military policies is automatically racist.
_	The Principles adopted at the ACJC conference support the view that:
_	Wohl described the book as "creative and provocative", but suggested that it strengthened the view that Posner was no longer a realistic candidate for justice of the Supreme Court.
_	The southern and southeastern parts of the batholith consist mainly of medium-grained, homogeneous, grey granodiorites dated at 3121 +/- 5 Ma...The data, combined with that from other parts of the Kaapvaal craton, further supports the view that the evolution of the craton was long-lived and episodic, and that it grew by accretionary processes, becoming generally younger to the north and west of the ca.
_	However, the view that the majority of the effects of cAMP are controlled by PKA is an outdated one.
_	In chapter 1 Seneca counters the complaint that life is too short with the view that life is long enough if well-managed.
_	A 2016 paper challenges the view that cultural differences are necessarily an obstacle to long-run economic performance of migrants.
_	Prime Minister Gaston Browne stated that there had been damage to 95% of the structures on the small island and that he was "of the view that the island is barely habitable".
_	Professor T. J. Oleson of the University of Manitoba stated "There are strong arguments for the view that the three lands seen by Bjarni were Newfoundland, Labrador, and Baffin Island."
_	Anglo-Israelism held the view that Jews were descendants of ancient Israelites who had never been lost.
_	In 1857 he published his famous "Essai de pétrologie comparée", in which he expressed the view that the igneous rocks have been derived from two magmas which coexist beneath the solid crust, and are respectively acid and basic.
_	Atherton held strongly to the view that Penn State should be an engineering and industrial institution, rather than a classical one, and that classics should not be a “leading object” in a college curriculum.
_	Collins argues further that there is no evidence in the Community Rule or the Damascus Document to support the view that the Qumran community was concerned with the legitimacy of a non-Zadokite High Priest.
_	There have been attempts to provide empirical support for the view that Jewish food laws have an overarching health benefit or purpose, one of the earliest being from Maimonides in his "Guide for the Perplexed".
_	Additionally, in a reaction to the view that "Tom Thumb" was a burlesque, Fielding replaced some of the humour in favour of biting satire.
_	The first being the view that a woman’s role and purpose was reproduction; their importance was valued by their maternal care.
_	A molecular phylogenetic study in 2000 based on nuclear ribosomal ITS sequences confirmed the view that the "New World" (American) and "Old World" (African and Eurasian) species of "Lotus" did not belong in the same genus.
_	The members of this faction took the view that the elected Regional Representatives Council, which replaced the unelected members of the People's Consultative Assembly, would not be effective as it was too small.
_	In two essays titled "Femi Fani-Kayode: Who Killed Sir Tafawa Balewa?" and "The Death of Tafawa Balewa: the Segun Osoba angle", he opposed the view that Balewa had died of natural causes which had been suggested by Chief M.T. Mbu, Nigeria's former Foreign Minister and Chief Segun Osoba, a former state governor, and he proffered the view that the Prime Minister had actually been murdered.
_	Israel took the view that, by virtue of its declaration of independence in 1948, a new international personality was created and that it started with a clean slate and was bound only by such of the former international obligations affecting the territory as Israel might accept.
_	Its organ "Jonub" () was printed in Tehran and usually criticized Bakhtiaris, and held the view that Iranian government does not understand the importance of the Persian Gulf region.
_	In a 2008 media release, DrinkWise cites research that supports the view that there is a strong positive correlation between the way parents drink and how their children grow up to drink.
_	The critic Peter Wright, writing in 1999, challenged the "decline" theory with the view that the later compositions are "harder to come to terms with ... because of the more challenging nature of their musical language", a theme he developed in a detailed study of the Fifth String Quartet.
_	This philosophy was in keeping with the view that the Fundamental Laws predated the Magna Carta in both custom and natural law.
_	village Panchayats in other parts of the State taking the view that nothing in Sixth Schedule precludes such a course of action.
_	As the lower court argued, the circumstances and values of the day no longer supported the view that Christianity can guide what constitutes valid criminal law.
_	However, Alexander Hamilton, in "Federalist No. 78", expressed the view that the Courts hold only the power of words, and not the power of compulsion upon those other two branches of government, upon which the Supreme Court is itself dependent.
_	During the House of Lords appeal Lord Scarman said that "I do not subscribe to the view that the common-law offence of blasphemous libel serves no useful purpose in modern law.
_	In 1926, a British Home Office committee strongly favoured the view that this form of cancer was caused by the prolonged action of mineral oils on the skin of the scrotum, and of these oils, shale oil was deemed to be the most carcinogenic.
_	(The fourth refused to state his address, at which point the committee expressed the view that the right against self-incrimination did not apply to that question.)
_	In April 2016, Richard Kuper, spokesperson for the group Jews for Justice for Palestinians, expressed the view that while "there is some antisemitism in and around the Labour party – as there is in the wider society in Britain" and "there is clearly also a coordinated, willed and malign campaign to exaggerate the nature and extent of antisemitism as a stick to beat the Labour party."
_	Her description is of the 'mast' type of hobby horse, and Spooner followed Robert Morton Nance in expressing the view that 'the May day games and Morris Dances, with their own type of hobby-horse, which includes a rider, had been brought in from England too recently to have acquired Cornish names.
_	The idea of devolution is based on the presumption of orthogenesis, the view that evolution has a purposeful direction towards increasing complexity.
_	He has criticised the view that there is a scientific consensus on the attribution of recent climate change, and described the climate projections conducted by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) as inadequate and misleading.
_	In March 1987, Bush announced the resignation of advisor Fred Khedouri as well as implementation of Charles Greenleaf in the same role, and visited a drug rehabilitation center during a two-day swing through Florida, expressing the view that education was the sole means of ending drug issues throughout the US.
_	Members of orders active in overseas missionary expansion expressed the view that the rural parishes often needed Christianizing as much as the heathens of Asia and the Americas.
_	He held strong views on the inappropriateness of examinations to evaluate student progress and was unimpressed by the view that scientific advances were in patients' best interests.
_	In this context, Ahmadi teachings, specifically regarding the death of Jesus and his status within Islam, concurred, in principle, with the views of key Salafi (or proto-Salafi) figures such as Muhammad Abduh and Rashid Rida, both of whom rejected the bodily ascension of Jesus and accepted the view that he escaped crucifixion, died a natural death and will not be coming again.
_	Georgiev argued in one article that Phrygian originally belonged to the same IE branch as Greek and Ancient Macedonian (which did not include Thracian or Dacian), but later adopted the view that Phrygian constituted a separate branch of Indo-European, (also unrelated to Thracian or Dacian).
_	It took the view that since there was no evidence that any chief constable had ever appointed an acting sergeant as a custody officer, the issue was academic or hypothetical.
_	P. J. Marshall reinterpreted the view that the prosperity of the Mughal era gave way to poverty and anarchy, arguing that the British takeover was not a sharp break with the past.
_	I took the view that having fought [Europeans in the Second World War<nowiki>]</nowiki> that we should now work with them, and co-operate, and that was my first thought about it.
_	It is not uncommon for a Samoyad to sell his wife to another for the consideration of a few teams of deer, and he sometimes barters her for a lady whose husband may be willing to accept the view that exchange is no robbery."
_	Advising James Watt junior, then abroad, Vaughan took the view that he was safe from prosecution.
_	But Moynihan also expressed the view that liberal democracy, too, faced an uncertain future.
_	There are no strong grounds to accept either manuscript as reliable, but it is reasonable to believe that the royal house of Gwynedd promoted the view that the Kingdom of Powys had passed to Rhodri the Great through his mother in order to legitimise their control over it.
_	Socialists that embraced reformism, exemplified by Eduard Bernstein, took the view that both socialism and a socialist state will gradually evolve out of political reforms won in the by organized socialist political parties and unions:
_	Townsend was arraigned on 20 August, but strongly questioned the view that his writings were subversive as well as the legal foundations of the charges.
_	Dole & Nyswander's skeptical approach to the view that addicts of (certain) drugs were morally unfit, criminals in our midst helped to return the treatment of chemical dependency to doctors, from whom it had been usurped by the anti-narcotics constabulary.
_	Later in life, on multiple occasions, Chandrasekhar expressed the view that Eddington's behavior was in part racially motivated.
_	Given the lack of evidence of its effectiveness, as well as concerns about the impact of altered feedback on developing speech and language systems, some authors have expressed the view that the use of an AAF with children would be unethical.
_	But the view that the two remedies existed side by side is also held.
_	He approved the view that offences involving community and/or race relations warrant general deterrence.
_	Complementing his view on Euclidean Arithmetic Mayberry takes the view that, just as an alternative Geometries were created by denying Euclid’s axiom of parallels, an alternative Arithmetic is created by denying Common Notion 5 and affirming the existence of at least one arithmos for which the whole can be put in 1-1 correspondence with a part.
_	The Council of Constance (1414–1417) took the view that the rival popes, Gregory XII and Benedict XIII were guilty of perjury because they had broken the terms of their electoral capitulations.
_	He was also the first proponent of Baconian theory, the view that Francis Bacon was the true author of Shakespeare's works.
_	A striking example is the lack of evidence, outside the Muslim literature, for the view that the Arabs were Muslim at the time of the Conquest.<br>
_	The Chinese Government has consistently taken the view that the whole of Hong Kong should be Chinese territory, due to them being acquired through the inequality of historical treaties.
_	Clark H. Pinnock uses this verse to say that the view that God raising up Church leaders to protect and interpret the Bible is "good and scriptural".
_	Some commentators took the view that BBC presenters on the day had concentrated too much on interviews with celebrities and that they were insufficiently prepared to add depth to the TV commentary.
_	Collins was further accused of holding the view that a teaching, to be considered church doctrine, must be approved through the "sensus fidelium" – the "sense of the faithful" – as well as by bishops and theologians.
_	Among the church's beliefs are the view that life begins at conception, that homosexuality is a sin and an abomination which God punishes with the death penalty, and opposition to worldliness, formalism, modernism, liberalism, and modalism.
_	Meritocracy, according to Katherine S. Newman is “the view that those who are worthy are rewarded and those who fail to reap rewards must also lack self-worth.”
_	Others take the view that it is a heavily revised compilation of material left by him.
_	Cicero expressed the view that "the virtues which we ought to cultivate, always tend to our own happiness, and that the best means of promoting them consists in living with men in that perfect union and charity which are cemented by mutual benefits."
_	Evans also reiterated the view that Nazism was secular, scientific and anti-religious in outlook in the last volume of his trilogy on Nazi Germany, writing that "Hitler's hostility to Christianity reached new heights, or depths, during the war", citing the 1953 English translation of "Hitler's Table Talk 1941–1944."
_	Furthermore, the view that recombination is a repair process implies that the benefit of repair can occur at each replication cycle, and that this benefit can be realized whether or not the two genomes differ genetically.
_	On the view that recombination in HIV is a repair process, the generation of recombinational variation would be a consequence, but not the cause of, the evolution of template switching.
_	Some Albanian Muslims also hold the view that unlike them, Christian Albanian communities of the Orthodox historically identified with the Greeks.
_	Justice Chua also relied on Lord Diplock's judgment in "Hinds v. The Queen" (1975), in which his Lordship expressed the view that even fundamental provisions of a constitution on the Westminster model can be amended as long as the proper procedure provided by the constitution has been complied with:
_	Howell D. Chickering Junior expressed the view that there "probably is no epic or mythic narrative" behind this introductory section, instead arguing that it should be seen as "a dramatic verbal performance".
_	CA acknowledges a set of subskills which underpin abstract thinking and shares with constructivism the view that concepts cannot be learned in the same way as facts and descriptions.
_	There is also the view that there are two kinds of Being, corporeal and spiritual.
_	Churches in the BPCIS take the view that their “belief in the infallibility/inerrancy of the Bible in its original autograph is an essential doctrine which is non-negotiable” but “the choice of Bible version is a non-essential.
_	Some scholars disagree with the view that Albanian nationalism emerged in 1878 or argue that the paradigm of setting a specific start date is wrong, but those events are widely considered a pivotal moment that led to the politicization of the Albanian national movement and the emergence of myths being generated that became part of the mythology of Albanian nationalism that is expressed in contemporary times within Albanian collective culture and memory.
_	After 1958 when the pressure from Moscow decreased, Sofia turned back to the view that the separate Macedonian language did not exist and that the Macedonians in Blagoevgrad province (Pirin Macedonia) were actually Bulgarians.
_	Being made and broadcast in the country where creation-evolution controversy is strongest, the last episode "What About God?" focused on religion, and "through personal stories of students and teachers, it offers the view that they are compatible".
_	Kuomintang ideology promoted the view that the souls of Party martyrs who died fighting for the Kuomintang, the revolution, and the party founder Dr. Sun Yat-sen were sent to heaven.
_	In 1874, at the Camborne Methodist conference, he delivered the fifth Fernley lecture, on "The Doctrine of a Future Life as contained in the Old Testament Scriptures", opposing the view that the teaching is not to be found in the Old Testament.
_	Others have shared the view that it was the escalation of property value and a desire to "cash out" profitably which made liquidation of the Wisconsin Phalanx inevitable.
_	Fischer rejects the view that Champlain was just another European mercenary looking to seize lands and enslave native populations like many other early British and Spanish explorers in North America.
_	In 1802 he wrote "An Enquiry into the Nature and Effects of the Paper Credit of Great Britain", in which he set out to correct common misconceptions, such as the view that the increase in paper credit was the principal cause of the economic ills of the day.
_	He held the view that the British Empire was ""the principal factor in the development of humanity...
_	McKinley was of the view that equality of opportunity for American trade in China was key to success there, rather than colonial acquisitions; that Hay shared these views was one reason for his appointment as Secretary of State.
_	The need to raise the standards of hygiene and husbandry in the Birecik aviaries was reiterated, and the prevalence of skin problems in a number of zoos reinforced the view that no zoo birds should be used for any free-flying trials.
_	TechCrunch espoused the view that TechJect's pitch "always seemed a bit far-fetched", and cited it as "the latest example of how consumers need to be more careful with crowdfunding".
_	Specifically, monothelitism is the view that Jesus Christ has two natures but only one will.
_	There is a lack of adequate clinical evidence to support the view that HBOT therapy is efficacious for any of the indications for which it is being used".
_	The prefaces and notes to both these expressed the view that Holy Scripture is the only rule of doctrine, and that justification is by faith alone.
_	According to McDaniel (2004), if Lewis is right, the defender of overlapping individuals has to accept genuine contradictions or defend the view that every object has all its properties essentially.
_	On appeal, the Ninth Circuit took the view that the enhanced provisions were merely sentencing factors that did not need to be set forth in the indictment or submitted to the jury.
_	The transformative nature of computer based analytical processes such as text mining, web mining and data mining has led many to form the view that such uses would be protected under fair use.
_	As well as offering insights into tax havens, it took the view that the diversity of countries that become tax havens was so great that detailed definitions were inappropriate.
_	She favours greater participation of women in day to day matters of faith, and is of the view that women should be able to pray outside their homes, and they should be able to lead their own prayers.
_	Hall expressed the view that the poem "provides a key to interpreting the cultural significance of "ælfe" in medieval texts".
_	In it, he criticises the view that knowledge of what we perceive can be independent of the conceptual processes which result in perception.
_	In it he defended the view that the Bible is God's verbally inspired word.
_	His study, which included a model "improving" the St Louis equation, supported the view that monetary policy is strongly correlated with spending but also found that fiscal policy is correlated as well.
_	This term is based upon the view that the fundamental causes of crime is oppression, resulting from social and economic forces operating within a given society.
_	However, the local people hold the view that Shopian was earlier named as "Shin-Van" meaning "snow forest".
_	His later works were met with criticism and were generally dismissed in the 1970s by the view that his theories were too abstract, inaccessible, and socially conservative.
_	George Lakoff, a professor of cognitive linguistics and philosophy, advances the view that metaphors are the usual basis of meaning, not the logic of verbal symbol manipulation.
_	Some scholars hold the view that the bas-reliefs of Vizhinjam with their slender forms and rhythmic lines, show Pallava affinities.
_	The structural-functional approach is based on the view that a political system is made up of several key components, including interest groups, political parties and branches of government.
_	Singer Sheryl Crow, who was later to act as a mentor on the show, however took the view that the show "undermines art in every way and promotes commercialism".
_	Hastings, taking the view that the incident was too long in the past to be relevant, did not call any rebutting evidence.
_	Employing the same person as devil's advocate can cause the view that it is an "empty ritual."
_	Some have expressed the view that the encyclopedia has been blocked because the Uzbek government is concerned about the appearance of articles critical of its actions.
_	Abanes asserts that sovereign citizens fail to sufficiently examine the context of the case laws they cite, and ignore adverse evidence, such as Federalist No. 15, where Alexander Hamilton expressed the view that the Constitution placed everyone personally under federal authority.
_	It is considered a particular sort of "putschism"—that is, the view that political revolution should take the form of a "putsch" or "coup d'état".
_	It has been mentioned that the likes of Muhammad Baqir Majlisi (author of Bihar al-Anwar), Muhammad ibn Ya'qub al-Kulayni (author of Kitab al-Kafi), Ni'matullah Al Jazaa'iri (author of Anwar Al Nu'maniyyah, d. 1701) and Al Ayyaashi (author of Tafsir Ayyashi) among others were of the view that the present Qur'an is not the same as was revealed to Muhammad ibn Abdullah and omission/corruption has taken place.
_	In its final report to the tribunal's Prosecutor, Carla Del Ponte, the committee took the view that the attack had been proportionate:
_	Walker rejected the view that the accident had been staged, calling it implausible.
_	Webster once wrote that: "...at the heart of almost everything I have written over the last twenty years or so is the view that, in our modern, proudly rationalist attempts to break the links which tie us to our superstitious, essentially religious past, we have become profoundly muddled about our own cultural history."
_	It holds the view that religions “balefully affect the cultural evolution of humanity to this day”.
_	Reform Judaism, also known as Liberal or Progressive Judaism, embraces several basic tenets, including a belief in a theistic, personal God; continuous revelation, with the view that scripture was written by divinely-inspired humans.
_	This source claims multiple authorities of antiquity, not merely Papias; this is taken as evidence against the view that the testimony of the Fathers is based solely upon the witness of Papias.
_	He expressed the view that the ancient place name should be associated with the Mycenaean place name Kutato (from chetitiki word kutta = wall).
_	In March 2011, it was reported by "The Independent" that Policy chief Sir Keith Joseph said in public the view that Margaret Thatcher's first year in Downing Street had been "wasted".
_	Titcomb was a proponent of the Christ Myth theory, according to a review of her book she held the view that Jesus Christ was a personification of a solar deity.
_	Widely seen as a "safe pair of hands" and a solid, loyal member of the Cabinet, Hurd's tenure as Home Secretary was largely uncontroversial, although he was notably of the view that Her Majesty's Prison Service did not work effectively and argued for more rehabilitation of offenders and alternative sentencing.
_	Historian Savina J. Teubal takes the view that the name of Iscah was probably included in the text of Genesis because Iscah represented an important genealogy:
_	The case contributed to the view that Crime had become rampant in Washington D.C and shaped the views of Washingtonians.
_	Charles Wentworth Upham shared the view that the afflicted in Salem were imitating the Goodwin children, but he put the blame on both Cotton and his father Increase Mather:
_	There was no certainty that the Conservatives would contest the seat, and an editorial in the Liberal-inclined Carmarthen newspaper, the "Welshman", expressed the view that unless the former member, Lord Emlyn, could be induced to come forward, the party's prospects were poor.
_	Supporters of the Iraq war tend to agree with the view that Iraq regained its sovereignty in June 2004, and that the occupation has thus ended.
_	Staff, students, parents and former school governors held the view that the school's underperformance was due to long term neglect by Westminster council.
_	Sessions has expressed the view that the children of immigrants from Muslim-majority countries are "susceptible to the toxic radicalization of terrorist organizations" on the basis of the Orlando and San Bernardino Attacks.
_	J-FLAG expressed its suspicion that the killing was a "hate-related crime", articulating the view that Williamson had been killed because he was a publicly visible gay man.
_	At present, Syrians hold the view that this land is historically Syrian and was illegally ceded in the late 1930s to Turkey by France – the mandatory occupying power of Syria (between 1920 and 1946).
_	Martin-Jenkins also described Australia as the "nonpareils of world sledging" and expressed the view that Michael Clarke would be less appropriate as a future captain than Mike Hussey based on Clarke's decision to stand his ground after being caught at first slip.
_	Positions range from the view that ADHD is within the normal range of behavior to the hypothesis that ADHD is a genetic condition.
_	In 1995–2002 the emergence of the same problem in the USA led to the view that the Church had attempted to cover up abuse and misconduct, and was not limited to sexual abuse (see Catholic sex abuse cases in the United States).
_	As a result, works that advance the view that a particular personality was mentally healthy, are naturally underrepresented in the overall corpus of pathographic literature.
_	The British historian Richard J. Evans in his 1989 book "In Hitler's Shadow" expressed the view that Nolte's reputation as a scholar was in ruins as a result of these and other controversial statements on his part.
_	Britain was of the view that the infrastructure of the newly born ZSI, and such institutes of the other countries in the subcontinent, will not be able to care, preserve and maintain the hundreds of thousands of zoological specimens preserved in Spirit/Alcohol, or Formalin.
_	Greenfield's own MLAs began to grumble about the policy—Archibald Matheson expressed in 1923 the view that "This government has acted as philosopher, guide, and God to the people long enough."
_	While Giacomo Conterno wines represent the strictly traditional Barolo winemaking philosophy, Aldo Conterno too shares the view that the "modernist" approach of using small "barriques" in combination with shorter maceration times undermines the character of Barolo and add a vanillin sweetness to the wine that overrides the inherent fruit of the nebbiolo.
_	In a written note this morning, Mobius said "We remain of the view that the long-term outlook for Thailand is good."
_	Among authors sympathetic to the view that Jesus never existed, Doherty's work has received mixed reactions.
_	According to the scholars of the time, an oath of divorce counted as a full divorce and they were also of the view that three oaths of divorce taken under one occasion counted as three separate divorces.
_	Moreover, Ibn Taymiyyah was of the view that a single oath of divorce uttered but not intended, also does not count as an actual divorce.
_	Some held the view that, once a family had achieved seize-quartiers, descendants in the male line would continue to be entitled to the benefits even if they continually married non-armigerous women.
_	Its members expressed the view that having American military bases in Iraq and Afghanistan offers strategic advantages in a potential conflict with Iran.
_	Some, such as prime minister Lord Pitt, took the view that the State should use its growing power to intervene against hunger.
_	The WTO states, "our conclusion that the PROEX III programme, as such, is not inconsistent [with the ruling] is based on the view that it is legally possible for Brazil to operate the PROEX III programme in such a way that it will: (a) not result in a benefit being conferred on producers of regional aircraft and, hence, not constitute a subsidy... 6.3
_	Many nationalist movements in the world are dedicated to national liberation, in the view that their nations are being persecuted by other nations and thus need to exercise self-determination by liberating themselves from the accused persecutors.
_	According to Joe Duffy the Regulator is not interested in this television show and is of the view that it is quite legitimate.
_	Many attribute the view that the Maronites are unrelated to the Mardaites due to early historic bias, when the West favored the Druze until the pogroms of Syria in the 19th century which resulted in the death of 50,000 Maronites and other Christians at the hands of the Druze as a reprisal for Maronite peasantry and Maronite church attempts to topple their feudal lords in the South of Mount Lebanon.
_	It is a form of education that takes seriously the view that children are bearers of human rights, that children are citizens in their own right, that schools and educational institutions are learning communities where children learn (or fail to learn) the values and practices of human rights and citizenship, and that educating children about their own basic human rights is a legal obligation of the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child.
_	English nationalism is also often associated with Euroscepticism: one reason for opposition to the EU is the view that England is being arbitrarily subdivided into regions at the behest of the European Union.
_	Banerji has argued against the view that education and economic development are the solution to India’s female gendercide.
_	He also challenges the view that Israel was a prime motivator in the invasion of Iraq, saying "...it was clear that Iraq was no threat to Israel.
_	Other commentators have challenged the view that Hamilton’s work can be narrowly categorised as right wing, drawing attention to examples of his output that demonstrate strong independent views.
_	Aymard is of the view that Nemesianus seems to have no practical experience of hunting and so must have taken all his purported knowledge on the subject from literary sources, despite his claim to literary originality.
_	Now white society can always point to Kennedy and say that a negro advanced the view that 'nigger' is acceptable."
_	But the view that "Individuality can only flourish where equality of access to the conditions of existence is the social reality.
_	Eichelbaum claimed that "the experts and I independently reached the view that the children's evidence in the conviction cases was reliable".
_	Conversely, various Marxist observers – including Western historians Hill and John Rees – argued against the view that Lenin's government was a dictatorship, viewing it instead as an imperfect way of preserving elements of democracy without some of the processes found in liberal democratic states.
_	South African law, however, long appeared to favour the view that only material facts within one's actual or personal knowledge were included in the duty of disclosure.
_	In the circumstances, there is much to be said for the view that the decision of the policeman to arrest without warrant is a function over which his employer, the State, has no power of direction or control.
_	This strengthens the view that time and depth of experience has an impact of
_	Before the trial, a jury could take the view that if an action could be seen to be in the public interest, that might justify the right of the individual to take that action.
_	Justice Blackmun expressed the view that the purpose of the suit was to restrain "the assessment and collection" of a tax under the Anti-Injunction Act, since an injunction, if granted, would directly prevent the collection of income taxes from the plaintiff, and the action was barred since it had not been shown that under no circumstances could the government ultimately prevail.
_	Tutu expressed the view that if these conservatives disliked the inclusiveness of the Anglican Communion, they always had "the freedom to leave".
_	Several academic commentators to have studied the ONA express the view that the name "Anton Long" is probably the pseudonym of the British Neo-Nazi activist David Myatt, although Myatt has denied that this is the case.
_	However, his aunt continued to put forward the view that Pora was involved but the police concluded her information was unreliable.
_	Expressing the view that "the efficient peasant must be the central figure of our economic recovery", he argued that Russia's peasantry lacked socialist values and that it would take time for them to learn them, and that the introduction of socialist reforms to agriculture through the formation of collectivised farms would have to wait.
_	Owen was of the view that "as long as it continues to employ the World Religions paradigm as a default approach (even after deconstructing it), religious studies will fail in its humanistic task" because it will simply be engaging in "knowledge transfer" and not "critically engaging" with "culture and knowledge".
_	The National Conference is of the view that women need to be protected from economic exploitation even more than men.
_	It was first published in 1961 and develops Hart's theory of legal positivism (the view that laws are rules made by human beings and that there is no inherent or necessary connection between law and morality) within the framework of analytic philosophy.
_	RDM can also incorporate probabilistic information, but rejects the view that a single joint probability distribution represents the best description of a deeply uncertain future.
_	At any rate, he found a high degree of probability in favor of the conclusion at which he had arrived, and warmly gave support to the view that the bodies of these years were identical.
_	Most Islamic scholars take the view that forced marriage is forbidden.
_	In an October 2015 CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Blair apologised for his "mistakes" over Iraq War and admitted there were "elements of truth" to the view that the invasion helped promote the rise of ISIS.
_	D. Fairchild Ruggles rejected the view that the medieval Arab historians had been wrong to claim that agriculture had been revolutionised, and that it had instead simply been restored to a state like that before the collapse of the Roman Empire.
_	He is a proponent of the view that the threshold of complexity required for open-ended evolution requires an interplay between symbolic memory and dynamical machinery, i.e. a strict genotype-phenotype separation.
_	"The Travels of Cyrus" not only proved to be one of the best selling works of the eighteenth century, Ramsay also promulgated the view that Britain should create a world trading empire and become the 'Capital of the Universe'.
_	In the book and other writings, Giuliano staunchly contested the view that an end to the Castro regime would be near, and expressed the view that any transition would be slow and gradual.
_	Therefore we have no hesitation in holding the view that these provisions are against the fundamental tenets of our Constitution, and therefore, ultra vires the Constitution and accordingly they are declared void."
_	Niculescu pioneered early on the view that psychiatric disorders are genetically complex, heterogeneous, and overlapping, requiring gene level integration of data followed by pathway analyses.
_	Syrianus (5th century CE) refers to "Brotinus" as an author of the view that the monad, or first cause, "transcends all kinds of reason and essence in power and dignity," whereby an attempt was made to insert an element of Platonism into Pythagoreanism, which probably refers to Neoplatonism.
_	Emile Pauty of the Institut des Hautes Etudes Marocaines criticised the Muslims for taking the view that "the passage of time is nothing" and charged them with "let[ting] their monuments fall into ruin with as much indifference as they once showed ardour in building them."
_	In his article entitled “The Romantic Spirit in Music,” Edward J. Dent expresses the view that, “We should all unhesitatingly agree that Weber is the first of the great Romantics.”
_	He was a leader in promoting the view that necessary steps for controlling population growth and achieving economic development were the provision of reproductive health programs and the raising of the status of women.
_	He explicitly rejects the view that any attack on Israeli policy equals anti-Semitism.
_	The guidelines take the view that Article 50 permits a two-phased negotiation, in which the UK first agrees to a financial commitment and to lifelong benefits for EU citizens in Britain, and then negotiations on a future relationship can begin.
_	The presence of these genes could suggest that emrB-Lactobacillus RNAs have a function related to transposons, although it is also consistent with the view that the apparent transposons have merely replicated nearby to the emrB-Lactobacillus RNAs by coincidence, and that there is no functional relationship between the two entities.
_	During his long tenure in the Supreme Court he was a party to a number of landmark judgments including the judgment in "Golaknath v. State of Punjab" which took the view that the Parliament had no power to cut down the Fundamental Rights by constitutional amendment.
_	The prophet Isaiah, active in Jerusalem about a century before Josiah, makes no mention of the Exodus, covenants with God, or disobedience to God's laws; in contrast Isaiah's contemporary Hosea, active in the northern kingdom of Israel, makes frequent reference to the Exodus, the wilderness wanderings, a covenant, the danger of foreign gods and the need to worship Yahweh alone; this has led scholars to the view that these traditions behind Deuteronomy have a northern origin.
_	In addition to working on skepticism as a theoretical problem, Williams has a strong interest in the historical development of the skeptical tradition and defends the view that skeptical arguments in modern and contemporary philosophy differ in fundamental ways from similar or related arguments developed in antiquity.
_	He also expressed the view that the Australian constitution is not racist for omitting mention of Aboriginal or Torres Strait Islander people.
_	Thus, outgroup stereotypicality judgments are overestimated, supporting the view that out-group stereotypes are overgeneralizations.
_	Abhinavagupta holds the view that this poem was actually written by Kalidasa, and has written a commentary on it, but the construction etc., of the poem indicates that Kalidasa did not write this poem.
_	Arthur Jensen was a proponent of the view that there is a correlation between scores on all the known types of IQ tests and that this correlation points to an underlying factor of general intelligence, or "g".
_	Margaret Hebblethwaite suggests that "several years later the bishops of Malawi supported the view that Kalilombe would not be welcomed back."
_	William H. Calvin has advanced the view that use of the Acheulean hand axe in hominids was a major factor in the evolution in human intelligence.
_	Ahmad Moussalli tends to agree with the view that Wahhabism is a subset of Salafism, saying "As a rule, all Wahhabis are salafists, but not all salafists are Wahhabis".
_	The six judges made up of the Chief Justice, Mr Justice Edward Kwame Wiredu, Mr Justice George Acquah, Mr Justice Williams Atugubah, Mrs Justice Sophia Akuffo, Mr Justice George Lamptey and Mr justice Kwame Afreh held the view that the FTC was not alien to the Constitution.
_	Secondly he said that the view that spiritual enlightenment is of a greater importance than obeying the sharia was a failure to properly follow the example of Muhammad.
_	St. Thomas, St. Bonaventure, and Albertus Magnus held the view that the Apostles baptized in the name of Jesus only by special dispensation.
_	In the sixteenth century the Italian philosopher Giordano Bruno, an early supporter of the Copernican theory that Earth and other planets orbit the Sun (heliocentrism), put forward the view that the fixed stars are similar to the Sun and are likewise accompanied by planets.
_	On the issue of nationality, Livingstone has expressed the view that he identifies as English rather than British, although his father was Scottish and he supports the continued existence of the United Kingdom.
_	Citron expresses the view that Porter was not interested in cinema and "noticeably wrote down for the movies."
_	In 2002, six Russian Rodnover organisations issued the "Bittsa Agreement" ("Bittsevskoe Obraschchenie"), in which they expressed the view that "Rodnoverie" should be regarded as the foremost name of the religion.
_	According to Buddhism, the deepest, most pernicious erroneous view held by sentient beings is the view that a permanent, eternal, immutable, independent self exists.
_	This story was depicted in the collection of yōkai depictions, the Konjaku Hyakki Shūi by Sekien Toriyama under the title "onihitokuchi," and in the explanatory text, the man was Ariwara no Narihira, and the woman was Fujiwara no Takaiko, but in actuality their names were not specified in "The Tales of Ise," and the view that it was a tale of Ariwara no Narihira was an explanation in common language.
_	Professor John Booth Davies at the University of Strathclyde has argued in his book "The Myth of Addiction" that "people take drugs because they want to and because it makes sense for them to do so given the choices available" as opposed to the view that "they are compelled to by the pharmacology of the drugs they take."
_	He described the impact of Jewish immigration as having raised the standard of living for Arab workers, and asserted that the Commission was wrongly and dangerously encouraging the view that immigration was a menace to Arabs and threatened their economic future.
_	The parents of the schoolgirls took the view that the Ministry of Education's school uniform policy was unconstitutional as it violated the girls' freedom of religion under Article 15(1).
_	Now there may be a review before sentence if the magistrate or regional magistrate is of the view that an irregularity has taken place.
_	West also expressed the view that the prisoner exchange that brought the release of Bowe Bergdahl was grounds for impeachment.
_	These feelings were a result of the view that the Haganah was not adequately defending Jewish interests in the region.
_	The Advaita school holds the view that the world appearance is owing to "avidya" (ignorance) that has the power to project i.e. to superimpose the unreal on the real (adhyasa), and also the power to conceal the real resulting in the delusion of the Jiva who experiences objects created by his mind and sees difference in this world, he sees difference between the ātman ("the individual self") and Brahman ("the supreme Self").
_	South African law does not have a closed list of real rights in land, but new types of real rights in land are permitted only with great caution, in keeping with the view that land should not be unnecessarily burdened.
_	All analyses supported the view that "Brachypelma" (along with "Aphonopelma") was made up of deeply divergent subgroups.
_	Paul Preston takes the view that Franco had time to impose his own version of history, which still prevents contemporary Spain from "looking upon its recent violent past in an open and honest way".
_	After hearing the (revised) arguments from both sides for the cause of the mud volcano at the American Association of Petroleum Geologists International Convention in Cape Town in October 2008, the vast majority of the conference session audience present (consisting of AAPG oil and gas professionals) voted in favor of the view that the Lusi (Sidoarjo) mudflow had been induced by drilling.
_	Ottoman officials were of the view that violence committed by Malisors in the 1880s-1890s was of a tribal nature not related to nationalism or religion.
_	In regard to consensus in Islamic law, the school also held the view that religiously binding consensus only included that of the first generation of Muslims and that such a consensus must be tied to an already existing scriptural text.
_	Intelligence quotient (IQ) tests do correlate with one another and that the view that the general intelligence factor ("g") is a statistical artifact is a minority one.
_	There were several periods when Chinese foreign policy took on isolationist tones, because of the view that the rest of the world was poor and backward with little to offer.
_	Warming adhered to the hypothesis that part of the flora had survived the last glaciation - the nunatak hypothesis, while Nathorst advocated the view that the entire flora had immigrated anew after the glaciation - the tabula rasa hypothesis.
_	He considered the view that New Labour's welfare reforms were "workfarist" and argued that in this context it must refer to social policy being put in line with free market economic growth.
_	Jorge Luis Borges accepted the view that, for Virgil, what we call reality is not in fact such; that Virgil may have considered the Platonic world of the archetypes to be the real world.
_	A briefing sent to the Brazilian cabinet stated that the countries share the view that Bolivia's leadership of the block has been ineffective.
_	However the view that incentive-based regulation is radically different from CAC has been scrutinised .
_	Non-cognitivism is the view that when we judge something as morally right or wrong, this is neither true nor false.
_	That is disputed by several linguists, who hold the view that it is also possible that the occurrence of these retroflex consonants was an independent development within the Austronesian language family.
_	It tells of the hedonistic lifestyle Augustine lived for a time within his youth, associating with young men who boasted of their sexual exploits; his following and leaving of the anti-sex and anti-marriage Manichaeism in attempts to seek sexual morality; and his subsequent return to Christianity due to his embracement of Skepticism and the New Academy movement (developing the view that sex is good, and that virginity is better, comparing the former to silver and the latter to gold; Augustine's views subsequently strongly influenced Western theology).
_	According to the portraits left by some of Socrates' followers, Socrates himself seems to have openly espoused certain anti-democratic views, most prominent perhaps being the view that it is not majority opinion that yields correct policy but rather genuine knowledge and professional competence, which is possessed by only a few.
_	For much of this period, the BIA took the view that it had a duty to intervene in the tribe's affairs on behalf of potentially enrolled citizens of the tribe.
_	When Winston Churchill formed his wartime coalition government in 1940 he appointed Cripps Ambassador to the Soviet Union in the view that Cripps, who had Marxist sympathies, could negotiate with Joseph Stalin who was at this time allied with Nazi Germany through the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact.
_	Notable advocates of the view that Obama may not be eligible for the Presidency include Philip J. Berg, a Pennsylvania attorney and 9/11 conspiracy theorist.
_	The opening scene generates the view that Azákia is truly the one who suffers with and for the male characters.
_	Successive UK governments supported the view that Turkey should be allowed to join EU if it fulfils certain conditions.
_	African-American support for abortion is strong, 67% believing that it should remain legal in all or most cases, 57% saying it should be in all communities and 66% expressing the view that abortion clinics were safe, according to a July 2012 poll.
_	Lenin's Marxist beliefs led him to the view that society could not transform directly from its present state to communism, but must first enter a period of socialism, and so his main concern was how to convert Russia into a socialist society.
_	Although expert opinion varied as to whether the clothes damage could have been caused by a dingo some took the view that it could have been.
_	"The Nobility and Excellence of Women", but now considering the issue in a more mature fashion, I am of the view that it is not the result of conscious manipulation nor the action of an angry soul, but the will and providence of nature and God."
_	Today, many Christians have adopted the view that there is no sin whatsoever in the uninhibited enjoyment of marital relations.
_	With our knowledge of the complete unalterability both of character and of mental faculties, we are led to the view that a real and thorough improvement of the human race might be reached not so much from outside as from within, not so much by theory and instruction as rather by the path of generation.
_	In the 1933 case of "Louis K. Liggett Co v Lee", Brandeis J. represented the view that the resulting "race was one not of diligence, but of laxity", particularly in terms of corporate tax rates, and rules that might protect less powerful corporate stakeholders.
_	However, some historians, both Canadian and American, retain the view that desire to annex all or part of Canada was an American goal.
_	LJ took the view that it was wrong to take those clauses in isolation and they needed to be read together with the other clauses relating to sale.
_	Mamoru Uchida and Seishi Araki were of the view that although this story of Shiragiku was a fiction, the monument and a temple which was said related to Shiragiku will serve as a tourist attraction.
_	The EMI producer Walter Legge arranged a series of recordings of Walton's major works and many minor ones over the next twenty years; a rival composer expressed the view that if Walton had an attack of flatulence (he used an earthier expression), Walter Legge would record it.
_	In short, the common view among Shi'ite scholars and researchers, or, rather, what is unanimously agreed upon by them, is the view that no alteration has been made to the Qur'an.
_	However, a faction of Shi'ite traditionists and a group of Sunni scholars have held the view that alterations were made.
_	Plutarch was of the view that the Athenians were so angered by this cynical manoeuvring that the ostracism was never to be used again.
_	Ibn Ashur asserted the view that language is fundamentally ambiguous and is not enough to determine the intent of a speaker.
_	Semicompatibilism is the view that causal determinism is compatible with moral responsibility, while making no assertions about the truth of determinism or free will.
_	The researchers expressed the view that "a heterogeneous disorder like schizophrenia is unlikely to be modeled accurately by a single pharmacological agent."
_	His observation that "for food they eat one another" was later described as a "self-defeating notion" and helped to support the view that the spiders had been blown there and were not permanent residents.
_	This popularity increased the view that all Cockers were useless as working dogs.
_	Calvin's religious epistemology is based on the sensus divinitatis (Sense of Divinity), the view that the presence of God is universally perceived by all humans.
_	Gilmore describes Satanism as beginning with atheism, and taking the view that the universe is indifferent: "There’s no God, there’s no Devil.
_	By 1841, Koekkoek had earned such regard from his fellow artists that he decided to publish a book of lessons for students, "Herinneringen en Mededeelingen van eenen Landschapsschilder" ("Recollections and Communications of a Landscape Painter"), in which he aired the view that an artist must, above all, stay true to nature through meticulous observation and rigorous draughtsmanship.
_	Some more recent studies dispute the view that the golden ratio was employed in the design.
_	It also motivates them towards love of Muhammad and promoting the view that the events around the Day of Judgement require belief in the unseen and are highly metaphysical in nature.
_	Others have the view that the carnival incident was a pretext, inquiries revealing that it was conducted in an organized manner and was hence a pre-planned attack.
_	Throughout his life he promoted the view that study and scholarship were means to making men sages, once writing:
_	In recent years, genetic and other evidence has accumulated in support of the view that early human kinship was probably matrilineal,; on the other hand, matrilineal descent does not necessarily imply matriarchal political rule.
_	The poor performance of the Alberta Alliance in the June by-elections reinforced the view that the Alberta Alliance would not be able to effectively challenge the government of Premier Ed Stelmach.
_	Valberg points out the difficulty of reconciling this with his commitment to the view that he shares the world with metaphysical equals.
_	Many authorities take the view that, by law, rent cannot consist in anything other than money or fruits, but this prevents the enquiry's being pressed to its proper conclusion.
_	However, the minister took the view that denying entry would not be justified.
_	Churchill "was" of the view that the new corps forming in France should stay, at least until the final French collapse then return through the nearest port.
_	Harlan, joined by Burton, concurring in part and dissenting in part, took the view that the taxable event was the grant of the options, and not their exercise, with the result that the gain to the taxpayer was to be measured as of the date of the grant of the options.
_	This appears to support the view that the air raid struck a convoy of arms to Hezbollah however Israel has refused to officially confirm or deny the raid, despite a broad reference to it from the Israeli Defence Minister Ehud Barak.
_	These factors established the view that it was a "movement".
_	It was of the view that a local body Ombudsman should be constituted for a group of districts to look into complaints of corruption and maladministration against functionaries of local bodies, both elected members and officials.
_	In his text The "Anarchist Synthesis", Faure has the view that "these currents were not contradictory but complementary, each having a role within anarchism: anarcho-syndicalism as the strength of the mass organisations and the best way for the practice of anarchism; libertarian communism as a proposed future society based on the distribution of the fruits of labour according to the needs of each one; and anarcho-individualism as a negation of oppression and affirming the individual right to development of the individual, seeking to please them in every way.
_	Chomsky is scathing in his opposition to the view that anarchism is inconsistent with support for 'welfare state' measures, stating in part that
_	After his arrest, Stauffenberg told the Gestapo that he: “took the view that the Jewish question should have been dealt with in a "less extreme manner" because then it would have produced less disturbance among the population”
_	This legislation is based on the view that a woman could change her mind about an abortion once she witnesses the development of the unborn child through the latest technology.
_	Haydn's century, following on the discoveries of Newton, had the view that an orderly universe—particularly the mathematically governed motion of the heavenly bodies—attests to divine wisdom.
_	Lim refrained from commenting at length during the debate, except to state that he would not support the view that was put forth by the British.
_	Even with the lack of precise figures due to the secretive nature of the regime, testimonials from independent bloggers, activists, and international watchers support the view that it is difficult for most people to access the web and that harsh punishments for individuals that do not follow government policies are the norm.
_	He began using the statistical techniques that Francis Galton had developed for he had come to the view that "the problem of animal evolution is essentially a statistical problem."
_	All the Vindolanda documents are written by officers, supporting the view that many of the lower ranks may have been illiterate.
_	The Birmingham "Temperance Hall" Ecclesia initially took the view that work as "non-combattants", for example stretcher bearers, was acceptable, but Jannaway strongly urged that this was still participating in the war.
_	The government estimated the military strength of Malisors in İşkodra sanjak as numbering over 30,000 tribesmen and Ottoman officials were of the view that the highlanders could defeat Montenegro on their own with limited state assistance.
_	The first is the view that liberty consists in collective self-government—i.e. that liberty and democracy are the same.
_	The second is the view that liberty consists in being able to do whatever one wants without constraint.
_	Cashmore expressed the view that "whenever there are black people who sense an injust disparity between their own material conditions and those of the whites who surround them and tend to control major social institutions, the Rasta messages have relevance."
_	Benard was of the view that because of its stances on capitalism, European hegemony, and white racism, Rastafari is "easily incorporated into other nations with similar histories of European oppression".
_	This "High Christology" is "the view that Jesus was a pre-existent divine being who became a human, did the Father’s will on earth, and then was taken back up into heaven whence he had originally come."
_	Countering the view that post-9/11 SWAT policing represents the militarization of police forces, scholar den Heyer writes that SWAT policing is part of a natural progression towards police professionalization.
_	The process of learning at Mirambika is based on the view that each individual comes into life with an evolutionary purpose and corresponding potentialities: educating means drawing out this potential.
_	Turnbull told the ABC "7.30" program during the boycott that "I take the view that wherever there is an open microphone I'm happy to get on the other side of it."
_	Chartier uses this account to ground a clear statement of the natural law basis for the view that solidaristic wealth redistribution by individual persons is often morally required, but as a response by individuals and grass-roots networks to particular circumstances rather than as a state-driven attempt to achieve a particular distributive pattern.
_	He was a very religious man and was a great adherent of contextualisation and acculturisation of religious beliefs, because he held the view that religion without respect to cultural roots; would perpetually be seen as alien religion by the pagan citizenry.
_	The Church of England submission to the enquiry supported the view that doctors should be given the right to withhold treatment from seriously disabled newborn babies in exceptional circumstances, and the Christian Medical Fellowship stated that when treatment would be "a burden" this was not euthanasia.
_	Like Babloo Srivastava, he too was of the view that Mirza had made no efforts to secure his release after arrest nor was he extended sufficient help during his trial.
_	Arabian horse breeders hold the view that traditions of the desert Bedouin people considered the "bloody shoulder" to be a prized trait in a war mare and much desired.
_	As a result, cognitive psychologists have largely adopted the view that intuitive judgments, generalizations, and numerical or probabilistic calculations are systematically biased.
_	Despite these hints of uneven distribution, classical rabbinical literature expresses the view that manna fell in very large quantities each day.
_	It is possible to take the view that there is no need to define the word "law" (e.g. "let's forget about generalities and get down to cases").
_	Some researchers hold the view that the Canadian healthcare system is better designed to minimize the occurrences of patient dumping.
_	Evidence has been found to support the view that a bilingual individual has the same conceptual system for both of their languages.
_	Thus, official Greek government policy from c. 1850 to c. 1950, adopted the view that speech was not a decisive factor for the establishment of a Greek national identity.
_	The Manchu Qianlong Emperor rejected the views of Han officials who said Xinjiang was not part of China and that he should not conquer it, putting forth the view that China was multiethnic and did not just refer to Han.
_	Lionel Leo and Chen Siyuan have expressed the view that there is no significant difference between the two tests for apparent bias.
_	Historians are also of the view that the first person there was Noor Khan, so called to be the founder of Basti Buzdar.
_	Auguste Comte, the self-professed founder of modern sociology, put forward the view that the rigorous ordering of confirmable observations alone ought to constitute the realm of human knowledge.
_	Because many shareholders were physically distant from corporate headquarters where meetings would take place, new rights were made to allow people to cast votes via proxies, on the view that this and other measures would make directors more accountable.
_	McKew is also of the view that the Labor Party has wasted its time in office.
_	Religious Community, speaking for the local Jewish community, expressed the view that there was no recognizable anti-Semitism in Veith's statement.
_	In his psychoanalytical study of "The Adventures of Tintin", the literary critic Jean-Marie Apostolidès expressed the view that the concept of "the void" appeared repeatedly in "Flight 714 to Sydney", referring to the existence of World War II bunkers and the underground temple as reflections of that void.
_	Apostolidès further expresses the view that one of the "best scenes" in the story was that involving an interchange between Rastapopoulos and Carreidas, stating that "their opposition is merely superficial", in this way comparing them to the competing figures of General Alcazar and General Tapioca in "Tintin and the Picaros".
_	Hoerburger expressed the view that tracks such as "Nasty" and "What Have You Done for Me Lately" erased the former "pop-ingénue image" of Jackson's first two albums, and that ""Control" is a better album than Diana Ross has made in five years and puts Janet in a position similar to the young Donna Summer's—unwilling to accept novelty status and taking her own steps to rise above it."
_	The earlier discovery of plasmons created the view that metal at plasmon frequency "f" is a composite material.
_	Nadya Labi wrote in "The Atlantic" in 2007 that despite the legal and religious prohibitions against same-sex sexual activity in Saudi Arabia, it was still commonplace there due to gender segregation and the view that having sex with others of the same sex does not define one's identity, although the Western view of LGBT identity was beginning to appear in that country.
_	Empirical studies supporting the predictions of RFT suggest that children learn language via a system of inherent reinforcements, challenging the view that language acquisition is based upon innate, language-specific cognitive capacities.
_	Behan took the view that almost all of his work was written to make some form of social, historical or political statement and should either be used as an entire piece of work or not at all.
_	This is cited in confirmation of the view that an associate of al-Husseini's together with three associates of the former Iraqi Prime Minister certainly did visit the Sachsenhausen concentration camp as part of a German secret police "training course" in July 1942.
_	Che Guevara adopted the view that if more resources were directly allocated to satisfy human needs, instead of commercially supplied, a better life for people would result.
_	The Derbyite theory of Shakespeare authorship is the view that William Stanley, 6th Earl of Derby (1561–1642), was the true author of the works of William Shakespeare.
_	Psychological egoism is the view that humans are always motivated by self-interest, even in what seem to be acts of altruism.
_	Socialist states have held that no compensation is due, based on the view that private ownership over socialized assets is illegitimate, exploitative, or a hindrance to further economic development.
_	Since the court had no capacity to review the merits of the decision and conclude whether Jehovah's Witnesses were a threat to public order, it was sufficient that the Minister had made Order 179 with the view that the existence of Jehovah's Witnesses, which forbade national service, was contrary to public peace, welfare and good order.
_	Ludmerer criticizes the view that the Flexner Report spurred the advancement of medical education, crediting the report for spurring the closure of substandard medical schools, but noting that most of the innovations recommended by Abraham Flexner had already been initiated by the better schools by the time the report was written.
_	Abhasavada is the Pratyabhijna’s theory of Manifestation, propounded by Utpalacarya and influenced Abhinavagupta, which explains Monism and holds the world objects as manifestations or Abhasas, and the view that it is the very nature of Shiva, the Supreme Cause (Parma Shiva), to manifest Himself in diverse forms of the universe, that the whole universe is an abhasa of Shiva.
_	While most current authorities maintain the view that "A. brevirostris" is the correct name for the white-chested emerald, it has recently been suggested that this is incorrect, in which case its scientific name would revert to "A. chionopectus".
_	By its nature, anti-racism tends to promote the view that racism is both pernicious and pervasive, and that systemic, structural and individual changes in political, economic, and social life are required to dismantle and end it.
_	David Turner joined his father Frederick in the business in 1958 and in 1962 it was David Turner’s decision to start selling oil, based on the view that as more and more people were turning from coal to oil for home heating, “one followed the customer or lost the business”.
_	The committee endorsed the view that "all Jews are religiously equal regardless of their sexual orientation."
_	It reiterated the justification given by the 6CPC noting that it "is of the view that AIS officers are allotted cadres, irrespective of their choice, and they are required to work in these cadres for considerable periods of time.
_	Ada Anderson of "The Ball State Daily News" expressed the view that "Speechless" would become a popular song, and writers for the "South Florida Sun-Sentinel" stated that the ballad would take time to get used to.
_	Debs also held the view that "labor and capital are friends" and opposed strikes as a means of settling differences; the Brotherhood had never authorized a strike, from its founding in 1873, to 1887: a record which Debs was proud of.
_	Moraes held the view that Andretti ran into him, and both drivers expressed their frustration to the TV crews.
_	A well-known example of a personal opinion on a matter of faith and morals that was taught by a pope but rejected by the Church is the view that Pope John XXII expressed on when the dead can reach the beatific vision.
_	In the 13th century, Thomas Aquinas – influenced by Augustine – proposed a similar theodicy based on the view that God is goodness and that there can be no evil in him.
_	A responsum was written by Rabbi David Golinkin expressing the view that not only is it legitimate for the modern Jewish community to write a new scroll of mourning, it was also incumbent to do so.
_	However, she also believed that their book could reinforce "feminist axioms about rape" since "implicitly, if not explicitly, Thornhill and Palmer lend support to the view that all men are potential rapists."
_	Revisionist art historians have criticized the view that Thomson and the Group of Seven were originators of a new Canadian nationalist style of art.
_	Following Plato, St. Augustine, for example, held the view that language was merely labels applied to already existing concepts.
_	In the mid 1980s Mahmoud Aldebe, the chairman of SMF, in conjunction with "Statens invandrarverk" (the former name of the Swedish Migration Agency) he authored the leaflet "Islam in Sweden" (Swedish: "Islam i Sverige") wherein he expresses the view that Islam is an all-encompassing belief system which gives firm instructions which are to be followed in all aspects of daily life: moral, spiritual, political and economic.
_	In these circumstances, that writer is led to the view that there was, following the British withdrawal and the abortion of the partition proposals, a lapse or vacancy or vacuum of sovereignty.
_	He expressed the view that if it was purely a question of semantics, it would be preferable for the court to adopt the real risk test as it precisely conveys to laymen and lawyers what the law is concerned with.
_	Bill Keller was of the view that "Jimmy Wales... assumed a higher profile as a combatant for the tech industry [and] supplied an aura of credibility to a libertarian alliance that ranged from the money-farming Megatrons of Google to the hacker anarchists of Anonymous."
_	Philosopher Paavo Pylkkänen, Ilkka Pättiniemi and Hiley are of the view that Bohm's emphasis on notions such as "structural process", "order" and "movement" as fundamental in physics point to some form of scientific structuralism, and that Hiley's work on symplectic geometry, which is in line with the algebraic approach initiated by Bohm and Hiley, "can be seen as bringing Bohm's 1952 approach closer to scientific structuralism".
_	Dawkins said "I think we face an equal but much more sinister challenge from the left, in the shape of cultural relativism - the view that scientific truth is only one kind of truth and it is not to be especially privileged".
_	The "Friends of Bath Recreation Ground" is a separate group that holds the view that the Rec should not be used for professional sport, and that the council's actions in this matter have been dubious for many years.
_	This, the view that the mind and the brain are distinct substances, and that facts about each are "causally relevant" to the other, is rare in contemporary philosophy.
_	and of the British Psychoanalytical Society In "The Young Delinquent", he expressed the view that "nearly every tragedy of crime is in its origin a drama of domestic life."
_	He has expressed the view that his AFA exhibits the "middle ground on racial issues.
_	They subscribe to the view that in a thing which is permanent the existence of "sāmānaya" and "samavāya" is complete, that means that common properties cannot exist without individuals possessing them; the individuals are the "āśraya"; "sāmānaya" and "samavāya" is complete in one substance will not exist without "āśraya" (substratum).
_	Shaw takes the view that "Marriage remains practically inevitable", as the alternatives have too many disadvantages.
_	Thomas Peterson of the National Climatic Data Center said he had seen nothing in the emails that called the fundamental science into question, and Andrew Solow of Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution agreed that there was no trickery, saying he would use the word trick to describe some methodological step, but expressed the view that the basis of reconstructions had been unclear.
_	"The Jewish Chronicle" itself took the view that rather than "attempt to tell both sides of what is a complex and contentious story", the series had turned out to be "a depressing study in how to select historical facts to convey a politically loaded message".
_	On the other hand, Liel Leibovitz, writing for American online Jewish magazine "Tablet", took the view that, "contrary to these howls of discontent, the show is a rare and riveting example of telling Israel's story on screen with accuracy, sensitivity, and courage".
_	The percentage of students who held the view that there was a conflict between religion and evolution was reduced by about half.
_	In "The Spirit of the Laws", Montesquieu outlined the view that man and societies are influenced by climate.
_	He supported the idea that the Senate composition should not be determined by population; the view that it should instead be composed of equal numbers of members for each state prevailed in the Connecticut Compromise.
_	One argument against the view that tax policy increases income inequality is analysis of the overall share of wealth controlled by the top 1%.
_	Then in his role as journalist, the former commissioner held the view that only a small fraction of policemen became compromised and that the principal problem stemmed from their relationships with politicians rather than with journalists.
_	In the mid 1980s, as the chairman of SMF and in conjunction with "Statens invandrarverk" (the former name of the Swedish Migration Agency) he authored the leaflet "Islam in Sweden" (Swedish: "Islam i Sverige") wherein he expresses the view that Islam is an all-encompassing belief system which gives firm instructions which are to be followed in all aspects of daily life: moral, spiritual, political and economic.
_	However, she rejected the view that Jantjie was a fraud, stating, "we should not say that he is a fake interpreter because he does have a basic sign language translation qualification.
_	He has also expressed the view that the left-right political divide has "lost any operative value to analyze the field of ideological or political discourse", for "the new divides that have been emerging for the last few decades no longer coincide with the old left-right distinction".
_	As a result, he is remembered today, not only for his sharp wit and high ethical standards, but also for his loyalty to the view that in a democracy the best way for a man to serve himself, his friends, and his city—even during times of war—is by being loyal to, and by speaking publicly about, the truth."
_	"The Labor Party adopts the view that we're open for investment.
_	She obtained the approval of Rabbi Yisrael Meir Kagan (author of "Chofetz Chaim"), who issued a responsum holding that contemporary conditions required departing from traditional prohibitions on teaching women Torah and accepting the view that it was permitted.
_	Almost all of them expressed the view that Rolnik is Israel’s most influential columnist and the best economic journalist in Israel.
_	Deontological libertarians have the view that natural rights exist and from there argue that initiation of force and fraud should never take place.
_	The party rejects the idea that "socialism has existed before and has failed", holding to the view that those countries which claimed to have established socialism had in fact merely established "state capitalism".
_	Some Jewish groups urged a boycott of the film, in the view that its presentation of a Jewish pawnbroker encouraged anti-Semitism.
_	Followers of this philosophy may withdraw from politics for several reasons, including the view that politics is artificial, divisionary, or corrupt.
_	There is a field on the banks of the Thames called Battlefield where spearheads were dug up in 1670, encouraging the view that this is where the battle took event took place.
_	He also took the view that the truth of determinism was irrelevant.
_	Frequently expressed is the view that Russia can only be conquered by Russians.
_	However, few Nationals fans have taken an interest in franchise records, preferring to compare Nationals records with those of previous Washington MLB teams instead, and a segment of Nationals fans actively opposes the inclusion of Expos history into that of the Nationals, taking the view that the Montreal years are irrelevant to Washington and that the team made a complete break with its past and started anew when it arrived in Washington, inheriting the history of the two Washington Senators teams rather than that of the Expos.
_	At the core of Eddy's theology is the view that the spiritual world is the only reality and is entirely good, and that the material world, with its evil, sickness and death, is an illusion.
_	Brennan, concurring, expressed the view that the court's decision left undisturbed the Court's retroactivity precedents as applied to convictions final at the time of decision.
_	The physicist Paul Davies also supports the view that if a planetary catastrophe threatens the survival of the human species on Earth, a self-sufficient colony could "reverse-colonize" Earth and restore human civilization.
_	Modern eliminativists have much more clearly expressed the view that mental phenomena simply do not exist and will eventually be eliminated from people's thinking about the brain in the same way that demons have been eliminated from people's thinking about mental illness and psychopathology.
_	King's College, Cambridge have given the view that the term 'indicated wealth and privilege, and it carried rights and responsibilities'.
_	Moreover, the scholars of this school generally do not oppose the view that ethnic difference plays a part in many conflicts.
_	"The Lawyer" was also of the view that Berwin Leighton Paisner, who initially had the potential to be a full member of the Silver Cirlce, did not meet the criteria of the Silver Circle.
_	In modern times, Wilamowitz came down strongly for the view that it was written by Critias, a disciple of Socrates, and dated it, as forming the coda of a tetralogy, following 3 tragedies by Critias -"Peirithous, Rhadumunthus" and "Tennes" -, which he argued was written sometime after his return from exile in 411.
_	In 1945, Tătărescu stressed his belief that authoritarianism benefited Romania, and supported the view that Carol had meant to keep Romania out of the war.
_	It represents the view that most botanists had held up to that time.
_	They have reflected the view that in drawing a difference between prospective and historical data, Judge Bennet may have rendered a narrow decision, which is particular to historical data.
_	They went on to say: "the Commission after most careful consideration of all aspects, is of the view that the Security Forces were confronted with an unprecedented situation when no other choice was possible and all "feasible precautions" that were practicable in the circumstances had been taken.
_	The Arminians were perceived as ready to compromise with the Spanish, whereas the Dutch Calvinists were not, so Arminianism was considered by some to be political treason; in 1617–8 there was a pamphlet war and Francis van Aarssens expressed the view that the Arminians were working for Philip IV of Spain.
_	According to Cousins, many scholars are of the view that "this discourse was identified as the first sermon of the Buddha only at a later date."
_	Most historians of this period are of the view that a chastity belt was worn to prevent sexual assault and that the woman kept the key.
_	According to Serdyukov, this was an effort to resume regular Russian naval patrols on the world's oceans, the view that was also supported by Russian media.
_	The courts have upheld the view that sexuality is not something that one needs to openly disclose, so if one can be free from persecution by hiding it, then one does not qualify for refugee status.
_	Arabic philologists hold the view that the meaning of the word "salawat" would vary according to who has used the word, and to whom it is used for.
_	He and Justice James Harvey Birch, held the view that the Missouri Compromise was unconstitutional and that the U.S. Congress lacked the legal power to legislate slavery in territorial areas.
_	While many soldiers were complaining about the politicians who had sent them into action without enough men or equipment, Marriott took the view that the British could never have gained the trust of the people of Basra, thanks to their history.
_	"Having reached the above conclusion, the Court takes the view that the contras remain responsible for their acts, in particular the alleged violations by them of humanitarian law.
_	In addition to the subjects tackled in Dretske’s book-length projects, he was also known as a leading proponent, along with David Armstrong and Michael Tooley, of the view that laws of nature are relations among universals.
_	It expressed the view that "[t]he ISA continues to be relevant and crucial as a measure of last resort for the preservation of our national security".
_	Based on the view that music is speech and speech is music, Lessac's work and books focused on body and speech energies and how they go together.
_	The poet Charles Simic wrote in "The New York Review of Books" giving his endorsement to the view that "this is a remarkable first novel."
_	In the field of linguistics, polygenesis is the view that human languages evolved as several lineages independent of one another.
_	It is contrasted with monogenesis, which is the view that human languages all go back to a single common ancestor.
_	In this watch the driven escape wheel was smaller, presumably because Breguet had come to the view that this was beneficial.
_	The duo has also created a website called HumaneMyth.org which advocates the view that it is not possible to humanely use animals for food.
_	He was a regular in the team throughout his time at Griffin Park, averaging a goal in every four league games, with manager Harry Curtis offering the view that Robson was his best ever signing.
_	Bill Farrar with the ACLU of Virginia expressed the view that "severe mental illness should not be a death sentence."
_	However, Muslim scholars and a large portion of the people of Pakistan were of the view that this was exactly what the Quaid-a-Azam wanted and that it was a good step forward in the constitutional history of Pakistan.
_	In a report by the Human Rights Committee dated 15 December 2003, the Committee was of the view that preventive detention was not arbitrary, nor did it offend the principle of the presumption of innocence.
_	Mount Merapi's eruption in 1822 and a cholera epidemic in 1824 furthered the view that a cataclysm is inbound, eliciting widespread support for Diponegoro.
_	Daly is inclined to the view that Libyan infantry would have copied the Iberian use of the sword during their fighting there and so were armed similarly to the Romans.
_	The NF professed the view that those who disagreed with its conspiracy theories were ignorant of reality, and experiencing false consciousness.
_	He was received as a victim of imperial despotism, but the king expressed the view that if he had a complaint, it was not of poverty.
_	The Poles held the view that without direct access to the Baltic Sea, Poland's economic independence would be illusory.
_	A feminist counter-public sphere is, for example, responsible for circulating the view that women's issues such as domestic abuse and reproductive rights are deserving of debate in the larger public sphere.
_	Analyses of the symbols showed that they have little similarity with Near Eastern writing, leading to the view that these symbols and the Sumerian script probably arose independently.
_	Crisztina Nagy, a commission spokeswoman, said "The commission has consistently maintained the view that the border issue is a bilateral issue that should not be brought to the table of the accession negotiations."
_	Opponents mostly expressed the view that the tram line would increase traffic congestion as the roads were not wide enough to accommodate existing traffic and trams, and that traffic would be displaced into side roads, as well as concerns over the disruption caused by tramway construction.
_	By the late 1700s, scientists no longer universally accepted the view that pregnancy was impossible without pleasure, although this view was still common.
_	Simply put the Treasury view was the view that fiscal policy could only move resources from one use to another, and would not affect the total flow of economic activity.
_	A common misinterpretation of paradigms is the belief that the discovery of paradigm shifts and the dynamic nature of science (with its many opportunities for subjective judgments by scientists) are a case for relativism: the view that all kinds of belief systems are equal.
_	Several excavations support the view that Rome grew from pastoral settlements on the Palatine Hill built above the area of the future Roman Forum.
_	Within Christianity, Unitarianism is the view that God consists of only one person, the Father, instead of three persons as Trinitarianism states.
_	As a Justice, Black held the view that the Court should literally enforce constitutional guarantees, especially the First Amendment free speech clause.
_	Ego depletion is the view that high self-control requires energy and focus, and over an extended period of self-control demands, this self-control can lessen.
_	Later that day, in her first press conference as Prime Minister, Gillard said that at times the Rudd Government "went off the tracks", and "[I] came to the view that a good Government was losing its way".
_	When he resigned in November 1848 Tscherning was not convinced that a further three years of war was desirable and he increasingly came to the view that, while rebellion should be seen for what it was and put down accordingly, that did not mean that regional differences and language rights should be ignored.
_	The remainder (Parts II-C and II-D) of Justice O'Connor's opinion, joined by three other Justices, expressed the view that
_	In anticipation of the Second World War, Crawford expressed the view that he would "remain neutral" and not take sides, not because he favoured fascism over liberal democracy but because he saw both as repugnant forms of capitalist society which would ultimately be swept away by a socialist revolution; in his words the war would be "a clash of imperialisms, a gangsters' feud".
_	One interview with ABC News ADF's highest ranking transgender service member Lieutenant Colonel Cate McGregor speechwriter to the Chief of Army, Lieutenant General David Morrison AO, stated that the Chief of Army took the view that the "army could not survive if it became a demographic ghetto" and described an underbelly within the military whose culture was to exclude those who are different.
_	This intrinsic value, it is argued, makes nonsense of the view that the individual's value stems solely from the community.
_	In philosophy the term frequently denotes the view that everything belongs to the world of nature and can be studied with the methods appropriate for studying that world, "i.e." the sciences.
_	Christopher Einolf, in contrast wrote "For George Thomas, the view that slavery was needed as a way of controlling blacks was supported by his personal experience of Nat Turner's Rebellion.
_	Koestler shares with Ryle the view that the mind of a person is not an independent non-material entity, temporarily inhabiting and governing the body.
_	In 2017, with regard to the question of whether trans women are women, Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie expressed the view that "trans women are trans women."
_	The 1907 minutes recorded the view that ""it is essential to get rid of the Barclay collection which... has ceased to be of any value to the Fellows or to anyone visiting the museum.""
_	This proposal was rejected, and the Akademi took the view that Fellowships would only be conferred upon living writers.
_	In 1984, Thorsson expressed the view that List's impact was such that he was "able to shape the runic theories of German magicians (although not necessarily their "political" ones) from that time to the present day."
_	Judges usually take the view that a client advised by a lawyer is strongly presumed both to have a basic understanding of legal principle, and to have given consent (Informed Consent 2007).
_	There are two pieces of evidence to support the view that "Old Bess" and "Beelzebub" are the same engine.
_	The central point about Lycrophron as attacked in the "Politics" of Aristotle, is that Lycrophron rejected the idea that the state exists to make people "just and good", instead holding the view that justice and law is about preventing people violating the bodies and goods of each other.
_	Although unsatisfied with Adorno and Horkeimer's thought presented in "Dialectic of Enlightenment", Habermas shares the view that, in the form of instrumental rationality, the era of modernity marks a move away from the liberation of enlightenment and toward a new form of enslavement.
_	Accordingly, some Muslims take the view that the satire of Islam, of religious representatives, and above all of Islamic prophets is blasphemy in Islam punishable by death.
_	Tunku held and expressed the view that Malayan communities could not be united within a single political party.
_	Professor Jennett expressed the view that it would be in accordance with good medical practice in the case of Anthony Bland to withdraw the nasogastric artificial feeding.
_	The Herbert–Stevens model was housing centered, and the overall study had the view that the purpose of transportation investments and related policy choices was to make Philadelphia a good place to live.
_	Later works on witchcraft have not agreed entirely with the "Malleus" but none of them challenged the view that women were more inclined to be witches than men.
_	From the Renaissance onward, the view that the Dutch language should somehow be 'ennobled' with an extensive case system after the model of Latin was widespread.
_	Chaim Weizmann wrote to the Manchester Zionist, Harry Sacher, who became a focus for the view that Sokolow and Weizmann had capitulated; forfeiting the right to lead by "preferring British Imperialism ... to Zionism".
_	The contemporary Islamic scholar Nuh Ha Mim Keller holds the view that the criticism of kalam from scholars was specific to the Mu'tazila, going on to claim that other historical Muslim scholars such as Al-Ghazali and An-Nawawi saw both good and bad in kalam and cautioned from the speculative excess of unorthodox groups such as the Mu'tazilah and Jahmites.
_	Although Rice said that the attack "began spontaneously" as the result of an anti-Islamic video, Patrick F. Kennedy, the under secretary of state for management, had said prior to her interview that he believed the assault was planned, and other sources, including Libyan President Mohammed Magariaf, had expressed the view that the attack was pre-planned and that there was an al-Qaeda link.
_	The open-air nuclear test explosions witnessed by Beetham led him to the view that it would never be possible to limit the extent of a nuclear war.
_	In 1982, seven out of ten Cambridge University medical students who had failed university exams immediately sat and passed the Apothecaries examination, further strengthening the view that non-university exams were set at a lower standard.
_	The policy was continued by subsequent Financial Secretaries, including Sir Philip Haddon-Cave, who said that "positive non-interventionism involves taking the view that it is normally futile and damaging to the growth rate of an economy, particularly an open economy, for the Government to attempt to plan the allocation of resources available to the private sector and to frustrate the operation of market forces," although he stated that the description of Hong Kong as a laissez-faire society was "frequent but inadequate".
_	In his review of the 2010 Goodspeed production, Frank Rizzo of "Variety" described "Carnival" as being both a "bittersweet tuner that touches on sadness, desperation and remoteness" and "an entertainment...that features magic, puppetry and aerial work as well as a luxurious score ..."Carnival" isn't a natural for wide crossover appeal, but this tasteful, multilayered production does re-enforce the view that it is still a gem to be valued."
_	Influenced by Thomas Kuhn’s "The Structure of Scientific Revolutions" (1962), Ritzer has long advocated the view that social theory is improved by systematic, comparative and reflexive attention to implicit conceptual structures and oft-hidden assumptions.
_	For instance, the Roman Catholic Church claims that title and considers the Eastern Orthodox Church to be in schism, while the Eastern Orthodox Church also claims that title and holds the view that the Catholic Church is schismatic.
_	Then-HKAOA president Captain Nigel Demery took the view that "the firing was pure intimidation, a union-bust straight up, designed to be random enough to put the fear in all pilots that they might be next, no reason given".
_	He also rejects “the instrumentalist view,” which sees technology simply as a “value-neutral tool” (10), and “the pluralist view” because it is basically the view that there can be no definitive “view” of technology to begin with.
_	Quakers traditionally took the view that all war is incompatible with the spirit and teachings of Christ.
_	Booker also identified similarities between the brothers and the family from "The Hills Have Eyes" (1977), expressing the view that the brothers represented "pure evil".
_	Their results support the view that toddlers' learning of words is contextually bound; that is, toddlers benefit from learning new words for substances in a context that they already associate with food.
_	In 1985's "Cleburne v. Cleburne Living Center", , Stevens argued against the Supreme Court's famous "strict scrutiny" doctrine for laws involving "suspect classifications", putting forth the view that all classifications should be evaluated on the basis of the "rational basis" test as to whether they could have been enacted by an "impartial legislature".
_	Childless women in the developed world often express the view that women ultimately have to make a choice between motherhood and having a career.
_	Local skepticism is the view that one cannot possess knowledge in some particular domain.
_	It contrasts with global skepticism (also known as absolute skepticism or universal skepticism), the view that one cannot know anything at all.
_	He has said that her dissents in the area of federal contracts "consistently reflect the view that a primary responsibility of the court is to serve 'the national policy of fairness to contractors'".
_	His perspective offers a deviation from the view that ascribed statuses are always fixed.
_	In hindsight, Stirrup took the view that the British forces would have been usefully employed in mentoring the Iraq Army to greater extent earlier in the campaign.
_	Futehally held the view that private enterprise could be conservation and welfare-oriented, a view which did not receive widespread support.
_	The absence of deep mtDNA divergence shows that Central Asian, Caucasian and European Neanderthals were not separated for a long time, supporting the view that Central Asia (most of the Russian plains) was relatively recently colonized by Neanderthals, maybe not before an exceptionally warm episode 125,000 years ago.
_	Also, in "R. v. Secretary of State for Foreign and Commonwealth Affairs, ex parte Everett" (1988), the Court of Appeal of England and Wales took the view that a decision by the Secretary of State exercised under the royal prerogative to deny a passport to a British citizen residing abroad raised a justiciable issue because it was not a high policy matter involving foreign affairs but "a matter of administrative decision, affecting the rights of individuals and their freedom of travel".
_	In 2016, Moody's Investors Service changed its outlook on the Cypriot banking system to positive from stable, reflecting the view that the recovery will restore banks to profitability and improve asset quality.
_	Cyril's language is not consistent and he may have countenanced the view that it is possible to contemplate in theory two natures after the incarnation, but the Church of Alexandria felt that the Definition should have stated that Christ be acknowledged "out of two natures" rather than "in two natures".
_	All eight of the judges dealing with the question of adverse inferences would appear to have concurred with the view that there may well be acceptable negative consequences which attach to remaining silent:
_	This gives the view that a grand jury could initiate investigations or file charges on its own.
_	In support of Stevenson, Almeder argued in "Death and Personal Survival" that Edwards had begged the question by stating in advance that the idea of consciousness existing without the brain in the interval between lives was incredible, and that Edwards's "dogmatic materialism" had forced him to the view that Stevenson's case studies must be examples of fraud or delusional thinking.
_	The Democratic-controlled state legislature has refused to implement it to date, taking the view that there would never be enough money to fund a tax cut.
_	A study of 29 fossil sites in Catalan Pyrenees of Europe in 2010 supports the view that dinosaurs there had great diversity until the asteroid impact, with more than 100 living species.
_	Singh has expressed the view that his confederation would like a dialogue with the Bainimarama Government instead of going on strike in opposition to the 5% pay cut for public sector employees.
_	Modern Chinese scholars now often take the view that Kang was an important advocate of Chinese socialism.
_	Crabb's MI6 officer John Nicholas Rede Elliott always took the view that Crabb had suffered equipment failure and/or his health had given way, and that his reputation had been unfairly dragged through the mud.
_	Though the Dönmeh had branched into several sects, all of them held the view that Zevi was the divine messiah and that he had revealed the true "spiritual Torah" which was superior to the practical earthly Torah.
_	Other advocates of the view that there is a distinction between negative and positive rights argue that the presence of a police force or army is not due to any positive right to these services that citizens claim, but rather because they are natural monopolies or public goods—features of any human society that arise naturally, even while adhering to the concept of negative rights only.
_	Demands for greater autonomy or full independence remain in certain regions, conflicting with the view that decentralisation has already gone far enough.
_	Pampaloni was interviewed by "The Guardian" newspaper in 2000 and expressed the view that the novel misrepresented the Greek partisan movement.
_	Le Bon developed the view that crowds are not the sum of their individual parts, proposing that within crowds there forms a new psychological entity, the characteristics of which are determined by the "racial unconscious" of the crowd.
_	The secular Pashtun leadership was also of the view that if joining India was not an option then they should espouse the cause of an independent ethnic Pashtun state rather than Pakistan.
_	In his lecture, he expressed the view that science has become separated from its humanistic origins and the humanities have lost their connection to metaphysical and theological concerns.
_	Robert Conquest held the view that the famine was not intentionally inflicted by Stalin, but "with resulting famine imminent, he could have prevented it, but put “Soviet interest” other than feeding the starving first—thus consciously abetting it".
_	Most Dog World columnists took the view that PDE, although sensationalist and damaging, had made some valid points.
_	A foundational story represents the view that the creation of the city is a human achievement.
_	The participants affirmed their support for international law, their opposition to all forms or racism (including anti-Semitism and Islamophobia), and pledged to counter the view that any criticism of Israel's government and military policies is automatically anti-Semitic.
_	In one of the essays published there, Tradem discussed the implications of the 1888 peasants' uprising in the Romanian Old Kingdom: he rejected the view that rebels had been manipulated by the political class, and argued that the real causes were fatigue and the threat of starvation.
_	He discusses the hermeneutics of the Council documents and defends the view that the documents are either novel, continuous, and reforming - but not discontinuous with previous doctrinal teachings.
_	Other views indicating antisemitism, according to the survey, include the view that Jews are more loyal to Israel than America, and that they are responsible for the death of Jesus of Nazareth.
_	Proponents of the view that Zenas was an expert in Jewish law have pointed to a number of facts, including other New Testament uses of the word, his association with Apollos (a Jewish convert to Christianity) and the use of the related word for "Law" (referring to the Law of Moses) earlier in the letter.
_	After the race Beaumont expressed the view that Jodami was likely to improve further before the following month's Gold Cup and identified The Fellow as his horse's principal rival.
_	Scholars attribute the play to Fletcher alone, since his characteristic pattern of stylistic and textual preferences is continuous throughout the text; but some critics favor the view that the extant text is a revision by Fletcher of an earlier play of his own authorship.
_	In short, one who takes the view that real numbers are (individually) effectively computable interprets Cantor's result as showing that the real numbers (collectively) are not recursively enumerable.
_	While there are various forms, epistemic conservatism is generally the view that a person's believing some claim is a reason in support of the claim, at least on the face of it.
_	Others formulate epistemic conservatism as the view that one is, to some degree, justified in believing something simply because one believes it.
_	He was of the view that country was facing several challenges however,added that the government would try its best to overcome these and help economic development.
_	Act empowers the Minister for Home Affairs, if satisfied that a person has been associated with activities of a criminal nature, to order that he or she be detained for a period not exceeding 12 months if the Minister is of the view that the detention is necessary in the interests of public safety, peace and good order.
_	His 2003 book "Information Theory and Evolution" set forth the view that the phenomenon of life, including its origin and evolution, that including human cultural evolution, has it background situated over thermodynamics, statistical mechanics, and information theory.
_	MGO's work is founded on the view that “U.S. leadership offers the prospect of renewed international order that can foster cooperation, manage competition and avoid conflict and crisis in the international system.
_	ThreatConnect supports the view that Anonymous Poland is a sockpuppet of Fancy Bear, noting the change from a historical focus on internal politics.
_	Mordechai Nisan, the Israeli Orientalist, also supports the view that Assyrians should be named specifically as such in an ethnic and national sense, are the descendants of their ancient namesakes, and denied self-expression for political, ethnic and religious reasons.
_	In "Antelopes: Global Survey And Regional Action Plans" (1990), Rod East stated the view that the long-term survival of Burkina Faso's antelope populations would depend on developing rational wildlife utilization schemes in areas such as Deux Balés, recognizing the importance of bushmeat, and that giving legal protection to the antelope there would achieve little without other improvements in management.
_	The historian Martin Ryan prefers the view that Æthelwulf freed a tenth part of land owned by laymen from secular obligations, who could now endow churches under their own patronage.
_	In the book and TV series, he surveyed western thinking about religion and charted a transition from traditional realist religion to the view that religion is simply a human creation.
_	Thompson (p. 127) takes the view that this distinction may or may not be fruitful, but what matters is that living systems involve autopoiesis and (if it is necessary to add this point) cognition as well.
_	They championed the view that the fundamental identity of the Church of England was Catholic rather than Protestant.
_	Mary Dewes, a concert attendee, expressed the view that he overworked them and required Elizabeth to perform songs which were too difficult for her age.
_	Among the few who did record the impact of Darwin's writings, the naturalist Joseph LeConte struggled with "distress and doubt" following the death of his daughter in 1861, before enthusiastically saying in the late 1870s there was "not a single philosophical question connected with our highest and dearest religious and spiritual interests that is fundamentally affected, or even put in any new light, by the theory of evolution", and in the late 1880s embracing the view that "evolution is entirely consistent with a rational theism."
_	In that work he argues for the view that we should interpret scripture solely on its own terms by carefully studying it, not with any concepts or doctrines that cannot themselves be derived from the text.
_	Hans-Wolfgang Strätz holds the view that the treaty makes the City of Constance de jure a municipality in Thurgau, with all the rights and obligations this entails, even if the City does not itself carry out some of the responsibilities.
_	Following the collapse of communism leading to Czechoslovakia and Poland joining NATO, and the dissolution of Czechoslovakia into the Czech Republic and Slovakia in 1993, North Korea believed the NNSC had lost its neutrality, and took the view that the NNSC had collapsed.
_	The Mr. Karsch mentioned above took the view that Käsweiler had arisen as long ago as pre-Germanic times.
_	And although it is difficult to determine statistically how much crime the death penalty actually deters, the Court found that in 1976 there was "no convincing empirical evidence" supporting either the view that the death penalty is an effective deterrent to crime or the opposite view.
_	Lutz was of the view that the emerging commodity and futures markets operated at the expense of farmers and the middle class and therefore called for a tax on such activity in order to decease its incidence.
_	Gerhard Rohlfs holds the view that this system is not the result of internal change, but of a later romanization ("neoromanizzazione") of Sicily after the breakdown of Byzantine domination.
_	Anton LaVey, founder of the Church of Satan, espoused the view that "god" is a creation of man, rather than man being a creation of "god".
_	The corporations have the view that they know what is best.
_	Kaup took the view that a German nation, all of whose citizens belonged to a "German race" in a populationist sense, offered a more convenient sociotechnical tool than Günther's concept of an ideal Nordic type to which only a very few Germans could belong.
_	He terms "Darwinian evolution" the type of evolution relying on all three of these factors, applies the label "Darwinists" to scientists who hold the view that Darwinian evolution is the only existing form of evolution, and who take exception to intelligent design as well as other theistic and non-theistic complexity theories.
_	In "R. (SB) v. Headteacher and Governors of Denbigh High School" (2006), the House of Lords expressed the view that whether an individual possesses certain human rights is not a relevant consideration during a public authority's decision-making process.
_	It rejects the view that healing is caused or influenced by positive confession, as found in Word of Faith teachings; nevertheless, given the somewhat decentralized nature of the fellowship, these teachings have influenced some congregations.
_	BMS is also of the view that for creating enough job opportunities, agricultural development should get more attention as also agro-based and small and tiny industries.
_	Buchanan expresses the view that just as Chamberlain's "guarantee" of Poland in March 1939 caused an "unnecessary war" with Germany in September, the current guarantees of Eastern European nations by the United States are equally unwise and require a declaration of war with Russia if a hostile regime ascended to power in the latter country and attacked Eastern Europe.
_	He put children in front of a simple plaster mountain range and then asked them to pick from four pictures the view that he, Piaget, would see.
_	In the following months she travelled as a TUC delegate to international conferences, in Bern and later in Washington DC, where she expressed the view that the peace terms being imposed on Germany were unjust.
_	With the legal entity for George Town being superseded by the merger of the local governments in 1974, the Malaysian federal government was of the view that George Town no longer existed as a city.
_	He found equally tenable the view that the public international legal order is supremely valid and the view that each national or state legal order is—for itself, in a kind of 'solipsism'—supremely valid.
_	Another noteworthy trait of pseudogapping (and one that supports the view that it is a type of VP-ellipsis) is that it absent from languages related to English.
_	Redstockings holds the view that all men oppress all women as a class and that it is the responsibility of individual men to give up male supremacy, rather than the responsibility of women to change themselves.
_	Since a company may deviate from the standard, this approach rejects the view that "one size fits all", but because of the requirement of disclosure of explanations to market investors, anticipates that if investors do not accept a company's explanations, then investors will sell their shares, hence creating a "market sanction", rather than a legal one.
_	They have supported the view that proponents of all faiths can, by doing good and virtuous deeds and by remembering the Lord, certainly achieve salvation.
_	An application of this view is the "sampling hypothesis," or the view that individual variation in children's causal and probabilistic inferences is an artifact of random sampling from a diverse set of hypotheses, and flexible generalizations based on sampling behavior and context.
_	There were those who supported the view that no professional should be captain; and significant opposition also came from a large number of members who argued that, if a professional were to be appointed, it should be Wilfred Rhodes rather than Sutcliffe.
_	Horowitz articulated the view that republication of previous publications in different formats is necessary in the social sciences to disseminate research results and make them useful to society.
_	However, in a 1993 review of Daniel Seligman's book "A Question of Intelligence" he wrote that "I find this book pernicious because its clear purpose is to infect readers with the view that both the established schools of behavioural psychology and human genetics consider it scientifically demonstrated that group differences in black-white IQs are largely genetic in origin.
_	Some Saudi Arabian locals have expressed the view that these attacks may be the Houthis exerting pressure on the Saudi Arabian government to end the war.
_	Mussolini took the view that a weak lira would look bad for the country when presenting Italy as a great power across Europe and the United States.
_	Fenby's initial failure to pick up the tune led Delius to the view that "[the] boy is no good ... he cannot even take down a simple melody".
_	As Mansfield writes regarding the need for personal laws in India, "The spectacle of large political entities in different parts of the world collapsing and giving place to smaller entities based on ethnicity, religion or language or combinations of these factors, rather than strengthening the idea that a powerfully centralised, culturally homogenous nation is essential for order and prosperity, may have confirmed for some the view that the pressing task for India is not to increase central power and cultural homogeneity, but to find an alternative to the 'nation-state' model, an alternative that will sustain unity through some form of 'pluralism'."
_	The epigraphist, T.N. Subramaniam, had been of the view that Kanthalur Salai must have functioned autonomously, without any royal control.
_	Paul Winfield's character Keys, who believes he can help the dog unlearn this behavior, represents the view that racism can be unlearned.
_	Keys's counterpart, Carruthers, a white trainer, believes the dog is irredeemable and should be killed, representing the view that racism cannot be cured.
_	A multinational public-opinion study that was carried out by the American Jewish Committee in March – April 2005 (Thinking about the Holocaust 60 Years Later) shows how the view that Jews exert “too much influence” on world events is more prevalent in Poland, Austria and Germany than in Sweden, but also indicates that Swedes agree with this statement to a similar extent as Americans and the British.
_	He questions the view that the point of eating is to promote health, pointing out that this attitude is not universal and that cultures that perceive food as having purposes of pleasure, identity, and sociality may end up with better health.
_	After the suppression of the Catilinarian conspiracy, Cotta proposed a public thanksgiving for Cicero's services, and after the latter had gone into exile, supported the view that there was no need of a law for his recall, since the law of Clodius was legally worthless.
_	Some Rastafari maintain the view that a white racist patriarchy ("Babylon") controls the world in order to oppress black people.
_	He criticized the view that socialism had to come after Arab unity, stating "Socialism, freedom and unity are not different names for different things, ... but different facets of one basic law from which they spring."
_	They believed that cross-cultural understanding and communication could be facilitated by analyzing a given culture's orientation to five key aspects of human life: Human Nature (people seen as intrinsically good, evil, or mixed); Man-Nature Relationship (the view that humans should be subordinate to nature, dominant over nature, or live in harmony with nature); Time (primary value placed on past/tradition, present/enjoyment, or future/posterity/delayed gratification); Activity (being, becoming/inner development, or doing/striving/industriousness); and Social Relations (hierarchical, collateral/collective-egalitarian, or individualistic).
_	In Serbian historiography there is a divergence of positions regarding Byzantine cultural influence on Serbia with some Serbian historians supporting the view that there was and others seeing it as being minimal.
_	Likewise, James McDonald has expressed the view that extreme groups undermined serious scientific investigation, stating that a "bizarre 'literature' of pseudo-scientific discussion" on "spaceships bringing messengers of terrestrial salvation and occult truth" had been "one of the prime factors in discouraging serious scientists from looking into the UFO matter to the extent that might have led them to recognize quickly enough that cultism and wishful thinking have nothing to do with the core of the UFO problem."
_	Certain groups and organisations are of the view that the new power plant would mean the continuation of traditional coal-based electricity production.
_	Antonin Artaud took the view that illusion was not distinct from reality, advocating that spectators at a play should suspend disbelief and regard the drama on stage as reality.
_	The Court's decision articulated the view that the freedom of the individual must sometimes be subordinated to the common welfare and is subject to the police power of the state.
_	Others have taken the view that the first was Roy Brown's "Good Rocking Tonight", or Wynonie Harris' 1948 version; the song received greater exposure when Elvis Presley covered it in 1954.
_	The Manchu Qianlong Emperor rejected the views of Han officials who said Xinjiang was not part of China and that he should not conquer it, putting forth the view that China was multi-ethnic and did not just refer to Han.
_	In independent India, Macaulay's idea of the civilising mission has been used by Dalitists, in particular by neoliberalist Chandra Bhan Prasad, as a "creative appropriation for self-empowerment", based on the view that Dalit folk are empowered by Macaulay's deprecation of Hindu civilisation and an English education.
_	Following the victory of the England cricket team in the 2013 Ashes series, Carnehan released a version of "That's in Queensland" called "That's in England" to parody the view that England were selecting players not born in England with references to players born in Pietermaritzburg, Londonderry, and Harare.
_	Solly Skosana of the PAC reiterated the view that land apartheid had not disappeared and that a constituent assembly was the only mechanism in which environmental concerns over land distribution would be able to be addressed.
_	Noël Denholm-Young put forward the view that Walwayn was the author of the anonymous chronicle "Vita Edwardi Secundi" ("Life of Edward II"), a contemporaneous account of the reign of Edward II which ends abruptly in 1326 shortly before Edward's deposition.
_	Most mainstream media outlets have taken the view that the Sharon visit was the spark that triggered the rioting at the start of the Second Intifada.
_	She put forward the view that Britain had made a mistake in delaying its entry into the EEC for so long.
_	A 2017 Gallup creationism survey found that 38% of adults in the United States inclined to the view that "God created humans in their present form at one time within the last 10,000 years" when asked for their views on the origin and development of human beings, which was noted as being at the lowest level in 35 years.
_	Others scholars advocate the view that the word derives from German ' "feather" or "Fittich" "wings".
_	Wilhelm Fröhner, the Conservator of the Louvre, stated in 1878 that style of the statue was attributable to the Carolingian period rather than the Etruscan, and in 1885 Wilhelm von Bode also stated that he was of the view that the statue was most likely a medieval work.
_	In 1960 the Conservative government decided against a further monument, taking the view that the credit should be shared more broadly than Fighter Command alone, and there was little public appetite for one.
_	He took the view that it was insufficient to merely impose restrictions but that a programme of advertising to support it was also required.
_	The new "vali", a subscriber to the view that a nascent Armenian "rebellion" was under way in Van, was unable to travel there until late March, when he arrived "accompanied by several thousand soldiers and Kurdish and Circassian irregulars".
_	The second definition identified by Yoder was the view that folk religion represented the mixture of an official religion with forms of ethnic religion; this was employed to explain the place of folk religion in the syncretic belief systems of the Americas, where Christianity had blended with the religions of indigenous American and African communities.
_	By this point the FI was united around the view that the Eastern European "buffer states" were still capitalist countries.
_	In the writings of Benito Mussolini, he expressed the view that fascism offers "free" speech, but only to persons who were "qualified" to have an opinion.
_	The Labour Government also took the view that these powers were inconsistent with the European Convention on Human Rights.
_	Mozart biographer Maynard Solomon (1995) takes the view that the tours were lucrative and produced long-term profits for Leopold; Ruth Halliwell (1998) states to the contrary that their income generally only covered their travel and living expenses.
_	It is also reported that the Fraternitas Saturni holds the view that:
_	The Legislative Council of Hong Kong is of the view that the Government should introduce measures to help the sandwich class purchase their own flats, regarding the high property price.
_	In jurisprudence, natural law theory refers generally to the view that links law to morality and proposes that just laws are immanent in nature and independent of the lawgiver, waiting to be discovered or found (as opposed to created by humans), usually by means of reason alone.
_	The law takes the view that good faith must not only be done, but must be manifestly seen to be done, and zealously patrols the conduct of directors in this regard; and will not allow directors to escape liability by asserting that his decision was in fact well founded.
_	White Baptists expressed the view that:
_	This is according to the view that Ijtihad or the ability of legal deduction can be achieved in specified areas, and does not require a holistic grasp of the Shariah and its entailing Laws and legal theory.
_	Although some scholars are of the view that the Brahmi Script arrived with the Buddhism, Mahavamsa (Great Chronicle) speaks of written language even right after the arrival of Vijaya.
_	A molecular phylogenetic study in 2000 based on nuclear ribosomal ITS sequences confirmed the view that the "New World" (American) and "Old World" (African and Eurasian) species of "Lotus" did not belong in the same genus.
_	These findings provide support for the view that there are at least some universal facial expressions of emotion.
_	Their purpose has been the subject of varying interpretations; researchers have speculated that they might have been fishing weights or have some other utilitarian purpose, but ethnographic research has tended towards the view that they have shamanistic or other ritual use.
_	His method focuses on body attention based on the view that life is experienced by the body - people's thoughts, actions, feelings and sensations are all expressed in and through the body.
_	South Australian coroners have jurisdiction to hold inquests concerning the cause of any fire in the state if the State Coroner or the South Australian Attorney General is of the view that an inquest should be held.
_	He is of the view that “Big Market, Small Government” is a more accurate description of the way Hong Kong operates.
_	However, Hyōgo Prefecture was of the view that the policing of the settlement fell under the jurisdiction of its prefectural police force.
_	Europeans justified it with the view that natives were not Christian, particularly after witnessing the mass human sacrifices conducted by the Aztecs and the lack of traditional (European) civilization made natives seem savage and not deserving to possess the New World.
_	Christian Identity believers reject the doctrines of most contemporary Christian denominations and they believe that the doctrine which advocates the view that God's promises to Israel (through Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob) have been expanded to create a spiritual people of "Israel", i.e., the Christian Church, is heresy.
_	He holds the view that "girls should not be educated, women should not work unless accompanied by mahrams and 'honour' killing is a religiously-sanctioned practice", and has threatened that women working for NGOs who enter Kohistan will be forcibly married.
_	The Politics of Mental Health sets out a detailed critique of positivism (the view that epistemology, or knowledge about the world is best served by empiricism and the scientific method rather than metaphysics).
_	A common theme running through Laingian antipsychiatry, Ingleby’s critical psychiatry, contemporary critical psychiatry and postpsychiatry is the view that social, political and cultural realities play a vital role in helping us to understand the suffering and experience of madness.
_	Similarly, supporters of Aramaic primacy—of the view that the Christian New Testament or its sources were originally written in the Aramaic language—seek to prove their case by showing that difficult passages in the existing Greek text of the New Testament make much better sense when back-translated to Aramaic: that, for example, some incomprehensible references are in fact Aramaic puns that do not work in Greek.
_	Stone was already attacking J. Edgar Hoover frequently in 1943, and the FBI was of the view that "Stone is known to the bureau because of his hostile editorial comments made against the FBI as early as 1936."
_	Oldfield took the view that participation in deliberation and legislation was an inherent ancient right.
_	Most linguists now reject the view that the Coahuiltecan peoples of southern Texas and adjacent Mexico spoke a single or related languages.
_	Those who argue that Howard, earning PhD at the University of Minnesota in 1934, is the first African-American woman to earn a PhD, hold the view that a psychologist is someone who earned the degree within a psychology department.
_	Welch adheres to the view that it is not enough to merely reform the armed forces, police and justice sector.
_	The National Park Service takes the view that "Glacier Bay National Park is the spiritual homeland of the Huna Tlingit, and Glacier Bay National Preserve is the homeland of the Ghunaaxhoo Kwaan unit of the Yakutat Tlingit Tribe".
_	The most common form of abuse is the view that since all illness is directly or indirectly attributable to the devil and his works, and since Christ by his cross has defeated the devil, and by his Spirit has given us the power to overcome him, healing is the inheritance right of all true Christians who call upon the Lord with genuine faith."
_	In his 1988 book "The Collapse of Complex Societies", American anthropologist Tainter presents the view that for given technological levels there are implicit declining returns to complexity, in which systems deplete their resource base beyond levels that are ultimately sustainable.
_	Some have taken the view that such penalties are unconstitutional.
_	In the context of organizational behavior, following the view that a cohesive group is more than the sum of its parts, synergy is the ability of a group to outperform even its best individual member.
_	The Court took the view that "the appellant's interpretation of the pledge and anthem ceremony as a religious ceremony was a distortion of secular fact into religious belief".
_	However, in Mabior the Supreme Court rejected the view that consent will always be vitiated by non-disclosure of HIV-positive status, substituting the rule that there will be no consent only if in addition to the non-disclosure there was a realistic possibility of transmission of HIV.
_	The Dominicans for whom van Vlierden made the confessionals in Maastricht also subscribed to the view that the confessionals should clarify the deeper meaning of the confession to the faithful.
_	The essence of atheism for Cudworth was the view that matter was self-active and self-sufficient, whereas for Cudworth the plastic power was unsentient and under the direct control of the universal Mind or "Logos".
_	Early race theorists generally held the view that some races were inferior to others and they consequently believed that the differential treatment of races was fully justified.
_	There is also the view that the Urartians and Hurrians formed a separate linguistic branch from the Nakh, equal to it (but maybe or maybe not closer to Nakh than other branches).
_	For Davidson, this experience validates the view that Keynesian policy has the power to deliver full employment and prosperity for a government's entire labor force.
_	In addition, since the Court was of the view that the judicial process was not suitable for determining issues involving national security, it did not think that Parliament could have intended for a court of law to determine whether, on the evidence, a detainee was likely to pose a security risk.
_	The deal was not subject to a competition inquiry due to the precedent of Tesco's T&S Stores acquisition; The Office of Fair Trading took the view that the convenience sector was distinct from the supermarket sector.
_	Unique to Theravada Buddhism is the view that the Buddha is not a god to be worshiped, but rather a teacher to be followed.
_	They also challenged the view that the priority should be reducing the deficit: "Making deficit reduction the first target, without addressing the chronic underlying deficiency of demand, is exactly the error of the 1930s."
_	It also paid tribute to the then King of Cambodia Norodom Sihanouk for his leadership of the Supreme National Council and to the number of Cambodians who exercised their vote, further endorsing the view that the elections were free and fair.
_	P. J. Marshall shows that recent scholarship has reinterpreted the view that the prosperity of the formerly benign Mughal rule gave way to poverty and anarchy.
_	Rajwade reject the Sisodia origin by citing the temple inscription of Math, dated to 1397 A.D and holds the view that the genealogy was forged by Shivaji's men.
_	While Palestrina sympathized with many of the Council's decisions, and, like Vincenzo Ruffo, sought deliberately to compose in a simplified, easily understood style to please church officials, there is no evidence to support either the view that the Council sought to banish polyphony entirely or that Palestrina's mass was the deciding factor in changing their minds.
_	While in office, Denison formed the view that the public needed a plain, but complete and accurate, explanatory commentary on the Bible, and consulted some of the bishops as to the best way of supplying the work.
_	Experts have expressed the view that Real del Sarte had been inspired by the statue of Joan of Arc sculpted by Paul Dardé for Montpellier in 1918.
_	The early 17th century scholar and theologian Gerardus Vossius therefore explains that the word originally designated an office, and he affirms the view that it was derived from "eunē" and "ekhein" (i.e. "bed-keeper").
_	Daniel J. Harrington expresses the view that due to the scarcity of ancient records, a number of issues regarding the historicity of some nativity episodes can never be fully determined, and that the more important task is deciding what the nativity narratives meant to the early Christian communities.
_	"IGN"s Lucy O'Brien felt the decision to allocate powers and story details between the two player characters was "smart", echoing the view that the characters' abilities were "excellently" adaptable to both play styles.
_	While Richier still maintained the view that women should not be given the vote before they no longer favored the Catholic church so much that women suffrage would result in a backlash of a progressive development of society, Maria Deraismes, who previously shared this view, took the stand that women should be given the vote in order to be more progressive than their present state allowed, rather than the other way around.
_	So experiments with electrons add confirmatory evidence to the view that electrons, protons, neutrons, and even larger entities that are ordinarily called particles nevertheless have their own wave nature and even a wavelength (related to their momentum).
_	Late 19th century linguists took the view that the name "Eelam" was derived from the Pali (An Indo-Aryan language) form "Sihala" for Sri Lanka.
_	The novel was a favorite of 20th century language reformers, who used it to support the view that "wényán" was a form of snobbery.
_	Romanian media was alone among Warsaw Pact countries to report Chinese criticism of the Soviet leadership from its source; in return, Maoist officials complimented Romanian nationalism by supporting the view that Bessarabia had been a traditional victim of Russian imperialism.
_	Youssef always maintained the view that it was critical that a government nominated by the Sultan of Egypt lead the country rather than have the British fully annex it (especially as the victorious powers were carving up the old Ottoman Empire at the Versailles conference).
_	Eric Croddy, assessing the Protocol in 2005, took the view that the historic record showed it had been largely ineffectual.
_	Further excavations at Aktha and Ramnagar, two sites in the vicinity of the city, unearthed artefacts dating back to 1800 BCE, supporting the view that the area was inhabited by this time.
_	Peirce elsewhere argues (1897) that logic's presupposition of fallibilism leads at length to the view that chance and continuity are very real (tychism and synechism).
_	The modernists took the view that with its iron monopoly the state could effectively distribute tools of good quality for the use of the peasant, as well as stabilizing the price of many essential goods.
_	In response to the view that the Directory outlines a dull, unimaginative service, one must not underestimate the verbal imagery of the Puritan service based on the Bible.
_	The ASI took the view that the market was "more genuinely democratic than the public sector, involving the decisions of far more individuals and at much more frequent intervals".
_	Art historians have gradually abandoned the view that the artist should be identified with the painter who signed as 'Lorenzo pentor di S Marina' in 1379.
_	Denise Balkissoon, writing in "The Globe and Mail", disagreed with and criticized the view that 2014 marked a "watershed" moment and that "some collective 'we' has finally had enough", citing her ongoing concerns regarding a "broken system" with respect to violence against women.
_	In his book The Ultimate Resource Julian Simon offers the view that scarcity of physical resources can be overcome by the human mind.
_	Although he does not seem to have employed the term, Halliday's religious philosophy can be described as one of Panentheism (pan-en-theism, all-within-god), the view that the universe is within God and that God also transcends the universe.
_	In the same poll, 22.9% of those polled fully or partially agreed with the view that the famine was caused by natural circumstances, but 50.5% disagreed with that.
_	Dupuis were the first modern writers to advocate the Christ myth theory, the view that Jesus had no historical existence.
_	Of the Upper Ungarn chamber, the view that undermines the right of the king's salt monopoly, the king sent two commissioners and Andreas Kraiser and Joseph Milaver, from Hallstadt.
_	The King had a long and frank talk with Paul Barillon, the French ambassador, in which he made it clear that he did not believe that there was a word of truth in the plot, and that Oates was "a wicked man"; but that by now he had come round to the view that there must be an investigation, particularly with Parliament about to reassemble.
_	Justice White also dissented with respect to the American Independent Party, expressing the view that neither the due process clause nor the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment prohibited Ohio from requiring that the appointment of presidential electors be carried out through the political party process, and concurred in No. 544 insofar as the Socialist Party was denied relief in the Supreme Court.
_	Nagel, responding to the philosopher Adolf Grünbaum in "The New York Review of Books", endorsed the contributions by Davidson and Hopkins, crediting them with thoroughly developing the view that "psychoanalysis can borrow empirical evidence for its most important general foundations from the ubiquitous confirmation of the system of ordinary psychological explanation in everyday life".
_	Schleicher took the view that the 1928 election demonstrated the chief problem with democracy, namely that it allowed people to elect politicians who carried out policies that could be detrimental to the military, such as cancelling the construction of "pocket battleships".
_	He also rejects the view that the human body needs fulfillment of the sexual instinct for the sake of one's mental or physical health, or for the harmony of one’s personality.
_	Although the latter was one of the last great works in the tradition, Mill's view that the foundations of logic lie in introspection influenced the view that logic is best understood as a branch of psychology, a view which dominated the next fifty years of its development, especially in Germany.
_	He has expressed the view that tougher restrictions for greenhouse gas emissions may, if done properly, actually have a positive macroeconomic effect: "There is some evidence that harder greenhouse-gas targets and regulation may actually increase benefits through improved innovation and distribution of low-carbon technologies, and increased revenues from taxes or permits.
_	Hermann Gauch, Heinrich Himmler's adjutant for culture, took the view that Charlemagne (known in German as "Karl der Große" 'Karl the Great') should be officially renamed "Karl the Slaughterer" because of the massacre.
_	Afterwards, Abbess Alexa Kovacs has taken the view that General Kilian Qatar is a traitor to Kane, and plans to have her discredited by attacking Temple Prime in her guise, then leaking Ion Disruptor technology to GDI, thereby leading to General Qatar's execution being ordered by Kane.
_	During the 20th century, the view that assertions and norms are valid insofar as they respond to principles independent of all local and temporal contexts came under attack from two perspectives: the partiality of translation and the intersubjective constitution of the self.
_	This is a manifest contradiction because infinity cannot, by definition, be completed by "successive synthesis"—yet just such a finalizing synthesis would be required by the view that time is infinite; so the thesis is proven.
_	The production left John Simon of "New York Magazine" with the view that "Stoppard overdoes it…"Arcadia" makes better reading than seeing".
_	It addresses the contrast between the view that elections are a mechanism to hold government accountable and the view that they are a means to ensure that citizens’ views and interests are properly represented in the democratic process.
_	However, senior members of the party disagreed with this stance and were of the view that Moro had been drugged and tortured to utter these words.
_	The film's acting inspired a wide range of critical opinion, although the view that Asia Argento is one of the most appealing aspects of "Boarding Gate" is nearly universal.
_	Harvard Business School professor Noel Maurer disagreed with the view that Russo-Georgian War had a substantial negative impact on Russian financial markets: "Russian indices were in decline well before the war started.
_	This movement is posited on the view that there is a fecund interplay between the methods and language of analytic philosophy, and the aspirations of pragmatism.
_	Watson took the view that it is not an obvious description of anywhere on the rocky coast of Eileach an Naoimh and that Hinba must therefore have been elsewhere.
_	Martin also argues that a non-objective account of ethics might be acceptable and challenges the view that a subjective account of morality would lead to moral anarchy.
_	The book described how the Tet Offensive undermined the support within the government and the country for the strategy of aerial bombardment and ground search-and-destroy missions, fostering instead the view that further escalation of the war was futile.
_	The riot at Sir George Williams University spurred-through it did not start-a wave of "black power" activism in Canada with many blacks taking the view that the police response was disproportionate and unjustifiably violent while many white Canadians who had believed that their country had no racism were shocked by a race riot in Canada.
_	This corresponds to the view that gamelan music is heterophonic: the "balungan" is then the melody which is being elaborated.
_	Using rigorous statistics, the authors concluded that the view that slavery would have disappeared without the American Civil War was "a romantic hypothesis which will not stand against the facts."
_	The movement propagates the view that Muslims are not a nation (the opposite of the concept behind the creation of Afghanistan) and that ethnic loyalty must surpass religious loyalty, though this view has been challenged by both the 1890 independence of Hazaristan and the discrimination many Hazara people have historically faced within Afghanistan.
_	On the other hand, in 1999 the Court of Appeal attempted to draw a line between religious practices and secular facts, taking the view that singing the National Anthem and saying the National Pledge were the latter.
_	It expresses the view that the current Aeonic civilization is that of the Western, but claims that the evolution of this society is threatened by the "Magian/Nazarene" influence of Judeo-Christian religion, which the Order seeks to combat in order to establish a militaristic new social order, termed the "Imperium".
_	A 1928 medical study supported the view that Hauser accidentally stabbed himself too deeply, while a 2005 forensic analysis argued that it seems "unlikely that the stab to the chest was inflicted exclusively for the purpose of self-damage, but both a suicidal stab and a homicidal act (assassination) cannot be definitely ruled out."
_	An information plaque on board the USS "Missouri" in December 2011 advocates the view that the pilot was probably Ishino.
_	Yet most scholars reject the view that Jonson is the author of the 1602 additions.
_	On 20 November 2008, the United Centre leader Ihor Kril said the party will participate independently in the next parliamentary elections and that he "fully support the view that the format of Our Ukraine-People's Self-Defense Bloc, as it exists now, is not realistic or effective.
_	Lutosławski himself did not hold the view that such influences had a direct effect on his music, although he acknowledged that they impinged on his creative world to some degree.
_	Policy makers in the power sector, with an eye to meeting the government's official investment targets, are often inclined to the view that at least some of the risks should be borne by the Indonesian Government through the national budget managed by the Ministry of Finance.
_	Most contemporary genome-wide association studies take the view that the problem of population stratification is
_	In 1957, Huxley coined the term "transhumanism" for the view that humans should better themselves through science and technology, possibly including eugenics, but also, importantly, the improvement of the social environment.
_	After this, Innocent III called for a crusade against the Albigensians, with the view that ridding Europe of heresy could better defend its borders against invading Muslims.
_	The demonetization exercise had mixed views from economists, with a majority (including Rajan) subscribing to the view that the short term pains inflicted would not justify any purported longer term gains.
_	With that said, Dr Rajan himself is of the view that the data available currently is not fully substantive to determine if the program could be deemed a success.
_	The Supreme Court has expressly recognized the view that the EPA must be broadly construed to achieve Congress’ goal of remedying sexual discrimination.
_	They later resiled from this position and in 1698 the British government took the view that the territory was a British possession (see generally: History of the British Virgin Islands).
_	Treasury took the view that the Aramac Shire should use the tramway sale money to repay the Queensland Government's contribution to the Fund.
_	In terms of theology, Ramanujacharya puts forth the view that both the Supreme Goddess Lakshmi and Supreme God Narayana together constitute Brahman - the Absolute.
_	The board did not share the view that the dock worths nothing.
_	What I tried to leave my students with is the view that the invisible hand is more powerful than the [un]hidden hand.
_	Micah Clarke himself becomes increasingly disillusioned with religious extremism and ultimately expresses the view that toleration is a great good.
_	The Christ myth theory (also known as the Jesus myth theory, Jesus mythicism, or Jesus ahistoricity theory) is "the view that the person known as Jesus of Nazareth had no historical existence."
_	The tribunal took the view that this ensured that members were drawn from a wide pool of qualified applicants.
_	He rejected the view that religion should focus on humanity rather than God, or that biblical teaching could be used selectively.
_	Fred Eckhardt in "A Treatise on Lager Beers", published in 1969, set out the view that Dortmunder is a distinctive enough pale lager to be classed as a separate beer style.
_	Before anything else, the Commissioner registered his view that, "the general idea of the use of such an instrument of warfare as the "Tank" was converted into a practical shape ... was primarily due to the receptivity, courage, and driving force of Mr. Winston Churchill"; and, as well, that it should be placed on record that Churchill had made no claim, because "Mr. Churchill has very properly taken the view that all his thought and time belonged to the State, and that he was not entitled to make any claim for an award, even had he wished to do so".
_	And in "Cutter", he wrote: "The text and history of the Clause may well support the view that the Clause is not incorporated against the States precisely because the Clause shielded state establishments from congressional interference."
_	The slogan helped combat the view that it was sinful for Muslims to vote against Islamic parties.
_	Scientific realism is, at the most general level, the view that the world described by science is the real world, as it is, independent of what we might take it to be.
_	As discussed in the history section below, the "Washington Consensus" period saw a swing of opinion towards the view that there is no need to worry about imbalances.
_	Mainstream opinion expressed by the leading financial press and economists, international bodies like the IMF – as well as leaders of surplus and deficit countries – has returned to the view that large current account imbalances do matter.
_	Herdman appears to have been acting on behalf of Craigavon, but when de Valera rebuffed him, he was of the view that:
_	Some Roman Catholic writers, in particular G. Philips and A.N. Williams, deny that Palamas regarded the distinction between the Essence and Energies of God as a real distinction, and Orthodox theologian David Bentley Hart also indicated his hesitancy to accept the view that for Palamas it was, in the full scholastic sense, a real distinction, rather than a formal distinction in the Scotist sense.
_	Re-elected as an Anti-Socialist in 1906, Walker expressed the view that the three-party system of the Australian Parliament's first decade was dysfunctional, and implored electors to vote "for either socialism or anti-socialism, and so end this triangular government".
_	Her remarks were attacked by the then AMA president and soon-to-be Liberal MP for the neighbouring seat of Bradfield, Brendan Nelson, who said that: "Mrs Bishop has a lot to learn about health...there are now more than 50,000 pieces of medical research and literature supporting the view that smoking is injurious to humans."
_	He particularly singled out Feduccia's adoption of the view that some theropod taxa are actually birds that have been mistaken for theropods through convergence associated with flight loss and secondary adoption of cursoriality.
_	Al Suwaidi is of the view that the condition of women in Emirates is the best in the Gulf region.
_	He held the view that behavioral changes can be important for evolution.
_	This is the view that the mind has access to external reality via copies of that reality that the mind receives from the object.
_	Geertz held the view that mere explanations to describe religions and cultures are not sufficient: interpretations are needed too.
_	Some of his relatives were of the opinion that he received spiritual initiation from his own father while his younger sister, Janaki Devi, was of the view that Swami Baalak Kaw was his spiritual master.
_	Labeo supported the view that the Roman goddess Maia was the Earth "(Terra)", named for her great size "(magnitudine)", to be identified with the Great Mother (Magna Mater) and the Good Goddess (Bona Dea), to whom a temple was dedicated on the Kalends of May.
_	Gandhi refused to endorse the view that economic forces are best understood as "antagonistic class interests".
_	For more than 40 years, Paul Ekman has supported the view that emotions are discrete, measurable, and physiologically distinct.
_	The leadership of 800 Squadron had experienced difficulties with the Blue Fox radar and took the view that it was useless, discounting Ward's claims that the equipment performed better than Ferranti had predicted.
_	Ross expressed the view that the responsibility is on the reporter to verify their authenticity.
_	Blackburn conveys anti-realism as the view that statements which express moral properties are our construction, and realism as the view that moral properties somehow exist independent of us, the moral agents.
_	They further condemn his methods and, by association, the validity of technological determinism: "Had Mr. White been prepared to accept the view that the English and Norman methods of fighting were not so very different in the eleventh century, he would have made the weakness of his argument less obvious, but the fundamental failure would remain: the stirrup cannot alone explain the changes it made possible (Sawyer and Hilton, 91)."
_	At an early date (1986), Ložek supported the view that "Pupilla loessica" was alive at the present time in Central Asia.
_	Andrews expressed the view that the U.S. states, not the federal government, inherited from Great Britain the sole power to extinguish aboriginal title:
_	This highlights their similarity in the view that gender-related identity is socially constructed.
_	He thus accepts "conceptual relativity" – the view that it may be a matter of choice or convention, e.g., whether mereological sums exist, or whether space-time points are individuals or mere limits.
_	In these articles he reiterates the view that evolution violates the second law of thermodynamics.
_	Such attitudes are summarized in the popular statement, "Perception is reality" or "Life is how you perceive reality" or "reality is what you can get away with" (Robert Anton Wilson), and they indicate anti-realism – that is, the view that there is no objective reality, whether acknowledged explicitly or not.
_	This legislation is based on the view that a woman could change her mind about an abortion once she witnesses the development of the unborn child through the latest technology.
_	Reductive physicalism is the view that mental states are both nothing over and above physical states and reducible to physical states.
_	He supports the view that even a relatively small state, in terms of economic power, can take advantage of the changes that occur in a global context and increase its capacities to allow it to exercise an autonomous foreign policy according to the national interest.
_	Supporting the view that the world has already begun to move towards multipolarity, Kotzias believes that states that wish to increase their influence and capacities should seek to forge concrete relations with the emerging powers (BRICS).
_	White preachers in Alabama after Reconstruction expressed the view that:
_	In Rome he continued the view that revelation, meaning God communicates with us, is always more than can be expressed in purely human words.
_	Carol Gilligan was an early proponent of the view that interdependence, rather than rules, underlay the basis of morality.
_	During the "Goldhagen Controversy" of 1996, Kershaw took the view that his friend, Hans Mommsen, had "destroyed" Daniel Goldhagen's arguments about a culture of "eliminationist antisemitism" in Germany during their frequent debates on German TV.
_	In addition to stressing the apostolic role of a bishop as one sent to preach the gospel, this innovation was premised on the view that the presence of a bishop meant that the Church itself was present and that a bishop in such circumstances had authority to “grow the church” from that simple fact of presence.
_	Other subspecies are also sometimes elevated to species status, but Turner and Rose take the view that all the races of the black rough-winged swallow are, at best, incipient species.
_	Yemeni preacher Muqbil bin Hadi al-Wadi'i was one of Ibn Hazm's admirers in recent times, holding the view that no other Muslim scholar had embodied the prophetic tradition of the Muhammad and the Sahaba.
_	Another version of the fight presents the view that Davidson and his troops were not ambushed, but rather were taunted by the Apaches into attacking a superior force, one that also employed superior tactics.
_	Even so, it was defeated through majority opposition of the Progressive Conservatives, many of whom expressed the view that the bill would add nothing meaningful that did not already exist under the existing regulatory framework, while, in the words of PC MLA Dave Rodney, "effectively bring<nowiki>[ing]</nowiki> the decision-
_	Anderson holds the view that history contributes to the evolution of the artist.
_	Officially, the AG rejects the view that healing is caused or influenced by "positive confession", a belief found in prosperity theology and Word of Faith teachings.
_	Older research reflects the view that standing water in GTRs permanently damages trees and acorn production.
_	He was of the view that the lower courts wrongly gave more emphasis on the fact on explosion; to Lord Guest it was a non-essential element.
_	Meeting the French prophets in 1713, Whiston developed the view that the charismatic gift of revelation could be demonic possession.
_	Admiral Montt took the view that it was politic and just to let bygones be bygones, and he acted conscientiously by this principle in all administrative measures in connection with the supporters of the late President Balmaceda.
_	In 2007 Yvette Lont, a CU municipal council member for Amsterdam, expressed the view that homosexuals should not be admitted to representative functions within the party.
_	As far as the New Testament writings are concerned, there is evidence, aided and increased by recent discoveries, for the view that the Peshitta represents a revision, and fresh investigation in the field of Syriac scholarship has raised it to a high degree of probability.
_	These findings support the view that support for Israel in the US is bipartisan.
_	However, these authors took the view that increasingly sophisticated technology had extended the potential reach of medicalization as a form of social control, especially in terms of "psychotechnology" (Chorover,1973).
_	One commentator has expressed the view that certain features of the MRHA remove any transparency over the Council's proceedings, making it impossible to discover if it has been performing its duties satisfactorily and to hold them accountable for any lack of conscientiousness.
_	However, the rediscovery in the 18th century of other letters by Vespucci has led to the view that the early published accounts, notably the Soderini Letter, could be fabrications, not by Vespucci, but by others.
_	It expressed the view that "it would be in the interest of justice that the court should have the power to correct the mistake, rather than rely on the Executive to correct what is essentially an error in the judicial process", and that it is "reasonable to assume that the court is better placed to evaluate the merits of the new evidence than the Executive".
_	Ahmad had separately advocated the view that Jesus did not die by crucifixion, but travelled to the Indian subcontinent and died there at age 120.
_	The Admiralty maintained the view that screw propulsion would be ineffective in ocean-going service, while Symonds himself believed that screw propelled ships could not be steered efficiently.
_	The notion of "religious experience" was used by Schleiermacher and Albert Ritschl to defend religion against the growing scientific and secular critique, and defend the view that human (moral and religious) experience justifies religious beliefs.
_	He was one of the first to put forth the view that it was crucial to consider the poor as consumers when making policy for development, because their quality of life is more directly linked to their consumption activities rather than their income or productivity.
_	Johnson was a proponent of the view that "the essence of true religion is morality", and believed that "the problem of denominationalism" could be solved by teaching a non-denominational common moral philosophy acceptable to all religions.
_	In 1975 Collins voiced to Maynard Smith the view that natural selection could not drive evolution because it always acted to reduce variation in favour of an optimum type for any environment, whereas the central story of evolution was that of increasing variation and complexity.
_	The Oxford Dictionary of National Biography notes that Adamson feared a French invasion would be supported by English Catholics and that he expressed the view that the people of England should take action against any such invasion - even to the point of deposing governors of garrisons should this be necessary.
_	One of the considerations in support of this move to electronic prescriptions was the view that using electronic prescriptions in lieu of written or oral prescriptions could reduce medical errors that occur
_	XIV endorsed the view that the Colosseum was a sacred site where early Christians had been martyred.
_	The possibility of the priests of Onias being admitted to officiate at Jerusalem was explicitly stated, while one passage even expresses the view that sacrificial worship was permissible in the temple of Onias, however, this view was rejected, and is based on the view that idolatry was not performed there.
_	They noted that "a historical perspective gives little or no support to the view that immigration is needed for economic prosperity.
_	Although Ricardian socialist thought had some influence on Karl Marx's theories, Marx rejected many of the fundamental assumptions of the Ricardian socialists, including the view that labor was the source of all wealth.
_	Also, contrary to Ruse's claim, Plantinga gave the name "Darwin's Doubt" not to the idea that the conjunction of naturalism and evolution is self-defeating, but rather to the view that given naturalism and evolution our cognitive faculties are unlikely to be reliable.
_	In adopting the view that many new-media technologies are not fundamentally new, his projects often imagine "what could have been" across the disciplines of interactive art, early and pre-cinema, and architecture."
_	It covers the slopes of the hill between E. Franklin St and Main St. and includes fountains, paths, a small park house, the plaque describing the view that named Richmond, and the Confederate Soldiers and Sailors Monument.
_	Modern historians such as Lumby and Moore, however, take the view that Mountbatten played a crucial role in ensuring that the princely states agreed to accede to India.
_	Sources which implicitly endorse the view that the 1981 attempt to assassinate the Pope was masterminded by the KGB and undertaken by a Turkish extremist only with active hands-on participation of East German and Bulgarian security services place Ergün's recruitment as a Stasi collaborator in the context of a wider attempt to recruit politically committed West Germans of Turkish provenance to the East German political cause and disseminate an acceptance in the west that the would-be assassin had acted without any Soviet-bloc involvement.
_	However, the view that there is no "causal" instantaneous effect has also been proposed within the Copenhagen interpretation: in this alternative view, measurement affects our ability to define (and measure) quantities in the physical system, not the system itself.
_	This movement lists its tenets on its website, stating that its members are guided by principles such as a belief in unconditional love, the belief that different spiritual pathways are possible and the commitment to the view that everything in the universe is ultimately interconnected with everything else.
_	The group publicly cited the imposition of McCaw and her hired managers' personal opinions onto the process of reporting and publishing the news; McCaw has expressed the view that the "News-Press" newsroom staff had become sloppy and biased.
_	In the past, the organization has generally promoted the view that Macedonian Slavs are Bulgarians, but today it unites both Macedonian Bulgarians and ethnic Macedonians.
_	Both of these early references in Cicero (most ancient Trismegistus material is from the early centuries AD) corroborate the view that Thrice-Great Hermes originated in Hellenistic Egypt through syncretism between Greek and Egyptian gods (the "Hermetica" refer most often to Thoth and Amun).
_	The first attempt to make the flag official occurred in 1995 when the Minister of the Islands at the time took the view that implementation could take place on Australia Day 1996 via a formal announcement by the Administrator rather than an amendment to the "Christmas Island Act 1958".
_	Erikson and Wlezien (2008) challenge the view that election stock markets outperform polls.
_	Allis, who up until that time was a Republican, catapulted to prominence in November 1875 when he wrote a letter to the "Milwaukee Sentinel" in which he expressed the view that government financial policy was ruining the prosperity brought about in the wake of the war.
_	Anthony Cordesman, a former Pentagon official and a holder of the Arleigh A. Burke Chair in Strategy at the Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), highlighted the view that the United States and other members of the P5+1, along with their attempts to limit Iran's breakout capability and to prevent it from getting even one nuclear device, should mainly focus "on reaching a full agreement that clearly denies Iran any ability to covertly create an effective nuclear force."
_	In 1893, the American philosopher Charles Sanders Peirce used the word "agapism" for the view that creative love is operative in the cosmos.
_	He became the court's most outspoken advocate of judicial restraint, the view that courts should not interpret the constitution in such a way as to impose sharp limits upon the authority of the legislative and executive branches.
_	Rachel Mott, writing in Irish Arts Review (2002) also took the view that south eastern part of this building, now known as ‘The Oratory’, was erected first.
_	Shortly later in his text "Anarchist synthesis" he exposes the view that "these currents were not contradictory but complementary, each having a role within anarchism: anarcho-syndicalism as the strength of the mass organisations and the best way for the practice of anarchism; libertarian communism as a proposed future society based on the distribution of the fruits of labour according to the needs of each one; anarcho-individualism as a negation of oppression and affirming the individual right to development of the individual, seeking to please them in every way.
_	Istook took the view that their request for major funding increases for Amtrak took precedence over their requests for their districts, and viewed those requests as trying to "double-dip" into the Treasury.
_	A common misinterpretation of paradigms is the belief that the discovery of paradigm shifts and the dynamic nature of science (with its many opportunities for subjective judgments by scientists) are a case for relativism: the view that all kinds of belief systems are equal.
_	"Gothic Ripples" was an early proponent of what would come to be known as Holocaust denial, noting in 1953 that "The fable of the slaughter of six million Jews by Hitler has never been tackled by "Gothic Ripples" because we take the view that we would have liked Hitler even better if the figure had been larger; we are so 'obsessed with anti-semitism' that we believe that as long as the destruction was done in a humane manner, it was to the advantage of everyone ... if it had been true.
_	Some scholars promoted the view that Marča, as a diocese of the Serbian Patriarchate of Peć, was established in the late 16th century (1578 or 1597).
_	Scholars holds the view that Mahayana influenced seafaring merchants from the Pallava Kingdom were responsible for the construction of this temple.
_	Taking the view that existing texts were too mathematical for medical students, Bird avoided such material in favour of clear explanations.
_	Even though it was non-pecuniary, the Law Lords took the view that the interest was sufficient to warrant Lord Hoffmann's automatic disqualification from hearing the case.
_	Smillie favoured women's suffrage in a general way, but was not a declared supporter; he shared with most Labour MPs the view that trade union reforms should take precedence over women's issues.
_	The excavators were of the view that these alcoves originally contained single plaster statues of the Buddha either sitting or standing, dedicated in memory of holy men or donated by rich pilgrims.
_	The fundamental paradigm shift from the "Youth Offenders Act" to the "Youth Criminal Justice Act" involves the view that deviant youth are now viewed as offenders responsible for their actions.
_	Following the assassination of Walther Rathenau in 1922, many took the view that in the post war context of economic destitution, the residual USPD now had too much in common with the SPD to persist as a separate movement.
_	The Center's board and the journal's founders took the view that interdisciplinary research would be required to understand issues of economic development.
_	The Australian Director of Military Prosecutions, Brigadier Lyn McDade, decided to charge two members of the Regiment, Sergeant J, who gave the order to use grenades, and Lance Corporal M, who threw the grenades, with manslaughter as a result of an investigation into the engagement, coming to the view that they ought to have known, and during the attack then certainly have been aware that women and children were in the room.
_	Some medieval Muslim writers—including Muhammad ibn Jarir al-Tabari, Ibn Khaldun, and even the later "Book of the Zanj"—asserted the view that the effects of Noah's curse on Ham's descendants included blackness, slavery, and a requirement not to let the hair grow past the ears, despite the fact that this contradicted the teachings of the Islamic prophet Muhammad regarding skin color and racial equality, most notably in his last sermon.
_	In each of those reports, the Secretary-General expressed the view that the continued presence of UNEF II in the area was essential, and he recommended, after consultations with the parties, that its mandate be extended for a further period.
_	Over subsequent months newspaper editorials, while careful not to disagree with the verdict, generally took the view that in difficult circumstances an important principle of law had been upheld, even though guilt might not have been properly punished:
_	Waddington, however, came to the view that the answers to embryology lay in genetics, and in 1935 went to Thomas Hunt Morgan's "Drosophila" laboratory in California, even though this was a time when most embryologists felt that genes were unimportant and just played a role in minor phenomena such as eye colour.
_	In the First Judges Case (S. P Gupta & Ors v Union of India & Ors), the majority took the view that the opinion of the judiciary does not have primacy in the matter of appointments of judges of the Supreme Court and High Courts.
_	Hedonism, for example, is the view that goodness is ultimately just pleasure.
_	In his "Commentaries on the Laws of England", Sir William Blackstone emphasized the castle doctrine but took the view that forced entry was permitted if the suspected felony had actually occurred.
_	Linati disputes the view that the Aztecs were barbarous, asserting that human progress and civilization is universal.
_	Normal view is the view that allows the player to see both the Custom Robos in an isometric view.
_	This reasoning appears to have followed that of Odum's doctoral supervisor, G.E.Hutchinson who expressed the view that if a community were an organism then it must have a form of metabolism.
_	The notion of "religious experience" was used by Schleiermacher and Albert Ritschl to defend religion against the growing scientific and secular critique, and defend the view that human (moral and religious) experience justifies religious beliefs.
_	In Angus Calder's re-examination of the ideological constructs surrounding "Little England" during the Second World War in "The Myth of the Blitz", he puts forward the view that the story of Deep England was central to wartime propaganda operations within the United Kingdom, and then, as now, served a clearly defined political and cultural purpose in the hands of various interested agencies.
_	Agnosticism is the view that the truth value of certain claims—especially claims about the existence of any deity, but also other religious and metaphysical claims—is unknown or unknowable.
_	The employer took the view that, although it was prepared to grant access and stop-order facilities, it was not prepared to recognise the union’s shop stewards.
_	Henri Misson, a visitor from France, offers a description of the theatre in 1698: his use of the word "amphitheatre" supports the view that Drury Lane had a circular line of boxes surrounding its pit:
_	Since de Beauvoir many feminists have presented the view that social hierarchies are perpetuated by the fallacy that they are metaphysically "natural".
_	There is credible evidence to support the view that the variation's atmosphere of brooding melancholy and its subtitle "Romanza" are tokens of a covert tribute to another woman, the name most frequently mentioned in this connection being that of Helen Weaver, who had broken off her engagement to Elgar in 1884 before sailing out of his life forever aboard a ship bound for New Zealand.
_	The action is driven by the view that government agencies alone cannot monitor the entire market for unlicensed content, which is why the GVU tries to fill this gap.
_	To this end, he expressed the view that “married women should have the same access to protection as unmarried women” and “although married persons have conjugal rights over each other, such rights should be exercised within reasonable behaviour”.
_	The Court took the view that the 1911 Act was a 'remodelling' of the constitution rather than a delegation of power.
_	Bechtel advocates a mechanistic approach to philosophy of science, taking the view that phenomena are often explained by specifying mechanisms.
_	A third opinion expressed the view that Conservative Judaism should disconnect ritual purity practices from the Temple in Jerusalem or its memory, and offered a new approach based on what it called the concept of holiness rather than the concept of purity.
_	He presented the view that after the war America, Germany and Japan would dominate the world economy.
_	(The Jenkins commission had also taken the view that such a minor change would not merit a referendum.)
_	Nehru valued Indian territorial sovereignty and realized the need for an adequate defense of this sovereignty, but otherwise, was largely of the view that India’s economic development needed to be internally focused.
_	The new federal outlook on fire policy parallels advances in ecology and is moving towards the view that many ecosystems depend on disturbance for their diversity and for the proper maintenance of their natural processes.
_	Further experiments, conducted as new methods were developed (particularly the ability to use PET scanning to examine drug action in the brain of living patients) challenged the view that the amount of dopamine blocking was correlated with clinical benefit.
_	Later, he read "He-Motions" by Bishop TD Jakes and other spiritual and self-help books, which led him to the view that his purpose in life is to add value to the world through his music.
_	A physician, one Dr. Pictet, expressed the view that Gay enjoyed "perfect health of body and mind" but was also "under the influence of some occult power, which we are naturally unable to detect by medical means" and that "we remain convinced that his extraordinary state can only be attributed to possession", citing as evidence "the fact that during our first interview with M. Gay, that extraordinary thing which speaks through his mouth revealed the inmost secrets of our heart, told us the story of our life from the age of twelve onwards, giving details that are known only to God, our confessor, and ourselves."
_	In 2011 she expressed the view that "climate change money should go to armed services".
_	In line with the view that nothing fundamental has changed in the transition from industrial societies to post-industrial societies is the insistence of lingering problems from past development periods.
_	Wheeler took the view that whether they were really cannibals "may be doubted."
_	The Union, having rebranded as "the Source" in 2006, was of the view that the term "union" was a liability for student unions: organisations such as Students At Macquarie had also moved in this direction.
_	Kroc had insisted on continuing expansion whereas Sonneborn was conservative with the view that the country was heading into a recession and put a stop on constructing new stores.
_	Arnold Genekowitsch Fruchtenbaum (born September 26, 1943) is the founder and director of Ariel Ministries, an organization which prioritizes evangelization of Jews in the effort to bring them to the view that Jesus is the Jewish Messiah.
_	Inspired by the work of Wilhelm Schmidt ('Hot Steam Schmidt') from Kassel, Garbe was already in 1893 of the view that the use of superheated steam would give steam locomotives a power advantage.
_	Heselton has expressed the view that Valiente likely did more than this, and that she wrote a number of the chapters herself.
_	The museum's official opening on 19 September 2014, was protested by several activist groups, who expressed the view that their own human rights histories had been inaccurately depicted or excluded from the museum.
_	Based on Elisabeth Zachariadou's examination of previously unregarded Byzantine sources, most modern scholars have moved to the view that the city was captured in 1369.
_	The ICTY Trial Chamber is of the view that although this Agency was set up for the exchange of flats and the resettlement of populations, this was nothing else but an integral part of the ethnic cleansing plan."
_	He was of the view that in the present times, nations are formed on the basis of homeland (geographic basis) and not on ethnicity and religion.
_	Government on the other hand took the view that the intervention of FOTC and others was undesirable to the government’s agenda and this attitude was encapsulated in a comment made to an FOTC representative by Senator Julian Francis, Minister of Communication and Works at a Chamber of Commerce Meeting that “lay people should stay out of certain issues”.
_	Emperor rejected the views of Han officials who said Xinjiang was not part of China and that he should not conquer it, putting forth the view that China was multi-ethnic and did not just refer to Han.
_	This left-right interchange corresponds to the view that physicians generally have in reality when positioned in front of patients.
_	Roughly, it is the view that there are no moral standards other than God's will: without God's commands, nothing would be right or wrong.
_	The Social Security Advisory Committee (SSAC) took the view that the "Social Fund Manual" put too much emphasis on the consideration that decision-makers would have to make to the budgetary aspects which it argued went beyond the parameters of the legislation.
_	The ECHR also noted that in the 21st century "Amongst scholars, the majority have taken the view that ethnic cleansing, in the way in which it was carried out by the Serb forces in Bosnia and Herzegovina in order to expel Muslims and Croats from their homes, did not constitute genocide.
_	Prum indicates that Darwin recognizing difficulties in the theory of natural selection advanced the view that sexual selection is an additional force in evolution and presented this argument in "The Descent of Man".
_	Gradualism has also been used in a religious sense, especially in the Catholic Church (specifically, in ethics and moral theology), to describe the view that certain individuals and families that make up a parish or community may be living at various points along a line extending from being in a state of mortal sin, to being at least minimally in the "state of grace" and able to receive the Eucharist, and to a level of greater holiness.
_	Both names support the view that Northchurch may have been the site of the original Berkhamsted which expanded down the Bulbourne Valley following the construction of the Berkhamsted Castle 2 miles to the south west.
_	After a number of stormy interactions between them and Bent, Broughton and Riley were of the view that ex-convict lawyers should be admitted temporarily to appear before the court until Garling had arrived.
_	Usually in hospitality this relates to the cost reductions associated with improved energy efficiency but may also relate to, for example, the rise in ethical consumerism and the view that being seen to be a responsible business is beneficial to revenue growth.
_	Believers in universal reconciliation may support the view that while there may be a real "Hell" of some kind, it is neither a place of endless suffering nor a place where the spirits of human beings are ultimately 'annihilated' after enduring the just amount of divine retribution.
_	Subsequent to this, the UK Privy Council deemed the amnesty invalid but expressed the view that it would be improper to re-arrest the 114 accused.
_	The majority did not agree with the view that Article 368 of the Constitution contained "power and procedure" to amend, but instead believed that the text of Article 368 only explained the procedure to amend the constitution, the power being derived from entry 97 of the List I of the VII Schedule to the Constitution.
_	The thin conception, often associated with the legal scholars Albert Venn Dicey and Joseph Raz, advocates the view that the rule of law is fulfilled by adhering to formal procedures and requirements, such as the stipulations that all laws be prospective, clear, stable and constitutionally enacted, and that the parties to legal disputes are treated equally and without bias on the part of judges.
_	While people subscribing to the thin conception do not dismiss the importance of the content of the law, they take the view that this is a matter of substantive justice and should not be regarded as part of the concept of the rule of law.
_	The Vatican accepted the view that unbaptized babies did not, as at first believed, go straight to Hell but to a special area of limbo, "limbus infantium".
_	In June, July, and again in September 1940, the President offered the view that Congress need not remain in session any longer.
_	Maintaining the view that it is still the legitimate government of the whole of China, the ROC does not formally recognize the legitimacy of PRC.
_	Phylogenetic analysis has supported the view that during the Cambrian radiation, metazoa (animals) evolved monophyletically from a single common ancestor: flagellated colonial protists similar to modern choanoflagellates.
_	Whatever the truth is, placename researchers take the view that the name Körborn goes back to the Latin word "corvus" (“crow”).
_	How took the view that it was "too simplistic" to claim that the Act was aimed mainly at punishing riotous anti-national elements:
_	The first of these analyses produced no evidence for the view that total fat, or animal fat, or hydrogenated fat, was the direct cause of coronary thrombosis; in fact the closest relationship between coronary deaths and any single dietary factor was with sugar.
_	He took the view that it was the sexually enlightened stance to pass the ordinance, and those who opposed it were uptight, including, near the end of the campaign, Florida Governor Reubin Askew.
_	Enthusiasts have expressed the view that the storylines for the "Challenge" episodes were the "Super Friends" era's best portrayal of the DC heroes.
_	One of the important ideas coming out of this revolution was the view that Work is worship and a path to spirituality.
_	The British took the view that because they had been established directly between the British crown and the princely states, they could not be transferred to the newly independent dominions of India and Pakistan.
_	He took the view that these were the initials of Cornelius Ketel, an artist known to have painted a portrait of the Earl of Oxford.
_	Few found his suggestive style of care useful, and the view that “physicians must assume sole responsibility for protecting the ignorant public from its folly” lived on for some time.
_	They are of the view that other social factors such as television watching, video games and playing were controlled to assess the real impacts of the fast foods.
_	He has claimed "The Watchtower" has repeatedly blurred discussions of both Jesus Christ's loyalty to God and the apostles' loyalty to Christ to promote the view that Witnesses should be loyal to the Watch Tower Society.
_	He came to the view that religion and old ways of thinking were impractical, maybe even dangerous, in modern times.
_	This position had customarily been held by the longest-serving Law Lord, but the then-Lord Chancellor, Derry, Lord Irvine of Lairg, took the view that a more dynamic leader was required.
_	Much of the criticism of the distribution of projects and funding allotment is a result of the view that the decisions were politically motivated.
_	Russia rejects the view that this was an annexation and regard it as an accession to the Russian Federation of a state that had just declared independence from Ukraine following a referendum, and considers secession as a result of irredentism.
_	J had considered the point fairly shortly herself, dismissing it in only five short paragraphs, but she had formed the view that "Applying the test set out by Lord Toulson points firmly in favour of rejecting the illegality defence put forward by Daiwa."
_	Also, Foucher, Tarn, and more recently, Boardman, Bussagli and McEvilley have taken the view that some of the most purely Hellenistic works of northwestern India and Afghanistan, may actually be wrongly attributed to later centuries, and instead belong to a period one or two centuries earlier, to the time of the Indo-Greeks in the 2nd–1st century BC:
_	In 1775 Johann Blumenbach divided the world's population into five groups according to skin color (Caucasians, Mongols, etc.), positing the view that the non-caucasians had arisen through a process of degeneration.
_	Locally, it is often repeated to this day, that Queen Victoria so much enjoyed the view that she would have her train halt for a while on Brunel's spectacular viaduct over the river Brent.
_	The liquidator may also seek to set aside transactions which were entered into by the company in the time immediately preceding the company going into liquidation where he forms the view that they constitute an unfair preference or a transaction at an undervalue.
_	The ruling’s justification is based on the view that smoking is a slow way of committing suicide, which is strictly prohibited in the Islamic faith.
_	A number of the earlier philosophers or mathematicians, as Maxwell terms them, of the 19th century, held the view that electromagnetic phenomena were explainable by action at a distance.
_	Early folklorists tended to reflect contemporary theories and beliefs, including the view that singing games were a form of pagan survivalism, which led Alice Gomme to conclude that "London Bridge Is Broken Down" reflected a memory of child sacrifice, or 'devolution', which assumed that children's songs must have devolved down to children from adult culture and did not allow for innovation by children themselves.
_	In November 2010 surgery he had his spleen removed, because doctors were of the view that the non-vital organ which is mainly a blood filter was where his platelets were being destroyed.
_	Describing her as "a major personality in the development" of Wicca, Hutton also expressed the view that "her enduring greatness lay in the very fact that she was so completely and strong-mindedly dedicated to finding and declaring her own truth, in a world in which the signposts to it were themselves in a state of almost complete confusion".
_	Griffin later expressed the view that "the only solution that could possibly be acceptable to loyalists and republicans alike" would be the reintegration of the Irish Republic into the United Kingdom, which would be reorganised along federal lines.
_	Tan held the view that the local construction industry was overheated at the time, and public housing should take priority.
_	French astronomer Jacques Cassini held to the view that the polar circumference was greater.
_	On one hand, the Indonesian national leadership in Jakarta appears to take the view that it is best to bring the former guerrilla freedom fighters into the national political fold.
_	(Logic of the Human Sciences, 1920), presents the view that actual historical individuals, whose cognitive equipment is partially created by a specific cultural community while at the same time constantly modifying it, are the elements that constitute the subject of knowledge, rather than a timeless universal entity as it is represented by Descartes or Locke.
_	In a 2010 publication, Ian Hancock stated that he agrees with the view that the number of Romanies killed has been underestimated as a result of being grouped with others in Nazi records under headings such as "remainder to be liquidated", "hangers-on", and "partisans".
_	Verse 5:73 has been interpreted as a potential criticism of Syriac literature that references Jesus as "the third of three" and thus an attack on the view that Christ was divine.
_	In "A Good Enough Parent", published in 1987, he had come to the view that children had considerable resilience and that most parents could be "good enough" to help their children make a good start.
_	Most linguists now reject the view that the Coahuiltecan peoples of southern Texas and adjacent Mexico spoke a single or related languages.
_	David Schlesinger said that "I'm extremely disappointed that this report condones a disproportionate use of deadly force in a situation the army itself admitted had not been analysed clearly" and "They would appear to take the view that any raising of a camera into position could garner a deadly response".
_	The emphasis is given to the view that "action is superior to inaction" (p. 300).
_	Writing in response to Phelps' death in 2014, Theroux described Phelps as "an angry bigot who thrived on conflict", and expressed the view that his death would not lead to any "huge changes" in the church, as he saw it as operating with the dynamics of a large family rather than a cult.
_	This included the view that all land should be put on a register, so as to ease its ability to be marketed.
_	Both men shared the view that a rapid conclusion of peace was necessary to avoid the dissolution of the Habsburg Empire.
_	Feminist psychology critiques historical psychological research as done from a male perspective with the view that males are the norm.
_	That was why he emphasized the view that we must first develop self-respect and learn to analyze propositions rationally.
_	Others take the view that Abū Ḥanīfah only saw around half a dozen companions, possibly at a young age, and did not directly narrate hadith from them.
_	Alone among European powers, Russia offered oratorical support for the Union, largely due to the view that the U.S. served as a counterbalance to the British Empire.
_	Dr Gilbert Kahn, of Kean University in the USA, took the view that British Jewry did not need a CST because British Jews paid taxes to the state for their physical protection and could therefore depend on the police.
_	The initial legal ruling sustained the view that a Trinitarian commitment was necessary, from those with benefits from the endowments.
_	The theory of God is prefaced by a development of the view that human knowledge arises by degrees from the merest sensuous impressions to the most subtle concepts; so that the idea of the divine, which transcends all other knowledge in subtlety, is itself a proof of its verity.
_	Proponents of the view that the drive to language acquisition is innate in humans argue that this is supported by the fact that all cognitively normal children raised in an environment where language is accessible will acquire language without formal instruction.
_	The Buddhist thesis that all things are negative in nature (inasmuch as a thing's nature is constituted by its differences from others) is rejected, as is the view that all things are eternal or that all things are noneternal.
_	It is difficult for the matter-of-fact physicist to accept the view that the substratum of everything is of mental character.
_	This was met with fierce resistance by northern jurists like John Gilbert Kotzé, and later rejected outright by the Transvaal Supreme Court in "Rood v Wallach", De Villiers, however, refused to concede the point, so that the dispute continued until, almost 50 years after it began, it was settled in the famous case of "Conradie v Rossouw", where the court took the view that a binding contract may be constituted by any serious and deliberate agreement made with the intention of creating a legal obligation, rejecting the consideration doctrine of English law.
_	As a result, he is remembered today, not only for his sharp wit and high ethical standards, but also for his loyalty to the view that, in a democracy, the best way for a man to serve himself, his friends, and his city — even during times of war — is by being loyal to, and by speaking publicly about, the truth.
_	Some find reliabilism of justification objectionable because it entails externalism, which is the view that one can have knowledge, or have a justified belief, despite not knowing (having "access" to) the evidence, or other circumstances, that make the belief justified.
_	Efforts by the members of the church to renovate the school buildings did not yield any fruit and renovations were stopped with the view that it was not helping.
_	Similarly, its critical reception was more mixed, the overall opinion tending to the view that while there is little to find fault with, the material and production is less distinguished than had been the case with "The Icon Is Love".
_	Despite this fact, Kazembek was later one of the few European scholars who strongly disagreed with the view that Islam was an obstacle to social development—a stance which was common among Westerners in the nineteenth century.
_	Some historians and conservationists are also of the view that the bungalow marks a site that is merely close to the home of Kipling's birth, as the bungalow was built in 1882—about 15 years after Kipling was born.
_	I cleave strongly to the view that it is possible to be critical of Israel without being antisemitic, and I do not believe that Churchill is making or otherwise implying universal claims about the Jewish people in this play.
_	The film goes against the view that straight men and women can't just be friends.
_	Now it seems to me obvious that He was neither a lunatic nor a fiend: and consequently, however strange or terrifying or unlikely it may seem, I have to accept the view that He was and is God.
_	In "", R. Puligandla described the book as "clear, analytical, well-documented", recommending that "all scholars and students of Hinduism and Indian philosophy should find this book beneficial and rewarding", although "Nicholson's arguments and conclusions will not persuade some scholars, especially those who hold the view that Hinduism as a unified tradition has existed since ancient times".
_	The Reporter took the view that in the light of factors including the publicity since Kelbie's decision, the case was severely compromised.
_	Like other Chess Pieces, Peta shares the view that humans are worthless beings.
_	Frankland took the view that the valence (he used the term "atomicity") of an element was a single value that corresponded to the maximum value observed.
_	Psychological concepts concerned with self-interest include psychological egoism, the view that humans are always motivated by self-interest and narcissism, which is an unhealthy self-absorption due to a disturbance in the sense of self.
_	In page 4 under a paragraph on DTT the pilot is described as underway, but puts forward the view that continued progress is required on both it and formal arrangements in the coming months would be needed to ensure the analogue system is replaced nationwide called "analogue switchoff".
_	The Lord Chamberlain (Lord Cromer) overruled his subordinate: "I take the view that the whole thing is so much unreal farcical comedy, that subject to a few modifications in the dialogue it can pass."
_	In his book on love, Ibn Dawud quoted Greek playwright Aristophanes who, according to Plato's Symposium, held the view that the soul of a person who had fallen in love was actually only half a soul.
_	First, most Indigenous archaeologies hold the view that archaeology makes up only one part of the cultural resources spectrum (Anyon 1991).
_	The Government took the view that the safeguards could be achieved by providing the direct election of the President, thus making the President directly accountable to the people, and enabling him to serve as a check against the Government by increasing his discretionary powers.
_	Til, the view that wealth has been taken from the poor by the rich implies that the redistribution of that wealth is more a matter of restitution than of theft.
_	In 2012, the RSA, having been consulted to offer an opinion on a TV advertisement for Meteor (a mobile telephone service provider), concluded that "they were of the view that the advertisement promoted highly dangerous road user behaviour."
_	Varas expressed the view that the eventual mission was to be to civilize the indigenous inhabitants by increasing their material standard of living and "raise their spirit to the moral and religious truths".
_	Pretribulationism is the view that Christian believers will be raptured or translated to heaven with Christ before the events of the tribulation.
_	In the words of Will Murray, the view that "The Thrill Book" is the first such magazine is "erroneously held by many", and he adds that it was "merely a prologue to the Golden Era of periodical weird fiction".
_	In 1904, Friedeberg, speaking for the FVdG, advanced the view that the general strike must be a weapon in the hands of the proletariat and would be the last step before the socialist revolution.
_	Some media commentators have expressed opinions that the benefit rules may lead to a UK-wide housing crisis, while others supporting the reforms have taken the view that it will help to reduce UK welfare spending and spur a fairer redistribution of rented accommodation.
_	A study conducted in 2000 supported the view that the new, tougher policy had had a preventive effect on drug use.
_	Paul the Apostle expressed the view that a person's body belongs to God and is God's temple (, ), and that premarital sex is immoral () on an equal level as adultery.
_	On June 11, 2014, 3,210 of the Law Society of British Columbia's 13,000 members voted in support of a resolution to reverse its decision to grant the faculty accreditation and requested that the province revoke its accreditation of the law program because of the view that it discriminates against unmarried couples and homosexual individuals.
_	Historically, fallibilism is most strongly associated with Charles Sanders Peirce, John Dewey, and other pragmatists, who use it in their attacks on foundationalism (the view that any system of rationally justified beliefs must rest on a set of properly basic beliefs—that is, beliefs that are accepted, and rightly accepted, directly, without any evidence or rational support whatsoever).
_	While leader of the NF, Tyndall expressed the view that "The duty of Britain is to fight [Irish] republicanism and to destroy republicanism, not just violent republicanism – as represented by the IRA – but republicanism in every shape and form".
_	Some have advanced the view that Holt's death was not accidental, but rather that he chose to end his own life.
_	As an author, lecturer, and architect, Cram propounded the view that the Renaissance had been, at least in part, an unfortunate detour for western culture.
_	The government held the view that the British Government had not done enough to stop sectarian assassinations in Northern Ireland.
_	Anti-pornography feminists hold the view that pornography contributes to sexism, arguing that in pornographic performances the actresses are reduced to mere receptacles—objects—for sexual use and abuse by men.
_	First, Krahe presented the view that the Veneti language forms a separate branch in itself.
_	The origin of the chimere has been the subject of much debate; but the view that it is a modification of the cope is now discarded, and it is practically proved to be derived from the medieval tabard ("tabardum, taberda" or "collobium"), an upper garment worn in civil life by all classes of people both in England and abroad.
_	TRAI challenged TDSAT's order in the Supreme Court, and stated in proceedings on 22 July 2010 that "in the analog, non-addressable environment, the authority is of the view that a la carte should not be made mandatory at the wholesale level as technological constraints in any case make it impossible for the benefits of a la carte provisioning to be passed on to subscribers".
_	Researcher Otto Karsch, nevertheless, held the view that the village’s name did not go back to the church, but rather that "kar" or "kir" was a word meaning “membership in a kindred group” or “kin”.
_	He also noted the Government of The Bahamas' readiness to implement the EPA fully, in particular the regional preference clause and that it is of the view that The Bahamas has taken a monumental step towards economic integration when it acceded to the EPA.
_	The anonymous medieval author of the Christian mystical work The Cloud of Unknowing similarly expressed the view that in profound and prolonged contemplation a soul dries up the "root and ground" of the sin that is always there, even after one's confession and however busy one is in holy things: "therefore, whoever would work at becoming a contemplative must first cleanse his [or her] conscience."
_	The opportunistic perspective holds the view that managers, who are agents to the principal, act to their self-interests.
_	They only adopt accounting policies that allow them to gain, in the view that the firm also gains.
_	The most notable Serbian linguist of the 19th century, Vuk Karadžić, was a follower of the view that all south Slavs that speak the Shtokavian dialect (of Serbo-Croatian) were Serbs, speaking the Serbian language.
_	Ammerman disputes the view that Koresh's followers were "hostages", noting that some of them left their Mount Carmel Center between the initial ATF raid and the last day of the standoff.
_	Meares held the view that when in hypnosis, the higher (more evolved) functions of the subject's brain were switched off, and the subject reverted to a far more archaic and far less advanced (in evolutionary terms) mental state; something which significantly altered the subjects' cognitive processing so that they readily accepted internally consistent, literal logic without any of the normal filters and verifications against the objective facts of the real world.
_	He called it one of an individual's personal rights, which are "a species of property of the most sacred kind", and expressed the view that "[t]o take away this right is to reduce a man to slavery, ... subject to the will of another ...
_	Senior Minister Goh Chok Tong, who was Prime Minister when Speakers' Corner was set up, expressed the view that its use had declined because there were now other avenues for people to express themselves such as the Internet (including the Government's online feedback portal Reach), newspapers, and radio and television channels.
_	Therefore, Periyar was of the view that for the progress of the people in the country, great social changes were necessary and a good government could be formed only after making those changes.
_	In 1995, Sirop was Hubert de Givenchy's chosen successor as chief designer of the Givenchy label, but Bernard Arnault, head of the Louis Vuitton Moët Hennessy conglomerate which owned Givenchy, took the view that Sirop was not well enough known to the public and appointed John Galliano instead.
_	The discovery of malacidins supported the view that the calcium-dependent antibiotics are a larger class than previously thought.
_	The President is of the view that the current U.S. military operations in Libya are consistent with the War Powers Resolution and do not under that law require further congressional authorization, because U.S. military operations are distinct from the kind of “hostilities” contemplated by the Resolution’s 60 day termination provision.
_	The English language editor Clarence Ashford supported the Provisional Government of Hawaii, and expressed the view that the Queen had brought about her own downfall.
_	In "On Virginal Conception and Original Sin" 7, Anselm of Canterbury (1033–1109) said that "no human intellect accepts the view that an infant has the rational soul from the moment of conception."
_	Four of the seven members of the commission, Boggs, Cooper, McCloy, and Russell, had serious doubts regarding the conclusions of the commission that the President and Governor Connally were both wounded by the "magic bullet" and regarding the view that Oswald had acted alone.
_	In this study, Wells advocated the view that the anti-war movement was not a failure.
_	In an important constitutional case ("Sue v Hill" (1999) 163 ALR 648), three justices of the High Court of Australia (the ultimate court of appeal) expressed the view that if the British Parliament were to alter the law of succession to the throne, such a change could "not" have any effect on the monarchy in Australia, because of the Australia Act: succession to the throne would continue in Australia according to the existing rule, unless and until that was altered "in Australia".
_	Both sides had supporters and detractors, one side saying that Bolivia would serve to emphasize the marginalization of indigenous women and the other with the view that all women are marginalized and one group should not be given more emphasis than another.
_	"The Cambridge History of Iran" rejects the view that the death of Abbas marked the beginning of the decline of the Safavid dynasty as Iran continued to prosper throughout the 17th century, but blames him for the poor statesmanship of the later Safavid shahs: "The elimination of royal princes, whether by blinding or immuring them in the harem, their exclusion from the affairs of state and from contact with the leading aristocracy of the empire and the generals, all the abuses of the princes' education, which were nothing new but which became the normal practice with Abbas at the court of Isfahan, effectively put a stop to the training of competent successors, that is to say, efficient princes prepared to meet the demands of ruling as kings."
_	His parents, who were from Kiev, Russia (now Ukraine), were against him being a baseball player, as they were of the view that all baseball players were "bums."
_	At that meeting, he said he supported the view that church practice toward the divorced and remarried could change without altering doctrine.
_	Sider (1997) uses the term "four-dimensionalism" to refer to perdurantism, but Michael Rea uses the term "four-dimensionalism" to mean the view that presentism is false as opposed to "perdurantism", the view that endurantism is false and persisting objects have temporal parts.
_	In 1931 he published the book "Das Ende des Kapitalismus" (The End of Capitalism), in which he offered the view that laissez-faire capitalism was dead, and that German autarky was the future.
_	Proponents of the view that reading is a kind of “surrogate listening” assume that the reader deals with each word in a strict serial order.
_	The biographers Benny Green and Robert McCrum both take the view that this exile benefited Wodehouse's writing, helping him to go on depicting an idealised England seen in his mind's eye, rather than as it actually was in the post-war decades.
_	A large body of Literature has been written with the view that it is so.
_	In 1983, Robert Lindsey expressed the view that Ford had become "a kind of one-man academic, business and political conglomerate" in his retirement who was the most active of the then-current three former presidents (Nixon, Carter, and himself).
_	It follows that, in general, the defenders of the new calendar hold the view that in localities where the Church's episcopal authority has elected to adopt the new calendar, but where some have broken communion with those implementing this change, it is those who have broken communion who have in fact introduced the disunity, rather than the new calendar itself or those who have adopted it — although most would agree that attempts at various times to mandate the use of the new calendar through compulsion, have magnified the disunity.
_	His early experience in science led him to the view that educational researchers are wrong in aping the scientific paradigm.
_	Having published over a hundred papers he came to the view that peer-reviewed journals are not the most appropriate medium for disseminating findings since they are too slow and directed at the wrong audience.
_	Most bills that have been passed by Parliament must be scrutinized by a non-elected advisory body called the Presidential Council for Minority Rights (PCMR), which must report to the Speaker of Parliament if it is of the view that any clause in a bill contains a differentiating measure.
_	Though this initial study has been criticised for certain assumptions, the statistical evidence supports the view that such bilinguals enjoy certain educational advantages; and the 2016 Republic of Ireland census noted that daily Irish language speakers were more highly educated than the population generally in Ireland.
_	He is of the view that some weapons systems used in the conflict had some sort of DIME component to reduce the effect on the ground.
_	Tolstoy takes the view that all oaths are evil, but especially an oath of allegiance.
_	However, it does hold the view that there should not be islands of privilege and exclusivity which are exempt from the needs for greater and fairer access to quality education.
_	Several modern-day rabbis have presented arguments supporting the view that a woman can write a scroll for ritual use.
_	In the years after the publication of Wilson and Simberloff's papers ecologists had found more examples of the species-area relationship, and conservation planning was taking the view that the one large reserve could hold more species than several smaller reserves, and that larger reserves should be the norm in reserve design.
_	The Liberal Party has maintained the view that the Legislative Council should not be a "party house", and has rarely endorsed candidates who have gone on to win a seat.
_	In the circumstances, the Court was of the view that for the Authority to frustrate Coughlan's legitimate expectation was so unfair that it amounted to an abuse of power.
_	The Board also took the view that
_	In "Karaha Bodas Co. LLC v. Pertamina Energy Trading Ltd." (2005) – not a judicial review case – the Court of Appeal expressed the view that the applicant "must be asserting the recognition of a 'right' that is personal to him".
_	The UK tax office, HMRC, has the view that key man insurance is tax-efficient if it is taken out 'solely for the purposes of the business'.
_	The "Guardian" newspaper expressed the view that the statue also looked like the former White House press secretary Jay Carney and some people thought it looked more like him than it did Snowden.
_	There has also been the view that Bosch's use of music here might be a rebuke against traveling minstrels, often thought of as purveyors of bawdy song and verse.
_	This means efficacy may actually depend on where that receptor is expressed, altering the view that efficacy at a receptor is receptor-independent property of a drug.
_	While the tactics of the race did not seem to work in the colt's favour (he was forced to lead much earlier than intended), some commentators were expressing the view that he had been rather overrated
_	Rabbi Joshua's response then expresses the view that the work of law is a work of human activity, and that the Torah itself supports this legal theory.
_	Local police took the view that they were looking for valuable Shakespeare manuscripts, which were rumoured to be hidden within the monument.
_	Regarding the mandates system under the League of Nations, held the view that the mandatory power had total sovereignty over the mandate territory.
_	Marx held the view that socialism—a system based on social ownership of the means of production—would enable progress toward the development of fully developed communism by further advancing productive technology.
_	Regarding the alleged human rights violations by the contras, however, the ICJ took the view that the United States could only be held accountable for them if it would have been proven that the U.S. had effective control of the contra operations resulting in these alleged violations.
_	The exclusion of same-sex partners from the benefits of s. 29 promotes the view that M., and individuals in same-sex relationships generally, are less worthy of recognition and protection.
_	Finally, Kripke gave an argument against identity materialism in the philosophy of mind, the view that every mental particular is identical with some physical particular.
_	Beardsworth argued that he was unaware of any obligation to run Birmingham in the race, the entry having been made by the colt's previous owner, Mr Mytton, but the Stewards of the Jockey Club took the view that the rules had been broken, and awarded the 1,000 sovereign prize to Cetus.
_	Thus, Protestant soteriology developed the view that each one of the elect (saved) experienced instantaneous glorification upon death.
_	Having reached the above conclusion, the Court takes the view that the Contras remain responsible for their acts, in particular the alleged violations by them of humanitarian law.
_	The alliance holds the view that, if the fishing industry is going to catch sharks, that sharks should be fished sustainably.
_	They named it Monarto and held the view that it would work as a kind of supporting city, where Adelaide residents could move.
_	Brown wrote in a 1989 article that was published in "Apocalypse and/or Metamorphosis" (1991) that "Spinoza" is the classic statement of the view that Spinoza's materialism and rejection of mind-body dualism are supportive of hope in scientific enlightenment and economic development.
_	There was also a discussion about the role of analogy in language, in this discussion the grammatici in Alexandria supported the view that language and especially morphology is based on analogy or paradigm, whereas the grammatic in schools in Asia Minor consider that language is not based on analogical bases but rather on exceptions.
_	Although local recruitment resulted in a growing British element in these regiments, the Batavi at least continued to recruit heavily in their native area and inscription evidence supports the view that many regiments had an international membership.
_	Evangelis Zappas participated in 1860 in the debate about Albanian being written and held the view that the language could not become a literary one but should not be abandoned and that a Greek based alphabet be used for Albanian in the Labovë school founded by him.
_	Drug prohibition law is based on the view that some drugs, notably opium poppy, coca, and substances derived from these plants, are so addictive or dependence inducing and so dangerous, in terms of potential effects on the health, morality and behaviour of users, that they should be rarely, if ever, used.
_	His thinking changed from the view that species formed in isolated populations only, as on islands, to an emphasis on speciation without isolation; that is, he saw increasing specialisation within large stable populations as continuously exploiting new ecological niches.
_	He also expressed the view that Tintin, Haddock, and Calculus' imprisonment in their Los Dopicos hotel reflected the "uneasy host-guest relationship" theme.
_	Dennett says that "Cartesian materialism is the view that there is a crucial finish line or boundary somewhere in the brain, marking a place where the order of arrival equals the order of 'presentation' in experience because what happens there is what you are conscious of."
_	Ancient Greek skeptics argued for "equipollence", the view that reasons for and against claims are equally balanced.
_	Scholtmeijer supports the view that the Nieuwleusen dialect does not share Sallaans features such as an umlaut in diminutives, or short or drawn-out vowels in certain words that have long vowels in North Overijssels (as in Southwest-South Drèents).
_	He opposed the scheme to introduce a graduated Income Tax and expressed the view that death duties could be "regarded as partaking to some extent of the nature of a deferred Income Tax".
_	He was then retired, with Hern expressing the view that the colt had never mentally fully recovered from his injury.
_	He expressed the view that the music of Handel and Bach was not improved when performed on modern pianos and was disparaging about the lack of sonority of 20th century revival harpsichords.
_	Between 1990 and 1997 the RCP developed the view that, more than capitalism itself, the danger facing humanity was the absence of a force for social change (in philosophical language, a "subject" of history), and the culture of low expectations that suppressed it.
_	Dr Ledwich took the view that the western end of the church was much older than the eastern end or the tower.
_	In "Consciousness in Action", as well as in many of her articles, Hurley defends vehicle externalism, the view that mental processes do not necessarily have to be explained in terms of internal processes.
_	In recent scholarship, Bart Ehrman has championed the view that in general, it is impossible to either prove or disprove supernatural events such as miracles using the historical method, for proving them would require belief in a supernatural world not amenable to historical analysis, and disproving them would require historical evidence that is usually hard to come by.
_	There, Stalin and Kamenev expressed the view that they were willing to temporarily back the new administration and accept the continuation of Russian involvement in the First World War so long as it was purely defensive.
_	According to Urban, Rajneesh's followers had succeeded in portraying him as a martyr, promoting the view that the Ranch "was crushed from without by the Attorney General's office ... like the marines in Lebanon, the Ranch was hit by hardball opposition and driven out."
_	On the other hand, the Greek historian Zacharias Tsirpanlis observes that while post-war Italian accounts confirm the view that "due to the Greek success Italian public opinion slowly turned against the Fascist regime, marking the beginning of the end for Mussolini", this did not yet materialize in any form of active resistance, including in the front itself.
_	While some scholars believe that Bayajidda was a historical figure, others hold the view that he did not actually exist, but is instead a personification of a group of immigrant people from a more or less distant region.
_	He had no sympathy for the view that to be scientific a linguistic analyst must progress by stepwise discovery from phonetics, to phonemics, to morphology, and so on, without "mixing levels."
_	He later deposed that he agreed only to save his father from debt, and was of the view that he could have used his influence with Cope to better personal advantage.
_	The biographical fallacy is a term used in cultural criticism to critique the view that works of creative art, literature or music can be interpreted as reflections of the life of their authors.
_	While the Appellants could have amended the Constitution as the Board members were all before the Court as Appellants, the Judges of Appeal were of the view that the Appellants’ subjective and objective intentions were clearly to register the College as a charity and not to create a new entity.
_	In "Yip Kok Seng v. Traditional Chinese Medicine Practitioners Board" (2010), the High Court expressed the view that due to the lack of a unified regime in Singapore for applying for prerogative orders and declarations, it was not an abuse of process for an applicant to seek redress for a public law right by way of a declaration instead of applying for a prerogative order.
_	In 2006 and 2009, Pence expressed the view that it was unclear whether global warming was driven by human activity, and in 2009 he told political commentator
_	Proponents of the view that PCS has a physiological basis point to findings that children demonstrate deficits on standardized tests of cognitive function following a mild TBI.
_	Similarly, in "Chng Suan Tze", the Court of Appeal rejected the view that the executive's accountability to Parliament is a sufficient safeguard against the arbitrary exercise of power.
_	The Division held the view that registration benefited the alien, who "is now safeguarded from bigoted persecution."
_	Some took the view that escapees were entitled to use force in the course of crossing the border, but (as in one case tried in a West Berlin court) others saw the guard's life as taking priority over an escapee's freedom.
_	Madhva, of the view that the Gita is as much a part of the religious canon as Upanishads or the Vedas, has authored two commentaries on it.
_	The Commission reported that it was "of the view that it will not be possible to maintain the Gaeltacht as an area in which Irish remains a community language unless a fundamental change occurs in the way Irish is treated and in the status of Irish in the rest of the country."
_	In these roles, she advanced the view that contraception "doesn't work", and criticized the use of the abortifacient mifepristone as well as emergency contraception.
_	The resolution took the view that "the allegations contained in the UN panel of experts' report warrant a full, impartial and transparent investigation".
_	In psychophysical experiments undertaken with colleagues, he showed that we perceive, and become aware of, different visual attributes at different times, with colour preceding motion by about 80 ms and form (orientation) by about 40 ms, leading to the view that there is a temporal asynchrony in vision which is the result of different processing speeds for different attributes.
_	The first comprehensive study of the language was undertaken by Manikku W. Sugathapala de Silva in 1959; he along with K. N. O Dharmadasa have put forward the view that Vedda is a Creole.
_	The Court took the view that the Corcoran Defendants' "failure to suspend the deletion policy or even investigate the basic ways in which emails were stored and deleted constitutes a serious discovery default on the part of the Corcoran Defendants and their counsel rising to the level of gross negligence or willfulness".
_	In the accompanying book of commentary, Del Mar defends in depth the view that ABA′ represents Beethoven's final intention; in other words, that conventional wisdom was right all along.
_	Contrary to the Court's suggestion, the NLRB has not embraced and then "repudiated" the view that, for purposes of § 8(a)(3), "periodic dues and initiation fees" mean only "those fees necessary to finance collective-bargaining activities."
_	While most media scholars uphold the view that the media in the USA is free and unbiased, a minority disagrees.
_	The Legislature, and subsequently the courts, took the view that the emphasis was on the verb "define" instead of the noun "gambling" such that all "gambling" continues to be illegal in Louisiana whereas ostensibly similar activities can be legalized as "gaming".
_	The Twelvers hold the view that the word "Ghanima" has two meanings as mentioned above, the second meaning is illustrated by the common use of the Islamic banking term "al-ghunm bil-ghurm" meaning "gains accompany liability for loss or risk".
_	Others—in the minority—are of the view that abdominal pregnancy should be defined by a placenta implanted into the peritoneum.
_	He is of the view that Lashkar-e-Tayyiba, Jaish-e-Muhammad, Al-Qaida and ISIS are perpetrating atrocities, brazenly violating Islam in the name of Islam, Jihad and Khilafat.
_	This was chiefly due to the concern that secular nationalism would replace the Jewish faith and the observance of religion, and the view that it was forbidden for the Jews to re-constitute Jewish rule in the Land of Israel before the arrival of the Messiah.
_	The park board has banned the erection of any further memorials to ensure that Stanley Park is kept in a more natural state (and based on the view that it is already saturated).
_	The line was operating at a small profit at this time but despite protests British Railways took the view that the cost of a new bridge was an unreasonably large investment.
_	Oderberg provides a detailed defence of the view that abortion is morally wrong because the fetus is an innocent life, and intentionally taking an innocent life is always morally wrong.
_	The four dissenting justices expressed the view that "when counsel and police have agreed defendant is not to be questioned until counsel is present and defendant has been advised not to talk and repeatedly has stated he will tell the whole story after he talks with counsel, the state should be required to make a stronger showing of intentional voluntary waiver than was made here."
_	Hopper sympathised with the view that Bindman was treated "disproportionately because of his stature in the profession".
_	The recent award-winning documentary "Genocide Revealed" (2011), by Canadian-Ukrainian director Yurij Luhovy, presents evidence for the view that Stalin and his cohorts in the Communist regime (not necessarily the Russian people as a whole) deliberately targeted Ukrainians in the mass starvation of 1932–1933.
_	This documentary reinforces the view that the Holodomor was indeed an act of genocide.
_	He expressed the view that "there are not only magical rites which are not sympathetic, but neither is sympathy a prerogative of magic, since there are sympathetic practices in religion".
_	“we are also of the view that a comparison between export price and normal value that does not take fully into account the prices of all comparable export transactions – such as the practice of “zeroing” at issue in this dispute – is not a “fair comparison” between export price and normal value, as required by Article 2.4 and by Article 2.4.2.;
_	Like Ibn Mada, Gharnati denied the existence of linguistic causality, instead holding the view that language, like all other things, is caused by God.
_	This is the view that prevailed for the next three centuries following St. Thomas' death.
_	Danny took the view that a young prop should have his share of bad experiences before trying to inflict them on other people."
_	From there he officially proclaimed a revolution, a proclamation which held the view that wars and oppression had ruined the country and the government therefore had to be overthrown.
_	In addition, he enunciated the view that the "secret women's business" of the Ngarrindjeri women during the Hindmarsh Island bridge controversy was a fabrication, and came to the defence of the murdered Dutch politician Pim Fortuyn who called on Muslim immigrants to assimilate into Dutch society and culture.
_	Several scholars like P. K. Narayana Pillai and P. Govinda Pillai hold the view that Cherusseri was the name of the Namboothiri's ancestral house ("Illam").
_	Many campaigners share the view that just because Rackheath achieved the best rating out of the 10 sites chosen, doesn't mean that it is a good site.
_	When he is found dead in a stream, with a still-wet half-finished painting on the bank above, it is assumed that he fell in accidentally, fracturing his skull – though a doctor is of the view that the death may have taken place hours earlier, possibly during the previous night.
_	These laws have been cited as contributing to wider homophobic attitudes among the Jamaican populace, including the view that gay people are criminals regardless of whether or not they have committed any criminal act.
_	The Menon Constitutional Commission declined to recommend that political endorsements be prohibited, expressing the view that "[p]olitical parties are likely to have strong and potentially relevant views on the merits or demerits of Presidential candidates.
_	The exclusion of same-sex partners from the benefits of s. 29 promotes the view that M., and individuals in same-sex relationships generally, are less worthy of recognition and protection.
_	In a liberal interpretation of Hegel's "Philosophy of Right", he developed the view that "bifurcation" is the constitutive structure of the modern world and a necessary precondition for the universal realization of individual freedom.
_	The idea of nondualism is typically contrasted with dualism, with dualism defined as the view that the universe and the nature of existence consists of two realities, such as the God and the world, or as God and Devil, or as mind and matter, and so on.
_	This gave rise to the view that the Russian Jew was morally and socially degenerative, which in turn fuelled a rise in "anti-alienism".
_	He was of the view that if they became fully autonomous, then they would end up being controlled by the most reactionary elements of their community; as an example he cited the largely illiterate Tatars, whom he claimed would end up dominated by their mullahs.
_	McNairn considered Childe's Marxism to be "an individual interpretation" that differed from "popular or orthodox" conceptions of Marxism; Trigger called him a "a creative Marxist thinker"; Gathercole was of the view that while Childe's "debt to Marx was quite evident", his "attitude to Marxism was at times ambivalent".
_	The Speaker, Capt. Edward Fitzroy, took the view that: "Both were so thoroughly disorderly, that I propose to ignore them if the hon.
_	On the other hand, the increased knowledge of Gambetta's attitude towards European politics which later information has supplied confirms the view that in him France lost prematurely a master mind, whom she could ill spare.
_	In 2004, Stephen Schlesinger wrote, "Among historians, the verdict about White is still unresolved, but many incline toward the view that he wanted to help the Russians but did not regard the actions he took as constituting espionage."
_	They state also that "Our... objection to using Matthew 5:27-30 as a basis for the blanket condemnation of masturbation is that such an interpretation can only be supported by de-contextualizing this passage from Jesus’ overall message... [and]... proper contextual interpretation of Leviticus 15:16-18 would therefore support the view that masturbation in and of itself is morally neutral."
_	Agnosticism is the view that the truth values of certain claims – especially metaphysical and religious claims such as whether God, the divine or the supernatural exist – are unknown and perhaps unknowable.
_	He also held to the view that "No work which cannot be done with pleasure in the doing is worth doing", and adopted as his personal motto "If I can" from the fifteenth-century Flemish painter Jan van Eyck.
_	Then Iraq Ambassador to the United Nations Mohammed Aldouri shared the view that the invasion was a violation of international law and constituted a war of aggression, as did a number of American legal experts, including Marjorie Cohn, Professor at Thomas Jefferson School of Law and president of the National Lawyers Guild and former Attorney-General of the United States Ramsey Clark.
_	A stud wall now blocks the view that was formerly available from an upstairs viewing area onto the main hall (this vewing area has been converted in part to an office and in part left as open space).
_	Similarly a stud wall blocks the view that was formerly available from the mezzanine level projection room into the main hall.
_	They also took the view that the reduction in traffic resulting from the tram would not be as high as that claimed by TfL, citing TfL's own impact studies of Croydon Tramlink.
_	Prostitution was generally tolerated and taxed during this period, the rulers taking the view that prohibition would not stop prostitution and that tax revenue would be lost.
_	Rogers also discusses this issue in her book "Anselm on Freedom", using the term "four-dimensionalism" rather than "eternalism" for the view that "the present moment is not ontologically privileged", and commenting that "Boethius and Augustine do sometimes sound rather four-dimensionalist, but Anselm is apparently the first consistently and explicitly to embrace the position."
_	Due to the view that God exists within everyone, Rastas believe that all members of the religion are intrinsically connected, and thereby regard statements like "you and I" as being insignificant.
_	The skin of the single specimen of "Eledone microsicya" is very similar to the skin of "Eledone moschata" and some authorities take the view that "E. microsicya" is not a valid taxon and represents a Red Sea population of the otherwise Mediteraranean "E. moschata" with which it should synonymised.
_	She took the view that it is best, if the leaders of such a revolution would perish, so that the people would not be burdened with surviving general staff.
_	In February 2000 UCKG Pastor Álvaro Lima saw the girl and expressed the view that she was possessed by an evil spirit, saying in a written statement to the inquiry that Victoria had told him "that Satan controlled her life, that Satan had told her to burn her body".
_	The Atonement: Taylor repudiated the view that Christ died upon the cross as a direct sin sacrifice for the sins of Christians.
_	A view of Corra Linn in 1799 – 1800 taken from Stoddarts "Remarks on Scottish scenery" gives some idea of the view that visitors would have seen in the 18th-century.
_	The tribunal took the view that any person directly affected by a decision, or a third party who wished to bring proceedings in the public interest, could bring a case in the tribunal.
_	Some have the view that the Chinese Communist government is invincible and justified at all cases.
_	Also, just before the anniversary her son's condition had taken a turn for the worse, and the view that the tercentenary celebrations was an ideal possibility to improve public opinion of the Tsarina, she was only perceived as arrogant and cold.
_	it promoted the view that the entire unfolding was part of a universal plan, a working out of an eternal historical dialectic, as theorized by Hegel.
_	Among other media industry reactions, Creative America was of the view that "[t]hey've misidentified this issue as an issue about your Internet, your Internet is being jeopardized.
_	One example is the view that minerals are "designed" to be used by plants that are in turn "designed" to be used by animals.
_	... the appeal court may exercise its own discretion in substitution for that of the primary judge only where it is clearly of the view that his decision is not in accordance with the welfare of the child either because he was mistaken as to the facts, or because he took into account irrelevant matters or attached too much weight to some matter or because he failed to take account or sufficient account of some material consideration
_	The author of the First Epistle of Peter identifies himself in the opening verse as "Peter, an apostle of Jesus Christ", and the view that the epistle was written by St. Peter is attested to by a number of Church Fathers: Irenaeus (140–203), Tertullian (150–222), Clement of Alexandria (155–215) and Origen of Alexandria (185–253).
_	Though the introduction, by journalist P. R. Stephensen, described "The Well"s moral argument as "feeble" and dismissed Havelock Ellis as a "psychopath", "The Sink" itself endorsed the view that lesbianism was innate:
_	Observed differences in the neural pattern of dyslexic patients, namely decreased activation in the left and posterior midfrontal gyrus (LMG, PMG) and superior parietial regions of the brain further supports the view that deficits in working memory contribute to dyslexia.
_	The obscurity of most of the ridiculed poets and the attack upon such personal characteristics as appearance and manners has been cited in support of the view that the parody was done in the presence of all twelve victims, further supporting the conclusion that the parody was good-natured.
_	Cooper advanced the view that it was the duty of educated and successful black women to support their underprivileged peers in achieving their goals.
_	Verma was of the view that an administrator has to work within limitations.
_	Gimson expressed the view that "people love him because he makes them laugh", noting that he had become "the darling of the Tory rank and file".
_	Like Marxism, Christian communism also holds the view that capitalism encourages the negative aspects of humans, supplanting values such as mercy, kindness, justice and compassion in favor of greed, selfishness and blind ambition.
_	Some have argued that this is also one of the reasons why it is hard for the historians to agree on Kita’s political stance, though Nik Howard takes the view that Kita's ideas were actually highly consistent ideologically throughout his career, with relatively small shifts in response to the changing reality he faced at any given time.
_	Russell continued to defend logicism, the view that mathematics is in some important sense reducible to logic, and along with his former teacher, Alfred North Whitehead, wrote the monumental "Principia Mathematica", an axiomatic system on which all of mathematics can be built.
_	In his 1987 book, "Freedom Under Siege", Paul expressed the view that those who experience sexual harassment in the work force should remedy the situation by quitting their jobs.
_	By 2006, he held the view that, in the "battle to save western civilisation", the "Left, in any recognisable form, is now the enemy".
_	The most common argument against mereological essentialism is the view that it cannot be universally true.
_	One of Smith's associates that was present at the conference expressed the view that this ordination "consisted [of] the endowment--it being a new order--and bestowed authority", and later that year, an early convert who had left the church claimed that many of the Saints "have been ordained to the High Priesthood, or the order of Melchizedek; and profess to be endowed with the same power as the ancient apostles were".
_	Against the background of the ongoing debate on the complete digitization of photo archives and the frequent demands thus being made for the gradual winding up of photo archives and their conversion into digital and internet searchable forms, the "Florence Declaration" supports the view that, while the digitization of photographic collections is undoubtedly an aim worth pursuing, digital photos can only in part replace the original photographic print.
_	Khan subsequently stated that he had no plans to revive the cancelled tram scheme, and he expressed the view that improved Tube services and the extension of the London Overground through south London suburbs, along with the proposed re-opening of Camberwell railway station, would meet the transport needs along the corridor that would have been served by the Cross River Tram.
_	Nei has long maintained the view that the driving force of evolution is mutation including any types of DNA changes (nucleotide changes, chromosomal changes, and genome duplication) and natural selection is merely a force eliminating less fit genotypes (theory of mutation-driven evolution).
_	LaVey espoused the view that god is a creation of man, rather than man being a creation of god.
_	Before 2000, arguments that the Deccan Traps flood basalts caused the extinction were usually linked to the view that the extinction was gradual, as the flood basalt events were thought to have started around 68 Ma and lasted for over 2 million years.
_	Some of these leaders, such as Netaji, did not subscribe to the view that non-violent civil disobedience was the only way to achieve Indian Independence, and allied with Japan to fight against the British.
_	Socrates seems to argue for the view that success is directly proportional to knowledge (though knowledge may not be "sufficient" for complete success), as opposed to being dependent merely on fortune or divine dispensation, independent of knowledge.
_	Despite her careful efforts to insulate her singing from public exposure, a preponderance of contemporaneous opinion favored the view that Jenkins's self-delusion was genuine.
_	This is based on the view that in the long run financial markets give a good rate of return even while taking into account a degree of volatility.
_	Similar to the King James Only view is the view that translations must be derived from the Textus Receptus of the late Middle Ages or early Renaissance in order to be considered inerrant.
_	Referencing the Knesset's basic law that Israel will be a Jewish and democratic state, Shaked opposes the view that the two values are in any way incompatible, arguing that "alongside the view that there is a constant struggle and a clash of civilizations between “Jewish” and “democratic,” I believe we can propose another model."
_	He took the view that the test should be stated in terms of "real danger rather than real likelihood to ensure that the court is thinking in terms of possibility rather than probability of bias".
_	A number of authors have expressed the view that Aiwass was most likely an unconscious manifestation of Crowley's personality.
_	The Football League also took the view that a spread of talent was necessary to sustain the interest of spectators in the competition.
_	They approached the G&SWR with a request to subscribe the difference, but the G&SWR took the view that any advantages would come to the inhabitants themselves, and it was for them to put up the money.
_	Keiting argues that Islam was supersessionist from its inception, advocating the view that the Quranic revelations would "replace the corrupted scriptures possessed by other communities", and that early Islamic scriptures display a "clear theology of revelation that is concerned with establishing the credibility of the nascent community" viz-a-viz other religions.
_	Some less-involved observers in the media have expressed the view that although Michaud's comments were borderline and controversial as they could be interpreted as trivialization of the Shoah, the comparisons made by his accusers to notable antisemites like Ernst Zündel were excessive and exaggerated Michaud's intent.
_	In June 2013, he presented a series of 12 15-minute radio programmes (following the daily "World at One" news programme) on BBC Radio 4 called "1913 – the Year Before", about the state of Britain in the years preceding World War I, challenging the view that these years were optimistic and cheerful.
_	The Irish Free State never formally adopted the Statute of Westminster, its Executive Council taking the view that the Anglo-Irish Treaty of 1921 had already ended Westminster's right to legislate for the Free State.
_	Kenneth Tynan expressed the view that it succeeded because Olivier built the role to a climax at the end of the play, whereas most actors spend all they have in the first two acts.
_	Following his execution, efforts were made to clear his name, and in the 1990s old evidence was re-examined with modern forensic techniques which supported the view that Ross was innocent.
_	Some people are of the view that he died from homicide whereas others suspected suicide (details are still sketchy).
_	Cardiognosis ("knowledge of the heart") from Eastern Christianity related to the tradition of the staretz and in Roman Catholic theology is the view that only God knows the condition of one's relationship with God.
_	The expert committee of the ANSM took the view that this was insufficient basis for commencing human trials, and that further evidence of BIA 10-2474 as an analgesic was warranted.
_	When Malcolm Canmore defeated and slew Macbeth in 1057 he married the dead king's relative Ingibiorg, a Pictish princess, (the view that there were Picts in Galloway in historical times can not be wholly rejected) an event which marked the beginning of the decay of Norse influence.
_	He took the view that a hard and fast rule prohibiting all transactions was unnecessary and could be unjust.
_	However, Eyal Zisser, director of the Moshe Dayan Center for Middle Eastern and African Studies at Tel Aviv University, took a contrary position and expressed the view that the war was in fact a strategic success for Israel and a Hezbollah defeat.
_	However, in 2010 he repudiated that stance, taking the view that New Zealand should move towards a republic once the Queen's reign ends.
_	Sharma and colleagues used combination of high resolution imaging and mathematical modeling to provide the view that raft proteins are organized into high density nanoclusters with radii ranging over 5–20 nm.
_	Friedman was of the view that the main policy to be avoided is countercyclical monetary policy, the standard Keynesian policy recommendation at the time.
_	Proponents of distributed neuronal processing may likely dispute the view that consciousness has a precise localization in the brain.
_	Community colleges would have drawn from the same city coffers that were funding the senior colleges, and city higher education officials were of the view that the state should finance them.
_	Queen Aishwarya, though initially opposed the relationship due to family ties and the view that Supriya would be incompetent as a queen, as to which expressions by the Queen were heard by an aide, nevertheless favored Supriya over Devyani Rana, since if Supriya became Queen, the Shah dynasty would not have to share its power with the Ranas, entailing formation of an unwanted political alliance.
_	As we have also said, the absence of an explanation as to how the suitcase was taken into the system at Luqa is a major difficulty for the Crown case, but after taking full account of that difficulty, we remain of the view that the primary suitcase began its journey at Luqa.
_	In his 1994 anthology he defended the view that people from poor villages perceived conservation very differently from the powerful people in governments and NGOs and insisted that their voice be heard before policies were implemented.
_	Together, this coalition shares the view that communication about businesses' value creation should be the next step in the evolution of corporate reporting'.
_	"While the IOC is of the view that the display of the boxing kangaroo at the Olympic village is a breach of the IOC rules relating to clean venues, the IOC is not going to request us to take down the boxing kangaroo flag on this occasion," Coates said.
_	Despite the heavy presence of pro-American figures in the cabinet and Quwatli's initially warm ties with the US, relations between the two countries began to unravel amid the nascent Cold War and the view that Quwatli was becoming a detriment to US interests in the region.
_	He agrees with the view that there are four kingdoms: Mineral, Plant, Animal, Human.
_	Polomé accepts the view that Albanian is descended from Illyrian but considers the evidence inconclusive.
_	The American Psychological Association's report "" stated that IQ tests do correlate and that the view that "g" is a statistical artifact is a minority one.
_	An otherwise not unsympathetic review in August 1967 described the car as a "Volksstrassenkreuzer", and expressed the view that such a “peoples’ boulevard cruiser” might be out of tune with the spirit of the marketplace, at least in Europe.
_	Although the site has no recorded history, the local tradition concerning Dùn Anlaimh appears to support the view that it was occupied in the Late Middle Ages.
_	However, numerous molecular studies have consistently shown the two species to be very closely related, supporting the view that they are in the same family.
_	In philosophy of mind, epiphenomenalism is the view that mental phenomena are epiphenomena in that they can be caused by physical phenomena, but cannot cause physical phenomena.
_	Instead, he advanced the view that by considering the audience, the author is reminded of the social nature of studying composition.
_	However, by this time, the view that birth should take place in hospital had become more normalised.
_	Alex Salmond, Scotland's First Minister and leader of the Scottish National Party, agreed with the view that the BBC was biased in favour of retaining the union.
_	Plato in "Theaetetus" had noted that "some say all things are said to be relative" and Speusippus, his nephew and successor at the Academy maintained the view that "... a thing cannot be known apart from the knowledge of other things, for to know what a thing is, we must know how it differs from other things".
_	Based on a re-estimation of the number of settlers, some have taken the view that it is highly unlikely that the British Celtic-speaking population was substantially displaced by the Anglo-Saxons and that instead a process of acculturation took place, with an Anglo-Saxon ruling elite imposing their culture on the local populations.
_	In response to Nolte's article "Between Myth and Revisionism", Israeli historian Otto Dov Kulka in a letter to Nolte on November 24, 1985 criticized Nolte for abandoning the view that he expressed in "The Three Faces of Fascism" that the Holocaust was a "singular" event, and asked "Which of the two Ernst Noltes should we regard as the authentic one?"
_	Toby E. Huff takes the view that, although science in the Islamic world did produce innovations, it did not lead to a scientific revolution, which in his view required an ethos that existed in Europe in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries, but not elsewhere in the world.
_	This, they argue, supports the view that "g" is biological and heritable.
_	The development of the view that Shaka was the monster responsible for the devastation is based on the need of apartheid era historians to justify the apartheid regime's racist policies according to Julian Cobbing.
_	Liberal governments, for their part, have long adhered to the view that the Governor General does not have the right to refuse dissolution from the prime minister.
_	He also expressed skepticism about the efficacy of John Ericssons revolutionary design of the monitor , expressing the view that "Monitor" would sink as soon as she was launched.
_	Phenomenalism is the view that physical objects, properties, events (whatever is physical) are reducible to mental objects, properties, events.
_	In his standard work about PIE and to a greater extent in a later abbreviated version, Karl Brugmann took the view that the urheimat could not be identified exactly at that time, but he tended toward Schrader's view.
_	Throughout the development of the banana, the developers took the view that conventional hybridization is more important than alternative means, such as genetic engineering.
_	In 1956, Szasz and Hollender introduced three models of paternalism to the medical community, thereby legitimizing the view that doctors did not necessarily have to dominate patients.
_	Scientists have resolved these questions decisively in favour of the view that the current warming trend exists and is ongoing, that human activity is the cause, and that it is without precedent in at least 2000 years.
_	The committee also endorsed the view that "all Jews are religiously equal regardless of their sexual orientation."
_	His understanding of magic was also influenced by the work of the anthropologist James Frazer, in particular the view that magic was a precursor to science in a cultural evolutionary framework.
_	Although it might have been impractical and unwise for code breaking to have taken place on board ship, members of Room 40 were of the view that full use was not being made of the information they had collected, because of the extreme secrecy and being forbidden to exchange information with the other intelligence departments or those planning operations.
_	Justice Holmes was of the view that the doctrine was in opposition to common sense.
_	The ego-defensive notion correlates nicely with Downward Comparison Theory which holds the view that derogating a less fortunate other increases our own subjective well-being.
_	Commercial off-the-shelf parts have been used extensively in the vehicle, with the view that this will reduce the need for crew training and logistics problems.
_	According to Jackson Spielvogel, 'Male scientists used the new science to spread the view that women were by nature inferior and subordinate to men and suited to play a domestic role as nurturing mothers.
_	Some historians hold the view that during the reign of the Mughals, a number of upper caste Hindus who were educated and endowed with sharp intellect attained administrative positions through rapid adaptation to the Persian language and culture of the new rulers of South Asia.
_	Some historians are of the view that the Thrikkakkara inscription is the oldest.
_	In their 2008 book "Northern Ireland After the Troubles", Colin Coulter and Michael Murray referenced the biography and stated it puts forth "the view that Morrison's persona has been shaped by a specifically Ulster Protestant sensibility".
_	He was of the view that even if girls get educated they must finally get married and serve their husbands.
_	A poll conducted by Gallup Pakistan in 2011 shows that an overwhelming majority of Pakistanis held the view that separation from India was justified in 1947.
_	The Government, advised by SABC technicians, took the view that colour television would have to be available so as to avoid a costly migration from black-and-white broadcasting technology.
_	A National Audit Office study in 2003 endorsed the view that PFI projects represent good value for taxpayers' money, but some commentators have criticised PFI for allowing excessive profits for private companies at the expense of the taxpayer.
_	The government took the view that he was not in breach of the Constitution as the registration was not made with Canavan's knowledge or consent.
_	Dr. George Irumbayam is of the view that the romantic elements in the novel are intertwined with the realistic legibility of historical elements.
_	By matching the orbit of the International Space Station to that of Vostok 1 as closely as possible, in terms of ground path and time of day, documentary filmmaker Christopher Riley and ESA astronaut Paolo Nespoli were able to film the view that Yuri Gagarin saw on his pioneering orbital space flight.
_	Other scholars, such as the Soviet historians Mkrtich G. Nersisyan, Ruben Sahakyan, John Kirakosyan, and Yehuda Bauer subscribe to the view that the mass killings of 1894–96 during the Hamidian massacre were the first phase of the Armenian Genocide.
_	Politically, Stockhausen, like his predecessor, supported the view that royal orders concerning personnel issues (such as promotions) constitutionally had to be counter-signed by the minister of war.
_	The sentiment that criminal activities such as Picariello's were the inevitable result of prohibition laws became a popular one, as did the view that the government should legalize and regulate liquor sales.
_	Bowden expressed the view that while Crawford "had a quick temper, which he strove to control ... he was essentially a friendly man", adding that he could be "clubbable, hospitable and kind".
_	Evidence for the view that continence was expected of clergy in the early Church is given by the Protestant historian Philip Schaff, who points out that all marriages contracted by clerics in Holy Orders were declared null and void in 530 by Emperor Justinian I, who also declared the children of such marriages illegitimate.
_	Edwards has championed the view that drug discovery advances would be made more rapidly within an open access research environment in which no patents are filed, and materials and ideas are exchanged without restriction on use.
_	A number of parties were concerned with the effect the Act would have on individual human rights, and the Green Party expressed the view that enforcement agencies were already abusing their powers.
_	The protection of the moral rights of an author is based on the view that a creative work is in some way an expression of the author’s personality: the moral rights are therefore personal to the author, and cannot be transferred to another person except by testament when the author dies.
_	Earlier experts held the view that since Kuno Wildlife Sanctuary already had Bengal tigers present, introduction of the Asiatic lion may lead to conflict between the two apex predators.
_	McKinsey’s survey supports the view that organisations with a formal process report higher success rates.
_	By 1840, dueling had declined dramatically; when the 7th Earl of Cardigan was acquitted on a legal technicality for homicide in connection with a duel with one of his former officers, outrage was expressed in the media, with "The Times" alleging that there was deliberate, high level complicity to leave the loop-hole in the prosecution case and reporting the view that "in England there is one law for the rich and another for the poor" and "The Examiner" describing the verdict as "a defeat of justice".
_	During the course of the siege of the fortress of Massaga, Alexander was of the view that the taking of Massaga would strike the tribes in the surrounding territory with fear as to his power and ability.
_	A friend of Le Gros Clark, Wood Jones was also known for his controversial belief in the view that acquired traits could be inherited, and thus his opposition to Darwinism.
_	British NGOs such as ONE and Save the children had expressed the view that it would be good if Mr Cameron could contribute to the international momentum building to tackle hunger and malnutrition; Britain is due to assume the presidency of the G8 in 2013.
_	Leopold Prowe contributed to the view that Copernicus had German origins.
_	Paglia further argued that the introduction of politics into literary criticism ("e.g.", the view that no book which demeans women can be great literature) can enable a dangerous and Stalinist view of art wherein all art is "subordinate to a prefab political agenda".
_	During the Cold War, wrote Thomas Aiello the United States often characterized its opponents as "godless communists", which tended to reinforce the view that atheists were unreliable and unpatriotic.
_	A cessationist is not prepared to accept the authority of new prophets precisely because it would commit them to the view that the authority of new prophets is the same as that of biblical prophets such as Jeremiah and John.
_	Parmenides adopted an altogether contrary vision, arguing for the idea of changeless Being and the view that change is an illusion.
_	Ranariddh espoused the view that economic development should take precedence over democratic and human rights.
_	Panpsychism is the view that all matter has a mental aspect, or, alternatively, all objects have a unified center of experience or point of view.
_	The title Malik al-Mashriq wa'l-Ṣīn was bestowed by the 'Abbāsid Caliph upon the Tamghaj Khan, the Samarqand Khaqan Yūsuf b. Ḥasan and after that coins and literature had the title Tamghaj Khan appear on them and were continued to be used by the Qarakhanids and the Transoxania-based Western Qarakhanids and some Eastern Qarakhanid monarchs, so therefore the Kara-Khitan (Western Liao)'s usage of Chinese things such as Chinese coins, the Chinese writing system, tablets, seals, Chinese art products like porcelein, mirrors, jade and other Chinese customs were designed to appearl to the local Central Asian Muslim population since the Muslims in the area regarded Central Asia as former Chinese territories and viewed links with China as prestigious and Western Liao's rule over Muslim Central Asia caused the view that Central Asia was a Chinese territory to reinforce upon the Muslims; "Turkestan" and Chīn (China) were identified with each other by Fakhr al-Dīn Mubārak Shāh with China being identified as the country where the cities of Balāsāghūn and Kashghar were located.
_	Matheson (2008) offers the view that deeply personal information can be related to sensitivity.
_	It rejects the view that any person can "obtain" the status of God whether by works or by grace, maintaining that Jesus Christ did not "obtain" his status, but rather that he is the one, eternal God himself manifested in the flesh according to the Oneness Pentecostal interpretation of 1 Timothy 3:16, as is rendered in the King James Version.
_	In September 2017, Black was placed at Number 77 in 'The 100 Most Influential People on the Left' by commentator Iain Dale - a fall of 18 places on the previous year, which Dale attributed to the view that: "Her second year in Parliament has been quieter than her first."
_	Several scholars to have studied the charm, such as Godfrid Storms and Howell D. Chickering Jr., expressed the view that it referred to rheumatism.
_	He also criticised the decision: “We were asking the High Court to look at the section in view of its purpose and history, the High Court instead took the view that the section should be read with a very strict, almost brutal literalism."
_	The term is particularly offensive to supporters of Taiwan Independence and want to disassociate Taiwan with "China" and a Chinese identity, (i.e., de-Sinicize), and consider it an oxymoron, i.e. in the view that Taiwan and China are different countries, and that the legitimacy of the ROC's rule of Taiwan is disputed in the first place.
_	Then, a hefty discussion followed as Gajah Mada held the view that the Sundanese should act as vassals, just like any other vassals from Nusantara.
_	Gestalt psychologists hold the view that rules of organization must exist in accordance to the retinal projections of three-dimensional forms which happen to form three-dimensional percepts.
_	Research suggests that the ice was everywhere grounded and not floating; this is consistent with the view that sea-level at the LGM was around 120m lower than it is today.
_	A 2016 paper challenges the view that cultural differences are necessarily an obstacle to long-run economic performance of migrants.
_	Burnett may simply have taken the view that it was reasonable for people to assume the things they do and the word of a naval officer trained to give accurate reports was a credible source.
_	The name of the nearby Chapel Well lends support to the view that a chapel dedicated to St. Mary once stood here.
_	The Mozarabic rite continued to be practiced at San Juan, and the view that Sancho spread the Cluniac usage to other houses in his kingdom has been discredited by Justo Pérez de Urbel.
_	According to Black's Law Dictionary, efficient breach theory is "the view that a party should be allowed to breach a contract and pay damages, if doing so would be more economically efficient than performing under the contract."
_	The Court found broad acceptance for the view that a "ne exeat" right, or a right to prevent a child's removal from his country of residence, is roughly equal to "joint custody" and is, thus, a "right of custody."
_	However, James dies suddenly of a heart attack and Lady Place is rented out, with the view that Titus, once grown up, will return to the home and run the business.
_	Earlier in the debates he voted for the second reading, but also backed what was seen as a "wrecking amendment" and expressed the view that marriage was "traditionally ordained by God as between one man and one woman".
_	In a 1998 commencement speech at Andrews University, Carson publicly expressed the view that the Pyramids of Giza were not tombs, but grain silos built by Joseph, the Biblical son of Jacob, in preparation for the famine depicted in the Book of Genesis.
_	These support the view that wild king cobras generally have a mild temperament, and despite their frequent occurrence in disturbed and built-up areas, are adept at avoiding humans.
_	Later that same year he preached a sermon which put forward the view that the moral teaching of the Church was being undermined.
_	By October 1932, Strauss was writing openly to Herbert Samuel expressing the view that the Liberal Party could not be revived by adopting the slogan ‘Back to Free Trade’ and that this policy was only one of a number of important issues which needed the government action.
_	Ruskin's biographers Tim Hilton and John Batchelor also take the view that menstruation is the more likely explanation, though Batchelor also suggests that body-odour may have been the problem.
_	Rejected the idea of kinship (who the Elbow-high could claim due to his marriage to Hedwig of Kalisz), it seems justified the view that in the early 1290s (certainly before January 1293, when Przemysł II became involved with the Elbow-high) a treaty was signed in which the ruler of Greater Poland give rights of succession to the Duke of Głogów.
_	In his researches on the bleaching compounds of chlorine he was the first to advance the view that bleaching-powder is a double compound of calcium chloride and hypochlorite; and he devoted much time to the problem of economically obtaining soda and potash from seawater, though here his efforts were nullified by the discovery of the much richer sources of supply afforded by the Stassfurt deposits.
_	In her book "Voices of Diversity: Multi-Culturalism in America", Mary C. Sengstock, a sociologist from Wayne State University, describes the CARM website as one of those continuing a tradition of religious prejudice, because it puts forward the view that Roman Catholics are not Christians.
_	According to the view that is widespread among the Russian music public, I am associated with the party that is antagonistic to the one living Russian composer I love and value above all others—Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov.
_	This comprehensive approach reflects the view that the Islamic tradition is better understood and appreciated within a framework of what French historians might call 'total history'."
_	Based in part on the notoriety of the mock trial, academics sympathetic to the view that Plummer was innocent, petitioned the Montana Board of Pardons and Parole to grant Plummer a pardon.
_	Findings from all of the cultural eras support the view that the Großbottwar area has been inhabited continuously since the Stone Age.
_	(This further supports the view that it was his disciples who wrote his comments.)
_	In the late 1970s the editorial stance of "Diario de Navarra" supported the view that the province of Navarre should remain part of Spain and be independent of Euskadi.
_	Because evolutionary naturalism proposes an empirical account of morality, it does not require morality to exist objectively; Linville considers the view that this will lead to moral scepticism or antirealism.
_	In recent decades, however, scholarship has gravitated to the view that the period was in fact one of prosperity and glorious elite culture, but that it "ended" with a severe crisis, possibly having to do with the 535‒536 CE atmospheric dust event and the concomitant famine.
_	Eliminativism about a class of entities is the view that that class of entities does not exist.
_	The KAF secretary general, Lee Eui-jae, said participants in the meeting all shared the view that Miss Oh's photographs on Kangchenjunga did not "seem to match the actual landscape" and that "Oh's previous explanations on the process of her ascent to Kangchenjunga are unreliable".
_	The Supreme Court rejected the view that each claim in a patent is necessarily a separate invention, and concluded that a patent specification must be read as a whole when identifying the invention in the patent and determining whether the patent satisfies the disclosure requirement.
_	The King was of the view that there was as much reason to convict the Dowager Duchess of treason as there had been to convict Dereham.
_	In August 2008, Rais said Malaysia took the view that Singapore was not entitled to claim an Exclusive Economic Zone around Pedra Branca as it considered that the maritime feature did not meet internationally recognised criteria for an island, that is, land inhabited by humans that had economic activity.
_	According to the 1972 study by Jean Lipman-Blumen, women who grew up following traditional gender roles from childhood were less likely to want to be highly educated while women brought up with the view that men and women are equal were more likely to want higher education.
_	By now Kaukonen was offering the view that the "blood-stained banders" of the lyric was an allusion to the Ku Klux Klan.
_	It also held the view that parliamentary and presidential elections were a step forward in strengthening the country's democracy.
_	Individualist feminism as well as sex-positive feminism is attempting to change the view that the male is the active member of sex by creating an equality between the two so that male and female are both passive and active.
_	The concept of a worknet has evolved from the view that although many applications currently exist on the Internet as stand alone applications to do business and work together (such as Google Docs) most are scattered and thus create a "foggy workspace" for cross-organizational and interpersonal cooperation.
_	Some traditional commentators hold the view that this describes an actual event at the time of the Prophet, but it clearly refers to the end of the world.
_	Three main models of lexical recognition exist in current research: first, whole-word access, which argues that words have a whole-word representation in the lexicon; second, decomposition, which argues that morphologically complex words are broken down into their morphemes (roots, stems, inflections, etc.) and then interpreted and; third, the view that whole-word and decomposition models are both used, but that the whole-word model provides some computational advantages and is therefore dominant in lexical recognition.
_	He thought of jazz as a dance idiom and in a 1924 essay expressed the view that no one, including Stravinsky and Auric, had yet successfully blended jazz and art music.
_	In it, he puts forward the view that the theosophic philosophy of Kabbalah could be of great use in the defence of Christianity and the reconciliation of science with the mysteries of faith.
_	In his acceptance speech, Nolte commented, "We should leave behind the view that the opposite of National Socialist goals is always good and right", while suggesting that excessive "Jewish" support for communism furnished the Nazis with "rational reasons" for their anti-Semitism.
_	After some time, Wilkins would pay off the mortgage and hang on to his land but the experience left him with the view that farming was the only reliable way to have a secure living.
_	There was no reference to the Arab population of Palestine, and, according to Anita Shapira, marked a transition to the view that conflict was inevitable between the Arabs and Jews, and could only resolved by the sword.
_	While conventional accounts of meaning took expressions to have just one feature (reference), Frege introduced the view that expressions have two different aspects of significance: their sense and their reference.
_	Although descriptions can vary somewhat, common to all these cultures is the view that the wendigo is a malevolent, cannibalistic, supernatural being.
_	In August 1990 Nadir came to the view that the company was undervalued and then announced that he was taking it private.
_	Ofcom was of the view that the majority of the audience would therefore be likely to have understood that the comments were being made for comic effect.
_	This hypothesis contrasts to the view that as the age of countries' populations tends to increase over time, they will become increasingly infirm and consume an ever-larger proportion of the national budget in healthcare costs.
_	The positivist perspective has been associated with 'scientism'; the view that the methods of the natural sciences may be applied to all areas of investigation, be it philosophical, social scientific, or otherwise.
_	The Temple presents the view that the name "Satan" was originally a corruption of the name "Set".
_	XXII was determined to suppress what he considered to be the excesses of the Spirituals, who contended eagerly for the view that Christ and his apostles had possessed absolutely nothing, citing "Exiit qui seminat" in support of their view.
_	It mainly holds the view that high transport costs due to distance and terrain result in the erosion of competitive edge for exports from landlocked countries.
_	Although nominally a Conservative, Disraeli was sympathetic to some of the demands of the Chartists and argued for an alliance between the landed aristocracy and the working class against the increasing power of the middle class, helping to found the Young England group in 1842 to promote the view that the rich should use their power to protect the poor from exploitation by the middle class.
_	One school is sometimes called "exclusive legal positivism", and it is associated with the view that the legal validity of a norm can never depend on its moral correctness.
_	A second school is labeled "inclusive legal positivism", a major proponent of which is Wil Waluchow, and it is associated with the view that moral considerations "may" determine the legal validity of a norm, but that it is not necessary that this is the case.
_	The commissioners argued that buildings based on Kempthorne's plans would be symbolic of the recent changes to the provision of poor relief; one assistant commissioner expressed the view that they would be something "the pauper would feel it was utterly impossible to contend against", and "give confidence to the Poor Law Guardians".
_	One taxonomic complication is distinguishing the view that incomparability is vagueness, combined with epistemicism about vagueness, from epistemicism about incomparability.
_	White, J., joined by Brennan, J., concurring, joined in the opinion of the court, but expressed the view that the District Court's opinion should have been viewed as having the operative effect of a declaratory judgment invalidating the Texas disturbing-the-peace statute, so that the state was entitled to have that phase of the case reviewed by the United States Court of Appeals.
_	In "Shorey", "Mulligan" and "Johnson", the early 19th-century courts introduced the view that injury was determined by "relative efficiencies of conflicting property uses" (as opposed to the English common-law tradition ensuring a natural right of enjoyment).
_	That principle of interconnectedness corresponds with what we know today about particle physics and planetary ecology, both of which support the view that all things are intimately interrelated and dependent upon one another-- that nothing exists as separate and alone."
_	However, responding to the view that the requirements of some breed standards were potentially detrimental to the health or well-being of the animal, changes have been made affecting the required eye shape and the loose skin, the most recent revision being 2008-9.
_	Marshall presents a revisionist interpretation, rejecting the view that the prosperity of Mughal Bengal gave way to poverty and anarchy in the colonial period.
_	Pope's "The Dunciad" is a satirical slaying of two of his literary adversaries (Lewis Theobald, and Colley Cibber in a later version), expressing the view that British society was falling apart morally, culturally, and intellectually.
_	The Spartans were of the view that, with the liberation of mainland Greece, and the Greek cities of Asia Minor, the war's purpose had already been reached.
_	In his psychoanalytical study of "The Adventures of Tintin", the literary critic Jean-Marie Apostolidès expressed the view that "The Red Sea Sharks" reflected a world in which traditional values have been degraded and everything – including human life – has become a commodity.
_	McCarthy also highlighted Tintin's actions in returning Abdullah to Khemed, expressing the view that it is part of a wider running theme throughout the series in which the hero takes an abandoned children to their home; other instances included Tintin's discovery of an adoptive family for the orphan Chang Chong-Chen in "The Blue Lotus" and the delivery of the lost gypsy child Miarka to her family in "The Castafiore Emerald".
_	At the opposite extreme is the view that concepts and language are completely independent, so there is always a range of ways in which a concept can be expressed.
_	In 1938, Siegel began teaching poetry classes with the view that "what makes a good poem is like what can make a good life."
_	Shaw was mayor of Biddeford, Maine from 1865–66 and was outspoken in his opinions about the Civil War- in the view that the question of slavery was not something with which the Northern States should involve themselves.
_	The term is also different from moral subjectivism which refers to the view that moral truth is relative to the individual.
_	Writing as, at the time, a loyal subject of the British Empire, Franklin argues that the British should increase their population and power by expanding across the Americas, taking the view that Europe is too crowded.
_	The paper was "particularly critical of the view that government partnerships with non-violent yet otherwise extreme Islamists were the best way to fend off Jihadism."
_	Virgin Mobile's independent directors rejected the original bid of £817 million ($1.4 billion), taking the view that NTL's bid "undervalued the business".
_	Drawing on a Bakhtinian framework, Hartelius posits that Wikipedia is an example of an epistemic network that is driven by the view that individuals’ ideas clash with one another so as to generate expertise collaboratively.
_	Epistemological solipsism is the view that one can only be sure of the existence of ones mind.
_	This approach seems to hold in light of the view that, long ago, Indian grammarians anticipated modern developments in Western linguistics.
_	Bohm advanced the view that quantum physics meant that the old Cartesian model of reality – that there are two kinds of substance, the mental and the physical, that somehow interact – was too limited.
_	Today, with direct access to the "Qieyun", this notion has been replaced by the view that the sound system in "Qieyun" represents (or proposes) a literate reading adopted by the literate class of the period throughout the country, not any live language that once existed.
_	Philosopher Bertrand Russell was impressed by Augustine's meditation on the nature of time in the "Confessions", comparing it favourably to Kant's version of the view that time is subjective.
_	The Qianlong Emperor rejected the views of Han officials who said Xinjiang was not part of China and that he should not conquer it, putting forth the view that China was multiethnic and did not just refer to Han.
_	In the Republic, Socrates is challenged to defend the view that we have reasons to be moral that do not come from rational self-interest, in response to Glaucon's arguments in Book 2.
_	The Republic develops the view that being a good person in an ethical sense involves achieving internal harmony of the parts of the soul.
_	The motives behind becoming a traitor to one's class can include the necessity of survival (taking up whatever wage is available), the belief that the person is of a higher class and so has political views that work against the working class, the pressure of conformity, or a rejection of the view that society is divided up into antagonistic classes.
_	Thorneycroft addressed the view that Britain should provide a nuclear deterrent from its own resources.
_	Expansion became the key to maintaining his empire, and Geppetto had by now developed a taste for ruling, taking the view that it was better that he should be in charge than someone who might prove to be less benevolent.
_	Currie commented on Kritzinger's assertion that there was nothing in Voet to support the view that the lessee had a right to discontinue the tenancy without liability, if the purchaser wished to continue with it.
_	Ordinarily, English law takes the view that one cannot rely in civil claims on actions done that are tainted with illegality (or in the Latin saying "ex turpi causa non oritur actio").
_	Parwez held the view that the Quran is the only binding force of Pakistani society; and thus, its community should be in perfect alignment with the commandments of Islam in all aspects.
_	A research worker from the Medan State University recently (2011) expressed the view that up to half of the 16 temples in the area were at risk of being illegally excavated and noted that groups of thieves had been observed working at some of the temples.
_	Thor Heyerdahl popularised the view that they were a South American indigenous people, who were pale skinned with red hair.
_	As far as William, Earl of Douglas's reaction was concerned when he staged an armed demonstration before Robert's coronation, Grant does not hold to the view that Douglas was in some way demonstrating against Robert's legitimate right to the throne, but more an assertion that royal patronage should not continue as in the time of David II.
_	Therefore, several scholars shared the view that Luwian was spoken—to varying degrees—across a large portion of western Anatolia, including Troy ("Wilusa"), the Seha River Land ("Sēḫa" ~ "Sēḫariya", i.e., the Greek Hermos river and Kaikos valley), and the Mira-Kuwaliya kingdom with its core being the Maeander valley.
_	This rationale leads to the view that the Church can be perfectly guided by the principles, teachings and examples of the Bible alone.
_	It is often held that these engagements demonstrated the importance of the gun over its smaller counterparts, though some historians take the view that secondary batteries were just as important as the larger weapons.
_	However, the Acting Registrar James Loch took the view that the court was illegal, and it was soon closed again.
_	It was based on an understanding of human cultures as malleable and perpetuated through social learning, and understood behavioral differences between peoples as largely separate from and unaffected by innate predispositions stemming from human biology—in this way it rejected the view that cultural differences were essentially biologically based.
_	The physician Hippocrates (460 - 370 BCE) developed the view that the liver and spleen produced blood, which traveled to the heart to be cooled by the lungs that surrounded it.
_	Knight draws on Wyntoun, Bower and other medieval writers to suggest the view that Robin Hood existed in the same way as King Arthur, Herne the Hunter, the devil, the saints, etc.
_	He also held the view that evolution had occurred "by gradual steps at remote irregular periods."
_	He is of the view that Venkoji was not pleased with the conduct of Chengamaldas who refused to pay the war expenses.
_	The Chinese paper also rejected the view that Liu Xiaobo should be described as "China's Mandela", by stating: "Mandela was a Nobel Peace Prize laureate for leading African people to anti-apartheid victory through struggles ... however, awarding a Chinese prisoner who confronted authorities and was rejected by mainstream Chinese society derides China's judicial system ... [which] makes sure a society of 1.3 billion people runs smoothly."
_	Plutarch was of the view that he became disabled by means of an attempt on his life by Philip II's wife, Queen Olympias, who wanted to eliminate a possible rival to her son, Alexander, through the employment of "pharmaka" (drugs/spells); however, most modern authorities doubt the truth of this claim.
_	This pope determined to suppress what he considered to be the excesses of the Spirituals, who contended eagerly for the view that Christ and his apostles had possessed absolutely nothing, either separately or jointly.
_	Justice Stewart dissented with respect to the American Independent Party, expressing the view that the Ohio election laws were within the power of the Ohio legislature.
_	Available documentation does not explain how junctions and crossovers were to be dealt with, and approaches to established railway managements in the UK and elsewhere resulted in the view that the system would abstract from, and not complement, the existing railway.
_	In February, Ousmane was put on television, along with Amadou and Issoufou, to express the view that flaws in the operation of the political system were the cause of the coup, and to call for changes in the system.
_	Despite the convention requiring a unanimous vote, it seems the majority (the final vote was 36 "aye" to 16 "nay") were prepared to take the view that, whatever divisive conduct M‘Neile may have displayed, he deserved recognition as a writer and orator, and agreed to place the statue amongst the other eleven local and national dignitaries (Cavanagh, 1977).
_	In contrast to these views, however, Paolo Musso, a member of the SETI Permanent Study Group of the International Academy of Astronautics (IAA) and the Pontifical Academy of Sciences, took the view that extraterrestrial civilizations possess, like humans, a morality driven not entirely by altruism but for individual benefit as well, thus leaving open the possibility that at least "some" extraterrestrial civilizations are hostile.
_	We were rank materialists, and we held the view that eating, sleeping, and creature comforts were the "summum bommum" of life."
_	Westmoreland was of the view that the ARVN and National Police had become too dependent on the U.S. to bear the burden of the operation and he advised General Viên that by the end of 1967 the 199th Brigade would be withdrawn from Gia Định Province.
_	In contrast, "metaphysical libertarians", such as Thomas Reid, Peter van Inwagen, and Robert Kane, are those incompatibilists who accept free will and deny determinism, holding the view that some form of indeterminism is true.
_	In the Middle Ages studies and adaptations of "Timaeus" solidified the view that there was a numerical explanation for proportion and harmony among learned men.
_	Gingerich’s beliefs have sometimes resulted in criticism from young earth creationists, who dissent from the view that the universe is billions of years old.
_	Taking the view that citizen soldiers were better soldiers than the professional soldiers, Hughes cut spending on the "bar room loafers" as he called the Permanent Force Militia to increase the size of the Non-Permanent Force.
_	D.P. Mishra, the then minister for local self-government under the Government of India Act of 1935 in Central Provinces was of the view that 'the working of our local bodies... in our province and perhaps in the whole country presents a tragic picture...
_	In his view, the work of literature was the product of the author’s environment, and an analysis of that environment could yield a perfect understanding of that work; this stands in contrast with the view that the work of literature is the spontaneous creation of genius.
_	It develops the view that God in His wisdom and might has created all things on earth as contrasted pairs which mutually supplement each other.
_	Liu is an opponent of what are called Asian values, including the view that Asia should take a different route of political development outside of the tradition of liberal democracy, seen as a Western principle.
_	Marx and Engels held the view that the consciousness of those who earn a wage or salary (the working class in the broadest Marxist sense) would be moulded by their conditions of wage slavery, leading to a tendency to seek their freedom or emancipation by overthrowing ownership of the means of production by capitalists and consequently, overthrowing the state that upheld this economic order.
_	The work has been praised by several scholars, but criticized by others, some of whom have attributed to Halperin the view that the coining of the word "homosexuality" in the nineteenth century brought homosexuality into existence.
_	These include a view of the unconscious mind and unconscious thought processes, the view that unwholesome unconscious forces cause much of human suffering and the idea that one may gain insight into these thought processes through various practices, including what Freud called "evenly suspended attention."
_	The book explores the challenges posed by the “dead donor rule” (the view that vital organs may be procured only from patients who are dead), as well alternatives to the rule.
_	However, according to Stanley Wells, writing in the "Oxford Companion to Shakespeare", most modern scholars take the view that the name Whateley was "almost certainly the result of clerical error".
_	The Alliance leaders accepted the view that the mission had achieved a measure of success.
_	The publication of Huxley physiography presented a new form of geography that analysed and classified cause and effect at the micro-level and then applied these to the macro-scale (due to the view that the micro was part of the macro and thus an understanding of all the micro-scales was need to understand the macro level).
_	He came to the view that the IAS is inappropriate for India.
_	He expressed the view that all the new technologies being introduced were useless, and claimed that it had gotten to the point where commanders prefer to email each other instead of interacting.
_	However, Shanmugam expressed the view that where an issue concerns the discretionary powers that the President is explicitly endowed with, such as fiscal reserves and appointment of key public holders, it is appropriate for the President to speak up publicly even without the Cabinet's sanction.
_	Some held to the view that infinity was an abstraction which was not mathematically legitimate, and denied its existence.
_	Supportive of the view that gardening by the lunar cycle affects plant growth (known as lunar gardening), he worked on a biodynamic farm in the 1970s, and in 1980 his "Gardening and Planting by the Moon" was published, the first of an annual series.
_	He did believe that indeterminism is important as a "doctrine of relief" – it allows for the view that, although the world may be in many respects a bad place, it may, through individuals' actions, become a better one.
_	The War Cabinet, reviewing this conference on 25 April, "inclined to the view that sooner or later the Sykes–Picot Agreement might have to be reconsidered ...
_	Crowley—who favoured the spelling "magick" over "magic" to distinguish it from stage illusionism—was of the view that "Magick is the Science and Art of causing Change to occur in conformity with Will".
_	Volume four of the history was published; this dealt with the trial and execution of Charles I. Macaulay expressed the view that Charles's execution was justified, praised the Commonwealth of England and revealed republican sympathies.
_	Taylor held the view that the religious architecture was the responsibility of "the hand of a single master builder" but was not able to answer the question of why so many shrines should be concentrated in the area.
_	In July 2017, Joyce expressed the view that the only viable route to a consensus on health care was to take a bipartisan approach.
_	He lectures widely advocating the view that scientists should be vigilant about keeping their personal policy preferences out of their scientific activities.
_	He is also a proponent of the view that the pervasive use of normative science is undermining the credibility of the scientific enterprise.
_	Dissenters of the view that elves were a later invention, such as Rudolf Simek and Gabriel Turville-Petre, feel rather that "dark" and "light" aspects of the same beings not inherently unlikely, death and fertility cults often being closely related.
_	Thus, the author challenges the validity of the view that regionalism in Assam emerged to fulfill the common interests of the Assamese people and establishes a new thesis that Assamese regionalism is based on emotions and sentiments rather than commitment.
_	Short-term longitudinal evidence is consistent with the view that a lack of social cognitive skills mediates the link between harsh parental discipline and aggressive conduct in kindergarten.
_	Hirschi's (1969) control theory advances the view that children with weak affective ties to parents and school are at increased risk of engaging in delinquent and violent behavior in and out of school.
_	Others have advanced the view that its genre is not appropriate for its content.
_	The three ministries of Japan of Education, Justice and Welfare expressed the view that denial of schooling would be illegal.
_	The epistemology they developed defends the view that there are only two 'instruments of knowledge' or 'valid cognitions' ("pramāṇa"); "perception" (pratyaksa) and "inference" (anumāṇa).
_	However, the majority of modern Bible scholars point out how spirit and soul are used interchangeably in many biblical passages, and so hold to dichotomy: the view that each of us is body and soul.
_	This is the view that U.S. values have universal application and should be promoted without apology, and defended with military force when necessary.
_	The site has been criticized for presenting articles which advocate AIDS denialism, the view that HIV does not cause AIDS, and the claim that vaccines cause autism.
_	In Plato studies, 'unitarianism' is the view that Plato's dialogues contain a unified and systematic philosophy.
_	Though the story of Ugrasinghan has generally been rejected by scholars, some are of the view that this story is "based on a historical fact", namely that Ugrasinghan has been confused with Manavamma who was helped by the Pallava King Narasinghavarman.
_	Katherine Duncan-Jones and Henry Woudhuysen adopt a variation of the view that the poem refers to Salusbury and the queen, arguing that the "session" mentioned in the poem is the 1601 parliament, in which Elizabeth made a famous speech about the symbolic relationship between herself and her people, sometimes referred to as her .
_	Amnesty International called the commission a "whitewash," saying it "reinforces the view that the Israeli authorities are unwilling or incapable of delivering accountability for abuses of international law committed by Israeli forces."
_	Liberal economists like Adam Smith, however, took the view that government intervention would be counterproductive; that in the long run only the free market could produce sustained plenty for all.
_	The proposal in the Stanley letter was considered a policy experiment especially from the view that "Ireland, as a colony could be used as an experimental milieu for social legislation which might not be tolerated in England where laissez-faire politico-economic policies were more rigid and doctrinaire."
_	Author Midge Harbour in her 1982 book "The Tarryall Mountains and the Puma Hills: A History," espouses the view that Ratcliff hunted down Fluhmann until he found the cave-cabin, where he shot Fluhmann dead without warning.
_	Jonas Barish, in his seminal work, "The Antitheatrical Prejudice" (1981)"," adopts the view that by 1814 Austen may have turned against theatre following a supposed recent embracing of evangelicalism.
_	The historian James Campbell described this as a "complicated calendar", and expressed the view that it would have required "an organised and recognised priesthood" to plan the observation of it.
_	According to McFadden he was sacked for comments in the debate on the Paris bombings which condemned "the view that sees terrorist acts as always being a response or a reaction to what we in the west do".
_	Justice James noted that ""I am firmly of the view that, having regard to the multiplicity of the offences, the two killings, in the context of the wounding of Mr Singleton, and also the total culpability of the offender for the three offences, the sentence of life imprisonment for each of the murders is the only appropriate sentence"".
_	The Catholic periodical "The Tablet" expressed the view that the public resignations ought to have been avoided, further discussions held, and that the Vatican should have made the reasons for the withdrawal explicit.
_	He is a major scholar in contemporary scholarship on the historical Jesus, and he contributed to the view that Jesus was part of a renewal movement within Judaism.
_	In his 1921 book "Social Decay and Regeneration" Freeman put forth the view that mechanization had flooded Britain with poor-quality goods and created a "homogenized, restless, unionized working class".
_	Critics are not unanimous on the view that Shakespeare used "The True Tragedy" as a source for his play, though the majority tend to favour this judgement.
_	Some atheists hold the view that the various conceptions of gods, such as the personal god of Christianity, are ascribed logically inconsistent qualities.
_	In reply (letter of November 19, 1927), MacMahon expresses the view that Redfield has made a valuable contribution to the subject and goes on to mention a conjecture which he himself made in his recently delivered Rouse-Ball memorial lecture.
_	They hold the view that vyapti is the unconditional uniform relation of the reason to the predicate and that a condition pervades the predicate.
_	When the Supreme Court adopted the view that Congress enacted the Sherman Act as a "consumer welfare prescription," it did not define the meaning of the term, which has remained ambiguous.
_	Important 20th-century Jefferson biographers including Merrill Peterson support the view that Jefferson was strongly opposed to slavery; Peterson said that Jefferson's ownership of slaves "all his adult life has placed him at odds with his moral and political principles.
_	Kaiser wanted to expand production; Frazer wanted to retrench and economize, especially with the view that as the Big Three—Ford, Chrysler and General Motors—brought out newly designed cars, Kaiser-Frazer sales would drop.
_	Shurberg testified against the bill, HB 1392 (2009) before the Ways and Means Committee, expressing the view that the amendment was entirely unconstitutional.
_	Martini was one of nine like-minded prelates who met annually from 1995 to 2006 in St. Gallen, Switzerland, to discuss reforms with respect to the appointment of bishops, collegiality, bishops' conferences, the primacy of the papacy, and sexual morality; they differed among themselves, but shared the view that Cardinal Joseph Ratzinger was not the sort of candidate they hoped to see elected at the next conclave.
_	A low value lends support to the Rare Earth hypothesis, which posits that intelligent life is a rarity in the Universe, whereas a high value provides evidence for the Copernican mediocrity principle, the view that habitability—and therefore life—is common throughout the Universe.
_	The consultation document noted that 'The Board is currently of the view that the Welsh Baccalaureate has both relevance and value, that it should be further developed and promoted, and that eventually it should be universally adopted at 14–19 across Wales.
_	Some historians are of the view that the Thrikkakkara inscription is the oldest.
_	Concerned by the exodus of so many whites from the Cape and Natal, and taking the view that they remained British subjects, the British Governor Sir Harry Smith in 1848 annexed the area between the Orange and Vaal rivers as the "Orange River Sovereignty".
_	A 2017 Gallup creationism survey found that 38% of adults in the United States inclined to the view that "God created humans in their present form at one time within the last 10,000 years" when asked for their views on the origin and development of human beings, which Gallup noted was the lowest level in 35 years.
_	The arrangement of the collection, designed by the director of the archaeological expedition, Théophile Homolle, was inspired by the view that the architectural parts and sculptures should be put "in context".
_	In metaphysics, he has defended the view that laws are metaphysically necessary, a position that follows from his view of properties as clusters of conditional causal powers.
_	Last week I expressed the view that Jimmy Walsh at right half-back was the pick of the bunch.
_	Koch officially resigned his church membership in 1943, but in his post-war testimony he stated: "I held the view that the Nazi idea had to develop from a basic Prussian-Protestant attitude and from Luther's unfinished Protestant Reformation".
_	Towards the end of his life he adopted the view that the elements have been formed by some process of condensation from one primordial substance of extremely small atomic weight, and he expressed the conviction that atomic weights within narrow limits are variable and modified according to the physical conditions in which a compound is formed.
_	Van der Palm had a particular interest in Arabic because he held the view that some ancient fragments of the Old Testament that had been discovered at that time would help to explain anomalies in the Hebrew text.
_	Moreover, the Court took the view that the position in Singapore is different from the UK position as Parliament had provided in the Immigration Act for appeals by aggrieved persons against the decisions of the Controller and the Minister.
_	Mr Bull was of the view that none of the officers had done anything wrong except "falsely noting the Occurrence Book".
_	[he is] the only man who steadfastly refused to accept the view that Hitler and the Nazis were incorrigible and would understand nothing but the big stick".
_	Reaffirming the January statement, the Call for Unity expressed the view that the planned demonstrations were "unwise and untimely", and that attempts to correct the very real injustices should be pursued patiently in the courts, by local residents.
_	In 1922, Arthur Stanley Eddington wrote a paper expressing (apparently for the first time) the view that gravitational waves are in essence ripples in coordinates, and have no physical meaning.
_	There is no evidence that the Soviet Union's contingency plans from the end of World War II to 1950 were anything but routine and defensive, and the substantial postwar demobilization of the Soviet military supports the view that the USSR did not view a new war in Europe as likely.
_	Other academics took the view that joint enterprise was a separate form of complicity with recklessness as its mental element, but attacked the policy injustice of such an approach.
_	In "La Déduction relativiste", Meyerson expressed the view that Einstein's general theory of relativity was a new version of the identification of matter with space, which he considered "the postulate upon which the whole (Cartesian) system rests."
_	he found that generally they were in severe want because of the drought at the time, and formed the view that they were perishing from famine.
_	He expressed the view that certain information about the private life of a celebrity had become so widely available that it could no longer be sensibly protected by injunctive relief, observing, "The court must live in the world as it is and not as it would like it to be."
_	When Merrifield was awarded the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 1984 for the invention of solid phase peptide synthesis some, such as Daniel Rich of the American Chemical Society expressed the view that he was "surprised that Hirschmann didn't share the Nobel Prize".
_	As a supporter of the Confederacy, Thornwell held the view that slavery was morally right and justified under the Christian religion.
_	Kitromilides' view was backed up by K. Papachristos who brought more evidence to support the view that George Kalaras was the anonymous author/publisher of the Hellenic Nomarchy.
_	Theologian John Hick argues that New Testament scholars do not now support the view that Jesus claimed to be God.
_	Lee expressed the view that one of the reasons that the album was not as well received as they thought it would be was because the new version of "Feel the Heartbeat" was almost exactly the same and that they should have released the posse cut "We Wit It" which featured Big Daddy Kane, Chuck D, Grandmaster Caz, Heavy D, Melle Mel, and Tito (of The Fearless Four); this song was a lot more popular but was never released as a single.
_	The fact that a layman and not a bishop convened the synod, that the pope was not accorded a defence, that both the subsequent deposition of John and the election of a layman were illegal, and that the acts of the synod were condemned at a new synod held the following year, have all lent credence to the view that many, if not all, of the acts of the synod were invalid.
_	This case was quickly reversed, and decisions immediately after "Bourne v Mason" took the view that third parties could enforce contracts that benefited them.
_	According to sources, Ahmad was of the view that 'manipulation-of-election-results' difference between two major contestants before the actual results come in, was unprofessional and unethical.
_	President Chen Shui-bian (2000 – May 2008) fully supported the idea that the "Republic of China is an independent, sovereign country" but held the view that the Republic of China is Taiwan and Taiwan does not belong to the People's Republic of China.
_	Hidden variable theories reject the view that nature contains irreducible randomness: such theories posit that in the processes that appear random, properties with a certain statistical distribution are at work behind the scenes, determining the outcome in each case.
_	Proponents of internalism are committed to the view that neural activity is sufficient to produce the mind.
_	Participants in the New Age typically express the view that their own spiritual actions are helping to bring about the Age of Aquarius, with writers like Ferguson and Argüelles presenting themselves as prophets ushering forth this future era.
_	More recently, Denzil Wraight, Tony Chinnery, and Kerstin Schwarz, who have built replica Cristofori pianos, have taken the view that Cristofori favored brass strings, except occasionally in very demanding locations (such as the upper range of a 2' harpsichord stop).
_	The fact that in many early chasubles, as depicted in the drawings of the eighth and ninth centuries, we see clear traces of a primitive hood, strongly confirms the view that in their origin cope and chasuble were identical, the chasuble being only a cope with its edges sewn together.
_	Some observers, including Channel 4's Jim McGrath, expressed the view that Mukhadram's victory had been partly due to the riders of the more fancied runners misjudging the pace and giving their mounts too much ground to make up in the straight.
_	Abbas, like most other historians of Arab literature, held the view that classical biography and autobiography in the Arabic language tended to reduce the subject to a type rather than an individual.
_	Satyros, however, came to the view that Sopaios was involved in a conspiracy to take his life.
_	The Waubra Foundation promotes the view that wind turbines cause ill health.
_	Because of the surrounding people calling it "Alhabas", has led to some people holding the view that it was named after Alha from Alha's story and was renamed by Akbar in the interest of Islam.
_	Historical economists of the nineteenth century also rejected the view that economic policy prescriptions, however derived, would apply universally, without regard to place or time, as followers of the Ricardian and Marshallian schools did.
_	Fruchtenbaum originally was of the view that Jewish converts should attempt to integrate with local Gentile congregations, but later came to regard separate Jewish congregations as valid.
_	Howard J. Curzer takes the view that in fact both were meant, and that it is "misguided" to ask whether Aristotelian meanness is excess or deficiency, because what constitutes excess and what constitutes deficiency "depends upon how the parameters are described" and is "purely a verbal matter".
_	Because the Hague Convention focuses on returning a child to his or her country of habitual residence, the United States Central Authority takes the view that psychological evaluations are unnecessary, and cause inappropriate delays in processing cases, if there is no evidence of risk to the child should the court order the child’s return.
_	Sanders coined the term “restrictivism” for the view that Christian salvation is possible only for those who have heard about the gospel of Jesus and put their faith in Jesus prior to their death.
_	The conference is also of the view that Tamil Nadu being the motherland of all Tamilians living all over the world, Tamil Nadu should be maintained as a place where Tamilpeople can have all the say in all the matters.
_	Critical response was extremely mixed, with some reviewers praising the inclusion of a less serious episode and others expressing the view that the comedy was too overt.
_	The "Tokyo Shimbun" expressed the view that capital punishment was inevitable when they thought how brutal the murder was and what the victim's family felt of it.
_	This framework is in contrast to the view that the brain integrates exteroceptive information through a predominantly feedforward process, with feedback connections playing a more minor role in cortical processing.
_	Thus arriving at an essentially similar position to that of Willes J in Cook v Lister (1863) 13 CBNS 543 (in which he expressed the view that the "effect of such as agreement between a creditor and a third party with regard to the debt is to render it impossible for the creditor afterwards to sue the debtor for it") but by virtue of rather different reasoning.
_	In addition, the Kilbrandon Commission was firmly of the view that Parliament has power to legislate for the Islands without their consent on any matter in order to give effect to an international agreement which the UK may have made on behalf of the Crown Dependencies.
_	"I personally always took the view that, if you look at the case of should a Christian hotel owner have the right to exclude a gay couple from a hotel, I took the view that if it's a question of somebody who's doing a B&B in their own home, that individual should have the right to decide who does and who doesn't come into their own home.
_	The SIAS has a normal distribution of scores, with those that experience social interaction anxiety scoring high, supporting the view that the scale identifies general fear regarding social interactions.
_	Roethlisberger is of the view that these works formerly attributed to 'Monsù Montagna' are in fact works by van Plattenberg.
_	In its obituary of the former governor, "The New York Times" called him an "archsegregationist;" to support this contention, the "Times" noted that his convictions included "the view that blacks were intellectually inferior to whites, that integration was a Communist plot, that segregation was somewhere justified in scripture and that a federal mandate to integrate [all-white] schools was 'ungodly, un-Christian and un-American.'"
_	In another interview Majedi expressed the view that Islamophobia does not exist, and that it is "an invented concept trying to silence the world to criticize Islam or Islamic movement".
_	The government commissioned report by Roy Goode on "Pension Law Reform" confirmed the view that trustees may have an ethical investment policy and use their discretion in following it.
_	Nonetheless, the view that the Orkney earldom was created by "members of the Møre family" continues to receive academic support.
_	The political scientist Alberto Spektorowski espoused the view that the ND "has indeed seriously moved from its positions of old-style right-wing nationalism and racism to a new type of leftist regionalism and ethno-pluralism".
_	Cultural critics have largely characterised the ND as a right-wing phenomenon, a categorisation endorsed by the political scientist Tamir Bar-On, who expresses the view that "ND thinkers have never fully transcended their original revolutionary right-wing roots."
_	US President Ronald Reagan attributed to the view that the "brutal treatment of Soviet dissidents was due to bureaucratic inertia."
_	I am of the view that a democratic unity on the basis of justice and equality would be of much benefit to the people of Oromia.
_	Raeder took the view that the Navy should be a "family" with himself as the stern, but loving father figure, and the sailors as his "children", from whom he expected unconditional obedience.
_	It also mentions that these scientist to not subscribe to the view that human influence and the effect of greenhouse gases as significant drivers of climate.
_	The former, The Shaw Report, concluded that the incident on 23 August consisted of an attack by Arabs on Jews, but rejected the view that the riots had been premeditated.
_	The sociologist Steve Bruce was of the view that the Pro-Life Alliance's inability to achieve political success reflected the "relative unpopularity of abortion as an election issue" in the United Kingdom.
_	He was one of the scholars who held to the view that the ancient Israelites already had an advanced literary culture at the time of the migration from Canaan to Egypt.
_	For the next 10 years, the Watch Tower Society continued to teach the view that he had fulfilled the roles of the "Laodicean Messenger" of Revelation 3:14–22 and the "Faithful and Wise Servant" of Matthew 24:45.
_	An IPCC spokesman expressed the view that Mr Geenty should not be allowed to retire until the investigation and any subsequent proceedings were completed.
_	The traditional focus on hierarchical order generated the impression that DGs have little to say about linear order, and it has contributed to the view that DGs are particularly well-suited to examine languages with free word order.
_	In his book "The Art Instinct" (2010) Dutton opposes the view that art appreciation is culturally learned, claiming instead that art appreciation stems from evolutionary adaptions made during the Pleistocene.
_	Citing the view that most Muslims have integrated successfully in Australian society, critics such as Sydney-based journalist and writer Sarah Malik have suggested that the activities of a comparatively small number of radicals and militants should not give rise to criticism of the Islamic religion.
_	Pliny's judgment that Silius wrote poetry "maiore cura quam ingenio" (with more eagerness than genius) has encouraged the view that Silius is a talented but mediocre and uninspired poet.
_	Confucius did not oppose capital punishment absolutely, but did take the view that in a well-ordered society based on moral persuasion, capital punishment would become unnecessary.
_	MOGUL follows the view that high levels of activation are strongly implicated in the phenomenon of conscious awareness.
_	Phenomenalism as formulated by Mach, in contrast, is the view that objects are "logical constructions" out of perceptual properties.
_	The artist shared the view that was its main failure.
_	ABC reported that "some former staunch supporters" held the view that Gillard could not win the election, and ABC journalist Barrie Cassidy identified Rudd as the only feasible replacement.
_	Since Adolf von Harnack, the Tübingen position has been generally abandoned, though the view that Paul took over the faith and transformed the Jewish teacher to the Son of God is still widely canvassed.
_	Our Global Neighborhood is the report of the Commission on Global Governance, issued in 1995, advancing the view that nations are interdependent and calling for a strengthened United Nations.
_	Some civil rights officials in the Obama Administration expressed the view that Voting Rights Act was specifically intended to correct historic injustices against minorities.
_	If moral universalism is ascribed to, then this would be inconsistent with the view that professions can have a different moral code, as the universalist holds that there is only one valid moral code for all..
_	According to the site, its purpose is to present the view that domestic violence is "not a gendered problem".
_	This stems from the view that an attorney is capable of practicing law in any field with a minimum level of competence as shown by passing a state bar exam.
_	Others shared with Bowles information and views about horticulture and botany: in 1929 Frank Anthony Hampton (a physicist who wrote gardening books under the name of Jason Hill) corresponded about some twigs sent to him by Gertrude Jekyll to support the view that the pollen flowers of mistletoe carried a scent that was missing in fertilised ones.
_	He also explored the concept of woman artists, subscribing to the view that women lack creative ability, a quality he associated solely with men:
_	The book inspired the New Right of the Thatcher government to move further away from the Old Right; specifically, for its first two years the Thatcher administration had held the view that Britain's industrial, economic and commercial decline was down purely to militant trade unionists and to the fact that Britain effectively bankrupted itself winning the Second World War.
_	But when Hitler postponed the attack until 1940, the conspiracy again lost momentum, and Halder formed the view that the German people would not accept a coup.
_	Muhammad ibn Jarir al-Tabari's position was not entirely clear, as modern scholarship has attributed to him both the view that consensus means a simple majority, and that it means only the consensus of the companions of Muhammad.
_	The samaya of mind is to refrain from divulging the secrets and to always maintain the view that one's mind is dharmakaya.
_	Critics of sheikh hold the view that he sold cherished goal of plebesite for gaining chief ministers chair.
_	The third and final group, educational practitioners, holds the view that multicultural education increases the self-esteem of students from minority cultures and prepares them to become successful in the global marketplace.
_	That plan however did address roads, transport forms, compactness, economic activity, investment and liveability, and appeared to take the view that community facilities would follow without the need for particular attention in their own right.
_	The "descriptive" theory of proper names is the view that the meaning of a given use of a proper name is a set of properties that can be expressed as a description that picks out an object that satisfies the description.
_	Through Hall's research and theorizing on adulthood and old age, he developed the view that aging involved creativity and reviving oneself mentally and emotionally rather than physical and cognitive deterioration.
_	The Reformed confessions of faith, official statements of the beliefs of Reformed churches, followed the view that Christ is really present in the Supper.
_	Policarpo was one of about a dozen like-minded prelates, all European cardinals or bishops, who met annually from 1995 to 2006 in St. Gallen, Switzerland, to discuss reforms with respect to the appointment of bishops, collegiality, bishops' conferences, the primacy of the papacy and sexual morality; they differed among themselves, but shared the view that Cardinal Joseph Ratzinger was not the sort of candidate they hoped to see elected at the next conclave.
_	Hence, naturalism is polemically defined as repudiating the view that there exists or could exist any entities which lie, in principle, beyond the scope of scientific explanation.
_	Similarly, the Old English specialist Roy Page expressed the view that the surviving evidence was "too sparse and too scattered" to permit a good understanding of Anglo-Saxon paganism.
_	Today, archaeological and ethnographic studies have led most scholars to accept the view that the pre-colonial population of the Canaries shared common origins with North African Berber tribes from the Atlas Mountains region who began to arrive in the Canaries by sea around 1000 BCE or earlier.
_	The British supported and propagated the view that the Ottomans were Caliphs of Islam among Muslims in British India and the Ottoman Sultans helped the British by issuing pronouncements to the Muslims of India telling them to support British rule from Sultan Selim III and Sultan Abdülmecid I.
_	The term "dowlat", which in modern Persian means "government", was then an abstract term meaning "bliss" or "felicity", and it began to be used as concrete sense of the Safavid state, reflecting the view that the people had of their ruler, as someone elevated above humanity.
_	The Gemara asked how one could reconcile the view that they faced each other with 2 Chronicles which says, "And their faces were inward."
_	The Gemara asked how one could reconcile the view that they faced inward with , which says, "With their faces one to another."
_	Some authors incline to the view that taking changes into account the same principle may be utilised to measure exploitation of developing countries in the present-day world.
_	The court believed that, had not the police been negligent in this regard—that is, had they taken the "reasonable pre-caution" detailed above—they would have come to the view that McArdell ought not to receive a firearm licence.
_	In recent years, the debate surrounding semantic holism, which is one among the many forms of holism that are debated and discussed in contemporary philosophy, has tended to centre on the view that the "whole" in question consists of an entire language.
_	He had severe confrontation with Prime Minister Aziz and was of the view that the row between two men had become a personalized affair though he had pleaded President Musharraf not to drag the FPSC into a controversy.
_	Nonetheless, the view that the Orkney earldom was created by "members of the Møre family" continues to receive academic support.
_	Among other specific targets of satire (such as women), the play targets professional actors (as the subtitle indicates) — which is consistent with the view that it was acted by nonprofessionals.
_	She holds the view that radical Islam is a "bona fide" variant of Islam, which she describes in a number of ways: "Muslim terrorists were practicing pure Islam, original Islam."
_	Mylroie subsequently adopted the view that Saddam had been responsible for the attacks, defending it on many occasions, including before the 9/11 Commission.
_	The story is about a sent-down youth and an old man of the village, and takes the view that the peasants suffer more over the long term than the urban youth sent from the city.
_	The technocentric approach argues that sustainability can be attained through a variety of strategies, from the view that state-led modification of the industrial system like conservation-oriented farming systems should be implemented, to the argument that biotechnology is the best way to meet the increasing demand for food.
_	He uses this distinction to put forward the view that the first 71 mottos are post-dated forgeries, while the remainder are genuine.
_	Disgust can exclude people from being a part of a clique by leading to the view that they are merely less than human.
_	He sought to bring about unity with the Prizren Committee, expressing the view that the liberation of Albania could be utilised effectively to bring about the overthrow of the government led by Enver Hoxha.
_	He mentioned the widespread existence of corruption in the government and expressed the view that coups should become a thing of the past in the Thai political system.
_	Jacobus Trigland joined Lubberdus in expressing the view that tolerance in matters of doctrine was inadmissible, and in his 1615 works "Den Recht-gematigden Christen: Ofte vande waere Moderatie" and "Advys Over een Concept van moderatie" Trigland denounced Grotius' stance.
_	She has also expressed the view that the film is the first time "rape culture" was used in its widest accepted sense.
_	There is nothing in [Adams book] which would support the view that the Commission ever had the importance of the La Follette or McClellan Committees."
_	He always relied on his excellent memory and was of the view that it is books that led to the perdition and doom of past generations.
_	Practical atheism is the view that one should live their life with disregard towards a god.
_	He believed in the complex Pythagorean and Brunian cosmologies, including the view that the planets and stars were like the earth, covered in plants and animals:
_	Extensionalism, in the philosophy of language, in logic and semantics, is the view that all languages or at least all scientific languages should be extensional.
_	In particular, the controversial series finale drew heavy criticism, largely due to the view that it failed to explain many of the main plotlines which had been teased throughout the series' run.
_	Moreover, the view that the unpopular queen was controlling the king further degraded the royal couple's standing with the people, which the Jacobins successfully exploited after their return from Varennes to advance their radical agenda to abolish the monarchy.
_	William C. Massey (1949) interpreted the Jesuit historical sources as indicating that the Coras were a Guaycura-speaking group, but a reexamination of the evidence favors the view that the name was a synonym for "Pericú" (Laylander 1997).
_	The Muslim League, in contrast, supported Britain in the war effort; however, it now took the view that Muslims would be unfairly treated in an independent India dominated by the Congress.
_	As noted by Brian Lapping, the Community Development Projects were also designed to test the view that within poor communities local residents could articulate local grievances, get conditions in their areas improved, and provide some kind of political leadership, in a way that the existing political structure had failed to do, "largely because these areas of intense poverty were rarely big enough to be electorally important."
_	The government took the view that he is not in breach of the Constitution as the registration was not made with Canavan's knowledge or consent.
_	Cornell realism accepts the view that moral facts are natural facts.
_	Although Pawlenty had a top three result in the Ames poll on August 13 (after Bachmann and Ron Paul) and stated that "[w]e made progress in moving from the back of the pack into a competitive position for the caucuses", some analysts were of the view that with him receiving less than half of Bachmann's vote, Pawlenty had failed to reassure his prospective supporters and donors that his campaign was not stalled.
_	White preachers expressed the view that:
_	Vasilj was of the view that all the boats were sunk at the same time in a Roman campaign against Illyrian pirates, amphorae which are later in date than those from the boatwrecks have also been found in the lake, something which might contradict such an assumption.
_	There is also the view that it is impossible to consider all the traditions of the criminal environment as antisocial and harmful, including, for the reason that some of the traditions in the cells of the remand center, contribute to hygiene and the maintenance of sanitary norms.
_	, the present government appears to take the view that it is not constitutionally part of Australia.
_	The sociologist Max Weber (1864–1920) took the view that Calvin’s demands led to an “inner asceticism”, which bestowed great wealth upon man.
_	Women's activists and lawyers have propagated the view that Bhanwari attracted the ire of her rapists solely on the basis of her work.
_	Schmitt has expressed the view that the risks posed by climate change are overrated, and suggests instead that climate change is a tool for people who are trying to increase the size of government.
_	Moody labelled as “myths” the popular views about the establishment of the Anglican Church of Ireland, the view that Catholicism was the driving force behind the resistance to the Elizabethan conquest of Ireland, the 1641 uprising against the English Crown, the idea of “true” Irishmen as a Catholic “race”, the great potato famine of 1845–50, the “land war” of 1879–82, and what Moody called the most pernicious “myth” of them all, the idea of Irish history as one of a continuous struggle for freedom from Great Britain.
_	Eco-capitalism, also known as environmental capitalism or green capitalism, is the view that capital exists in nature as "natural capital" (ecosystems that have ecological yield) on which all wealth depends, and therefore, market-based government policy instruments (such as a carbon tax) should be used to resolve environmental problems.
_	In 1935 the Chief General Manager of Broken Hill Proprietary (BHP), Essington Lewis, visited Europe and formed the view that war was probable.
_	Council this term also saw the proposal of the Pelican Oil and Gas Company to gain a contract to supply their product to the city; Walsh offered the view that it was ultimately up to the citizens to decide whether to grant the contract.
_	Iordan himself supported the view that Romanians had been formed both north and south of the Danube.
_	Minister for the Environment, Dick Roche, has supported the view that one-off housing is a continuation of the traditional land use patterns in Ireland for millennia.
_	Following from this, Cardona holds the view that translations often end up "less clear than the original texts."
_	Following from the view that admiration's function is learning and self-improvement, some authors have proposed that admiration will only activate when we believe improvement is possible for us, however one empirical study has suggested the opposite, that admiration is akin to passive contemplation of an other's superiority, while envy is the motivating emotion which activates when a better performance is attainable to us.
_	There is however now more evidence to support the view that the working class Edwardian style and fashion actually started around the country at about the same time.
_	The main theme of Rockwell's book "Neither Brain nor Ghost" is that the arguments Dennett uses to refute his version of Cartesian Materialism actually support the view that the mind is an emergent property of the entire Brain/Body/World Nexus.
_	The "agrarian" fraction took the view that Wilhelmine imperialism had taken Germany in the wrong direction by colonizing lands that were unsuitable for mass colonization by German settlers and had unwisely antagonized Britain.
_	On 27 August 2012, the Prince of Wales addressed the International Union for Conservation of Nature – World Conservation Congress, supporting the view that grazing animals are needed to keep soils and grassland productive:
_	Martini's race generally confirmed the view that while Pirelli's qualifying tyres were superior to the Goodyears, it was the opposite for both dry and wet weather race tyres with Goodyear holding a distinct advantage.
_	He took the view that the reasonable suspicion test was the applicable test in Singapore.
_	This was in opposition to the tradition carried by the Arab astronomer Albumasar (787-886) whose "Introductorium in Astronomiam" and "De Magnis Coniunctionibus" argued the view that both individual actions and larger scale history are determined by the stars.
_	Whilst some respected Critical Realists cautiously supported Bhaskar's 'spiritual turn', others took the view that the development had compromised the status of CR as a serious philosophical movement.
_	According to Ellicott's "Commentary for English Readers", "the Talmud and Jewish interpreters in general are agreed in the view that the tithe mentioned in this passage, both here () and in , and also the tithe described in , are all one thing — 'the second tithe', and entirely distinct from the ordinary tithe assigned to the Levites for their subsistence in , and by them tithed again for the priests ()".
_	The findings support the view that the building was part of Peribsen's burial site.
_	While there was debate within the MAG as to what such a BPF should be focusing on, Kee takes the view that ‘because of the multistakeholder nature’ of MAG meetings and programme development procedures, whatever is proposed tends to be ‘taken on’.
_	However others are of the view that the overall production of the album is "a fresh extract of sounds previously demonstrated by Poisonblack" and an example of "fantastic modern heavy rock".
_	The theory of reference prior to the 1970s was dominated by the view that the meaning of an ordinary name is a description of its object: so, for example, "Aristotle" means "the author of "De Caelo"."
_	Thus, with limited interest in peaceful resolution of the conflict, he came to the view that British control of the region could only be achieved through war.
_	Arévalo expressed the view that traditional medicine is of pivotal importance to Amazonian cultures, and that indigenous communities must be able to negotiate access to it in order to prevent exploitation and environmental harm.
_	The PDFLP's original political orientation was based on the view that Palestinian national goals could be achieved only through revolution of the masses and "people's war".
_	whilst a few others taking the view that he had won on merit.
_	Contrary to the view that the Charger was a "clone" of the Marlin, Cameron said that the starting-point for his design was the fastback 1949 Cadillac, and that any similarity to the Marlin was coincidental.
_	However, the duty of seeking revenge had passed to Mango and Kakaha, the sons of Hengi; they took the view that the death of their father should be acknowledged through a muru, or war expedition, against tribes to the south.
_	Political analysts Tihomir Bezlov and Ruslan Stefanov suggested that tensions along political lines may manifest themselves in the aftermath of the next Parliamentary elections (while holding the view that the caretaker government would not have to deal with popular discontent) and did not believe that the protest potential had been exhausted.
_	After reviewing the relevant statutory provisions and legislative history, the Court in "Pacific Gas & Electric Co. v. State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Comm'n", 461 U.S. 190, concluded that "the Federal Government has occupied the entire field of nuclear safety concerns," id., at 212, and expressed the view that Congress intended that only the "Government should regulate the radiological safety aspects involved in the construction and operation of a nuclear plant," id., at 205.
_	Several excavations support the view that Rome grew from pastoral settlements on the Palatine Hill built above the area of the future Roman Forum.
_	Despite recent excavations at the Palatine hill, the view that Rome was founded deliberately in the middle of the eighth century BC, as the legend of Romulus suggests, remains a fringe hypothesis.
_	In philosophy of mind and cognitive science, Stich (1983) has argued for a form of eliminative materialism—the view that talk of the mental should be replaced with talk of its physical substrate.
_	Her resignation was reported in the papers, with Garland expressing the view that, after eight years in academia it was time for a change.
_	Although specific historical understandings of creationism have used varying degrees of empirical, spiritual and/or philosophical investigations, they are all based on the view that the universe was created.
_	Liverpool's Chief Constable, however, expressed the view that the resident Chinese were "quiet, inoffensive and industrious people".
_	The complainant was of the view that the Minister's appearance in the advertisement was a direct contravention of section 2.2.3 of the Code of Conduct for Office Holders as outlined above.
_	He has consistently expressed the view that religious freedom is indivisible and that unless proven guilty of breaches in law, Unificationists and their founder have an absolute right to practice their religion.
_	This supports the view that the cerebellum is involved with the regulation of cognitive processes.
_	According to L. S. Cousins, many scholars are of the view that "this discourse was identified as the first sermon of the Buddha only at a later date," and according to professor of religion Carol S. Anderson the four truths may originally not have been part of this sutta, but were later added in some versions.
_	When discussing the 1991 election, Ashab Uddin Ahmad expressed the view that parliamentary democracy was unsuitable for Bangladesh, given that most of the population at the time was illiterate, which exposed them to exploitation and communalism.
_	In particular, studies support the view that sports mascots and images are not trivial.
_	Stillman notes that while Marx is often represented as an "economic determinist" (that is he believed economic structures basically determine almost every aspect of human life) and used simple models such as "base"/"superstructure" to support this, and that holding the view that individuals have the scope for meaningful thought and action "determined" by their social context it does not follow from this that there is a "direct causal relationship between "economic" circumstances and spheres such as religion, politics or culture".
_	In this work he claimed that Nordic races had established the ancient civilisations of Sumeria, Egypt, Persia, Greece, and Rome, but that they had been weakened by miscegenation with other races and by adopting Christianity, and along with it the view that all humans were equal.
_	Some writers have expressed the view that if extraordinary measures are exhausted, the executive branch has the authority to determine which obligations are paid and which are not, though Treasury has argued that all obligations are on equal footing under the law.
_	In contemporary moral philosophy, motivational internalism (or moral internalism) is the view that moral convictions (which are not necessarily beliefs, e.g. feelings of moral approval or disapproval) are intrinsically motivating.
_	Some researchers are of the view that the dialect spoken by the inhabitants has some affinity to that of the Koireng tribe.
_	Commenting on this archaeological evidence, Pluskowski expressed the view that this reflected "a regular and well-established practice in early Anglo-Saxon society."
_	The legal proceedings commenced in March, some two months after Charlie's treating doctors formed the view that artificial life support was inimical to his interests, and were concluded four months later.
_	During his 2002-06 service as "faith czar", (the informal name for Towey's White House position of Director of the White House Office of Faith-Based and Community Initiatives), Towey decried "militant secularism"; the view that religious considerations should be excluded from government affairs and public education.
_	He did so, and he and Burston jointly formed the view that Sitsky would benefit from study with Egon Petri, who accepted him as a pupil.
_	Whitlam, speaking to the ABC, said to an extent, his Government was carrying on the view that East Timor was not viable as an independent state.
_	The "Source Book" did much to advance the view that modern logic begins with, and builds on, the "Begriffsschrift".
_	Set-theoretic realism, a position defended by Penelope Maddy, is the view that set theory is about a single universe of sets.
_	Most criticism was based on the view that the Constitution was "too" effective in some of its reforms.
_	The MYP is Eurosceptic and puts forward the view that the Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus should become an independent and globally recognised sovereign state.
_	It also rejected the view that the congressional action, after the enactment of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act, had affected the standard of review even if it could inform the Court's interpretation of the statute.
_	On this point a series of ECJ decisions came to the view that there could be a relevant transfer, covered by the Directive, even where there was no contractual link between a transferor and a transferee business, so long as the business entity retained its "identity".
_	For these reasons, Ryholt and most Egyptologists share the view that Avaris rather than Xois was the seat of power of the 14th dynasty.
_	The FMA stated that “While the directors do not admit liability, FMA remains of the view that they are likely to have breached their disclosure obligations under the Securities Act.”
_	In April 2016, Italian Supreme Court judge Piercamillo Davigo, who had prosecuted widespread political corruption in the 1990s, also expressed the view that corruption had grown worse since then.
_	In a conversation about the growing memorialisation of memory, she expressed the view that "Pathos and Kitsch" would shift the view of reality and would not do justice to the victims.
_	According to Lachman, at this time Michell took the view that "an imminent revelation of literally inconceivable scope" was at hand, and that the appearance of UFOs was linked to "the start of a new phase in our history".
_	No other details were given but the report provides real evidence to support the view that "great matches" played for high stakes were in vogue in the years following the Restoration.
_	If the committee is of the view that the regulation does not comply with the Act under which it was made, it can refer the regulation to the parliament.
_	The "New Sporting Magazine" expressed the view that The Saddler was by far the best horse in the race, and that Chorister's victory had been almost entirely due to Day's superior jockeyship.
_	If this damage is significant enough, then the opponent may take the view that such retaliation would be irrational, and therefore, that the threat lacks credibility, and hence, it ceases to be an effective deterrent.
_	The government in Bavaria took the view that it should be a national responsibility to build the line, especially because of the imminent transfer of the Palatine Railways into the ownership of the Royal Bavarian State Railways.
_	At the end of the year the AF was suspended because the army took the view that little more could be learned from it as presently constituted.
_	Chief Whip Jackson Mthembu and Deputy Minister of Justice John Jeffery took the view that, although Zuma had breached the Constitution, the breach was not "serious".
_	As a result of a growing rejection of the view that the efforts of a group of artists based largely in Ontario constituted a national vision or oeuvre, many artists - notably those in Quebec - began feeling ignored and undermined.
_	Like most Libertarian parties, the LPM advocated the view that government activities which affect the lives of citizens (whether in social or economic matters) be kept to a minimum.
_	This differs from the view that there is no essential difference between the pain of non-human animals and that of human beings (see Peter Singer), and also differs from the view that the pain of animals is a morally relevant consideration, but is not morally decisive (See Bonnie Steinbock).
_	In 1488, Bartolomeu Dias rounded the Cape of Good Hope on the southern tip of Africa, proving false the view that had existed since Ptolemy that the Indian Ocean was land-locked.
_	The former held the view that the nature of a reality is absolute consciousness devoid of any subject-object relations that are the constructs of the mind and expressed in language.
_	The series was finally given the go-ahead in 1987, but only after it was laboriously rewritten several times, and even then the SABC held the view that very few Afrikaners would associate with the series.
_	While looking like a very illogical policy in hindsight, this was in keeping with the view that what the EEC was aiming to do was to balance variations in production from year to year.
_	In a textbook issued to officers at the National Defence College in May 1973, Matsutani expressed the view that in the Vietnam War the Americans had underestimated the power of nationalism, as they were fighting from a purely ideological perspective, and said that the Japanese should learn this lesson.
_	On appeal, the United States Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit, in affirming, expressed the view that with respect to the Fourth Amendment, the state's interests outweighed the privacy intrusion caused by the statute's required certification (73 F.3d 1543).
_	Here she was according to Hutton "extending" the ideas of the prominent archaeologist Sir Arthur Evans who in excavating Knossos in Crete had come to the view that prehistoric Cretans had worshiped a single mighty goddess at once virgin and mother.
_	The psychologist Stephen Frosh, writing in "The Politics of Psychoanalysis" (1987), described "Decline and Fall of the Freudian Empire" as one of a number of books in which Eysenck acted as a "propagandist" for the view that psychoanalysis is unscientific.
_	White preachers expressed the view that:
_	In contrast to the view that science rests on foundational assumptions, coherentism asserts that statements are justified by being a part of a coherent system.
_	While, "GamePro" awarded the game a score of 3.5/5, echoing the view that "Tomb Raider" was somewhat in need of an update, remarking "Despite the improved graphics and imaginative story, "Tomb Raider Chronicles" has the same controls as previous "Tomb Raider" games, and they feel as antiquated as any relic Lara ever unearthed."
_	Clark took the view that the possibility of divergence was a good thing, for the law could adapt appropriately to Australian circumstances.
_	Marshall had come to the view that the air forces needed a "simpler system" and a unified command.
_	According to the view that the Rilindja evolved in the 1870s, because of religious ties of the Albanian majority of the population with the ruling Ottomans and the lack of an Albanian state in past, nationalism was less developed and the national movement was greatly delayed among Albanians in the 19th century compared to neighboring southeast European nations, such as the Greeks, Serbs, Bulgarians and Romanians.
_	Jadunath Sarkar writes: "The weight of evidence is in favour of the view that Shivaji was unlettered, like three other heroes of medieval India — Akbar, Haidar Ali, and Ranjit Singh.
_	The views of Quakers around the world towards homosexuality encompass a range from complete celebration and the practice of same-sex marriage, to the view that homosexuality is sinfully deviant and contrary to God's intentions for sexual expression.
_	More recently, some of its supporters have dropped the idea of an icy lunar surface, though they continue to support the view that it was captured and that its capture destroyed Atlantis.
_	Lewis proposed a worthy reply to the first question by expounding the view that a convention is a "rationally self-perpetuating regularity in behavior".
_	Vernes shared with some of his contemporaries the view that religion should not be considered only through cold reason but also through emotion.
_	Frederic William Maitland controversially appealed to Lyndwood's authority against the view that the "Canon Law of Rome, though always regarded as of great authority in England, was not held to be binding on the English ecclesiastical courts".
_	Three decades after Murrell's death, in the late 19th century, Morrison visited Hadleigh on a holiday, expressing the view that the area was "still in the eighteenth century as regards aspect, costume, habits, and mode of thought".
_	Chrétien took the view that effectively the Quebec sovereignty movement had been neutered by the Clarity Act, and that it did not matter if the PQ remained in office or not because they could not win a referendum.
_	This is the view that any response of the brain–mind–body system is an expression of coherent personal constructs (or schemas), which are nonverbal, emotional, perceptual and somatic knowings, not verbal-cognitive propositions.
_	Some Rastas express the view that cannabis smoke serves as an incense that counteracts perceived immoral practices, such as same-sex sexual relations, in society.
_	It formed the view that, broadly, "any remark, insult or act the purpose or effect of which is to violate a Jewish person’s dignity or create an intimidating, hostile, degrading, humiliating or offensive environment for him is antisemitic" and concluded that, given that, "it is the Jewish community itself that is best qualified to determine what does and does not constitute antisemitism."
_	The theoretical work of Georget was influential in establishing the view that 19th century writers of romantic fiction took of the insane and of criminals.
_	British people had often held the view that Japan was like "the Britain of the East", due to certain cultural similarities such as the constitutional monarchy, being an island nation located in a large ocean, driving on the left, temperate climate, school systems, sense of humor and a perceived emphasis on being polite whilst coming across to others as reserved.
_	However, journalists and other observers were of the view that the district courts were unlikely to convict, given the number of Grant administration officials who had been accused of corruption and received little or no punishment.
_	A number reported feelings of anger at the hypocrisy of many practicing Christians and expressed the view that the monotheistic Gods of Christianity and other religions are unethical, citing issues such as the problem of evil.
_	There are arguments against the inclusion of transgender people in military service based on the view that being transgender is a mental illness, and as such transgender individuals are unfit for service.
_	The local Hindu community is of the view that construction of the dam will damage the historic Hindu temple Hinglaj Mata and would destroy the eco-system of Hingol National Park.
_	The NSA's Executive Vice President, James Hercules Sutton, presented testimony that year against an all-volunteer Army to a Congressional panel that included General Gavin and General Omar Bradley, expressing the view that such an Army would be racially imbalanced in enlisted ranks.
_	This supports the view that groups with greater financial resources at their disposal will generally be better able to influence the decision-making process of government.
_	He expressed the view that the Ananda Marga society might be involved with the Hilton bombing; he soon infiltrated that organization, which had its headquarters in three adjacent houses in Queen Street, Newtown.
_	This was a severe crime against the law of the Church, which had decided to support and make a doctrine of the view that the wine and bread of the communion was not only symbolically but literally turned to the blood and body of Christ in 1215.
_	A period of intense internal discussion gave rise to the view that a radical program was needed to rebuild the union, and make it relevant to current and potential members.
_	While living in Manorhamilton, Harkin became active in the voluntary and community sector and developed the view that people living in disadvantaged areas such as Connacht had to rely on their own initiative and energy to progress development of their region.
_	Managerialism in political science is a set of beliefs, attitudes and values which support the view that management is the most essential and desirable element of good administration and government.
_	In philosophy of mathematics, he and his mentor W. V. O. Quine developed the "Quine–Putnam indispensability thesis", an argument for the reality of mathematical entities, later espousing the view that mathematics is not purely logical, but "quasi-empirical".
_	In 1987, political scientist Peter J. Smith challenged the view that Canadian Confederation was non-ideological.
_	In opposition to Richard Hodgson and Eleanor Mildred Sidgwick who held the view that many physical mediums were fraudulent, Myers believed that although many of these mediums cheated they could also produce genuine physical phenomena.
_	In one interview Sládek expressed the view that while he had personally failed, the whole political scene had nonetheless become ""Sládek-like"" in the meantime.
_	The Federal government of the United States maintain the view that both Chávez and Castro are trying to undermine democracy in the Caribbean and portrays Chávez as a security threat.
_	Some writers hold the view that the Christians did not voluntary submit to these conversions.
_	The Law Lords took the view that a person's right to hold a particular religious belief was absolute (i.e. could not be interfered with), but that a person's right to manifest a particular religious belief was qualified (i.e. it could be interfered with if there was a justification).
_	The "findings challenge the view that states first liberalize trade to join the GATT/WTO.
_	"The Okemah Ledger" took the view that "while the general sentiment is adverse to the method, it is generally thought that the negroes got what would have been due them under due process of law."
_	Many other Christian groups take the view that all denominations are part of a symbolic and global Christian church which is a body bound by a common faith if not a common administration or tradition.
_	He also put forward the view that the phrase "done by Seigar" in the 1590 inventory referred to the portrait of Robert Devereux, 2nd Earl of Essex in the National Gallery of Ireland.
_	Schram and Caterino (2006) contains a fundamental methodological criticism of rational choice theory for promoting the view that the natural science model is the only appropriate methodology in social science and that political science should follow this model, with its emphasis on quantification and mathematization.
_	His Lordship expressed the view that there is nothing wrong with a director being nominated by a particular shareholder to represent his interests "...so long as the director is left free to exercise his best judgment in the interests of the company which he serves.
_	Rejecting the view that the Sutta is a ‘satire’ (Gombrich) or ‘good humoured irony’ (Collins) [1], he shows how “the Discourse is a historically and scientifically accurate characterization of the cyclical cosmic process” [2].
_	In a piece in the Birmingham Post he wrote, ""I remain firmly of the view that containment succeeds in restoring order by using boredom as its principle weapon, rather than fear as people flee from on-rushing police wielding batons."
_	Cornelius Nepos was of the view that Dionysius lacked his father’s strength of character and he paid too much attention to unscrupulous advisers who wished to discredit Dion.
_	He came to hold, as a major conviction of his professional life, the view that the mind plays a far greater role in health and illness than his contemporaries realized.
_	Rejecting the view that traditional Northwest Native cultures should somehow remain frozen in time, he has remarked "The fact is, there is always change and our people have always been comfortable with it."
_	Scientists working on other datasets welcomed this study, though they have expressed the view that the recent warming trend was less than in previous periods of the same length.
_	Panpsychism is the view that mind or soul is a universal feature of all things, this has been a common view in western philosophy going back to the Presocratics and Plato.
_	In line with Sunni tradition, al-Ash'ari held the view that a Muslim should not be considered an unbeliever on account of a sin even if it were an enormity such as drinking wine or theft.
_	Economists, generally, take the view that specific performance should be reserved to exceptional settings, because it is costly to administer and may deter promisors from engaging in efficient breach.
_	In contrast, many lawyers from other philosophical traditions take the view that specific performance should be preferred as it is closest to what was promised in the contract.
_	In this case the trial court took the view that notice of divorce by Shahida's former husband, Khushi Muhammad, should have been given to the Chairman of the local council, as stipulated under Section-7(3) of the "Muslim Family Laws Ordinance", 1961.
_	Córdova's approach to medical practice involved the view that the body works as a whole, in which sickness disrupts the harmonious flow of energy which gives us health.
_	However, when council submitted this request to the state Minister for Public Works, Arthur Griffith, and the Commonwealth Postmaster General, Josiah Thomas, it was rejected based on the view that "Ascot" was a term already well-used for place names.
_	They hold the view that the universal concomitance of the middle term with the major term can never be known since their agreement in presence and agreement in absence can never be known as also their invariable concomitance because there are no class-characters and universals.
_	Progressive librarianship entails active advocacy and maintains the view that librarianship should not strictly adhere to ideas of being neutral and apolitical.
_	Adherents of the white supremacist theology known as "Two-Seedline Christian Identity" hold the view that only white people are descendants of Adam and hence the chosen people of God.
_	The opposing faction is called One-Seedline Christian Identity and its adherents hold the view that all people are descended from Adam, but they believe that only Aryans (meaning Northern Europeans) are truly God's chosen people.
_	Rehnquist held a restrictive view of criminals' and prisoners' rights, and held the view that capital punishment is constitutionally permissible.
_	He supported the view that the Fourth Amendment permitted a warrantless search incident to a valid arrest.
_	He was said by leftist critics to be closely aligned with the former Liberal-National Coalition government of John Howard in Australia, with Howard shadowing Blainey's conservative views on some issues, especially the view that Australian history has been hijacked by social liberals.
_	He found that this reduced potency as well as side-effects, but formed the view that vigorous shaking and striking on an elastic surface – a process he termed "Schütteln", translated as "succussion" – nullified this.
_	Attempts to resolve this puzzle include the view that the bandicoot group evolved from the carnivores, retaining the polyprotodont dentition, and independently evolving a syndactyl hind foot; the contrary view that syndactyly is so unusual that it is unlikely to have evolved twice and therefore the bandicoot group must have evolved from a possum-like diprotodont creature, and re-evolved its extra teeth.
_	Earlier Quatrefages de Bréau in his "Crania Ethnica" (1875) popularised the view that the brachycephalic (round-headed)
_	The idea that the political right dominates the Canadian political blogosphere can also be seen in the views of other members of the Blogging Tories such as the blog Small Dead Animals, which ascribes to the view that Canadian conservatives "have been forced to listen while media and politicians alike have told me 'what Canadians think'...'You don't speak for me.'"
_	In contrast, in "Fong Thin Choo", the High Court expressed the view that under regulation 12(6) of the Customs Regulations 1979, the fact that goods had not been exported from Singapore was a precedent fact to the customs officer's power to require the owner of the goods to pay customs duty.
_	In contrast to the Chinese model (dubbed the "socialist market economy"), the Vietnamese system is not officially viewed as a form of socialism or even market socialism; it is considered to be a multi-sectoral market economy that is in the process of undergoing a long-term transition towards socialism, with the view that socialism can only emerge once Vietnam's productive forces are developed to a point where socialism becomes a technical possibility.
_	Reformational philosophy rejects the view that theoretical thought, including philosophical thought, is .
_	Macquarie took the view that Bent's commission required him to obey the orders and directions of the governor in all times.
_	Bent took the view that he should only obey the "lawful" instructions of the governor.
_	They therefore confined themselves to encouraging the view that nationalists also ought to organise a volunteer force for the defence of Ireland.
_	Research presented in February 2008 by the Hungarian archeologist Zsolt Visy strengthened the view that the origin of the treasure may be the Lake Balaton region of Hungary.
_	The "Children of God" Christian group actively promotes the view that a sexual relationship with Jesus would be desirable, encouraging devotees to imagine during sexual activity that it is Jesus who is having sex with them, and equate prophecy with Jesus' ejaculation.
_	Richard Kearney (1988, p. 218) suggests that the Kathleen Ni Houlihan myth represents the view that the blood sacrifice of heroes is needed to free and redeem Ireland.
_	Its discovery proved the Levant was a center of ancient, centralized civilization equal to Egypt and Mesopotamia and ruled out the view that the latter two were the only important centers in the Near East during the early Bronze Age.
_	Keeling's data supports the view that the land operates as a major carbon sink.
_	Agnew, the first suburban politician to achieve high office, was one of the first public figures to capitalize on the politics of resentment, and helped to popularize the view that much of the national media was controlled by elitist and effete liberals.
_	Model and Manteuffel, the technical experts from the eastern front, took the view that a limited offensive with the goal of surrounding and crushing the American 1st Army would be the best the offensive could hope for.
_	McDowell's conceptualism, though rather distinct (philosophically and historically) from conceptualism's genesis, shares the view that universals are not "given" in perception from outside the sphere of reason.
_	The historian Marko Attila Hoare said that the Srebrenica Research Group was formed "to propagate the view that the Srebrenica massacre never happened".
_	Ignosticism is the view that a coherent definition of a deity must be put forward before the question of the existence of a deity can be meaningfully discussed.
_	Daniel Benjamin, a former U.S. State Department counter-terrorism official now at Dartmouth College, wrote that the office was not intended to meet a real need, but rather was aimed at promoting the view that immigrants are dangerous.
_	Some Balli Kombëtar members such as Shaban Polluzha became partisans with the view that Kosovo would become part of Albania.
_	John Burnet argued that his principal teacher was the Anaxagorean Archelaus but his ideas were as Plato described them; Eric A. Havelock, on the other hand, did not accept the view that Socrates's view was identical with that of Archelaus, in large part due to the reason of such anomalies "and" contradictions that have surfaced and "post-dated his death."
_	The newly elected Nueva Ecija representatives were of the view that since a civil government under the Americans was already being established, it was time to return the four towns to Nueva Ecija.
_	Edison put forward the view that burying the high-voltage lines was not a solution, and would simply move the deaths underground and be a "constant menace" that could short with other lines threatening people's homes and lives.
_	President Adamkus expressed the view that the war's end, in Lithuania, marked the beginning of a fifty-year Soviet occupation and repression.
_	Luigi Galvani (1737–1798) demonstrated that electrical stimulation of nerve produced muscle contraction, and the competing work of Charles Bell (1774–1842) and Francois Magendie (1783–1855 ) led to the view that the ventral horns of the spinal cord were motor and the dorsal horns sensory.
_	A hemiplegic patient who could not speak led Paul Broca (1824–1880) to the view that functions in the cerebral cortex were anatomically localised.
_	Younge expressed the view that the killing "appears to have been a homophobic attack", while an editorial in "The New York Times" noted that "the Harvey killing has the earmarks of a hate crime".
_	A minority of Baltists maintain the view that the Slavic group of languages differs so radically from the neighboring Baltic group (Lithuanian, Latvian, and the now-extinct Old Prussian), that they could not have shared a parent language after the breakup of the Proto-Indo-European continuum about five millennia ago.
_	The Shia interpretations are unanimous on the view that the person that frowned away was not the Prophet Muhammad, but an elite from Banu Umayya.
_	He was of the view that engaging in a full reoccupation of the Crater, with its risk of casualties, was pointless given that British withdrawal from Aden was imminent and British strategy was moving to the role of neutral peacekeeping.
_	Even though technological forecasting is a scientific discipline, some experts are of the view that "the only certainty of a particular forecast is that it is wrong to some degree."
_	He endorsed the view that God chose the best of all possible worlds.
_	The researcher who first propounded the view that Haydn's music abounds in Croatian folk tunes was the Croatian ethnologist Franjo Kuhač, who gathered a great number of Croatian tunes in field work.
_	Madri was of the view that Kunti was inferior by birth to her because Yadavas were cattle herders while she was a princess.
_	The K-P government is of the view that under the said amendment, agriculture has become a provincial subject as tobacco is a cash crop like wheat, sugar cane and cotton.
_	Beginning with Edward Gibbon in "The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire" some historians have taken the view that Christianity weakened the Roman Empire through its failure to preserve the pluralistic structure of the state.
_	Heifetz took the view that the new composition was very intimate,with little show or bravura, and doubted whether it would come across in a vast hall holding ten thousand people.
_	Women's pornography, sometimes referred to as sex-positive pornography, is pornography often produced by women and aimed specifically at the female market – rejecting the view that pornography is only for men.
_	Twentieth-century critics favoured the view that Smart suffered from some kind of mental distress when writing his poems.
_	In "Aircraft and Sea Power" (1970), he took the view that the Atlantic could be defended by land-based aircraft and submarines, with no surface vessels.
_	He was of the view that Opposition is the spirit of democratic set up and that it was essential to attain the aims and objectives, which were being overlooked by the Muslim League.
_	He was the main proponent of "gunaprasthana", the view that poetry needed qualities or virtues such as "shleshha" (punning), "prasaada" (favour), "samataa" (sameness), "maadhurya" (beauty), "arthavyakti" (interpretation), and "ojah" (vigour).
_	But many Grand Mananers have long held the view that they pay the only tolls in the province.
_	These archaicisms often regarded as supporting the view that the Proto-Indo-European language ("PIE") had three distinct sets of velar consonants: plain velars, palatovelars, and labiovelars.
_	Cox (1992) argues in a polemical historiography of the book that "The National Song Book proclaimed the hegemony of the literate tradition as opposed to the oral, and considers the view that national songs contained within them the danger of the manipulation of patriotism."
_	Richard Evans also reiterated the view that Nazism was secular, scientific and anti-religious in outlook in the last volume of his trilogy on Nazi Germany: "Hitler's hostility to Christianity reached new heights, or depths, during the war;" his source for this was the 1953 English translation of "Table Talk".
_	In Logunov's view, this supports the view that Einstein was familiar with the Lorentz' paper containing the correct relativistic transformation in early 1905, while his June 1905 paper does not mention Lorentz in connection with this result.
_	Mitter also supports the view that Chennault could have accomplished much more had Stilwell not diverted a large proportion of Lend-Lease equipment to the Chinese troops in India.
_	Mitchel had come to the view that "the whole system ought to be met with resistance at every point; and the means for this would be extremely simple; namely, a combination amongst the people to obstruct and render impossible the transport and shipment of Irish provisions; to refuse all aid in its removal; to destroy the highways, to prevent everyone, by intimidation, from daring to bid for grain or cattle if brought to auction under distress"; (a method of obstruction which had put an end to tithes before) "in short, to offer a passive resistance universally, but occasionally, when opportunity served, to try the steel."
_	He was a prominent representative of Nordicism, the view that the so-called Nordic race was inherently culturally advanced, and in books including his best known work, "Midgards Untergang", he argues that the conversion of the Germanic peoples from their native Germanic paganism, particularly the Christianisation of Scandinavia, was detrimental to European culture.
_	She is of the view that reservations should not be permanent.
_	Clark expressed the view that "Crawford's achievements" stemmed from his "moral integrity and singleness of mind" rather than "any outstanding intellectual brilliance".
_	In 1950, F. T. Wainwright argued that there were two battles of Corbridge in 914 and 918, and his view was widely accepted for over fifty years, but since around 2006 historians have taken the view that there was only one battle in 918.
_	In the early 20th century, Auguste Boudinhon said that, on the grounds that minor orders did not originate with Jesus or the apostles, the view that minor orders and the subdiaconate were sacramental, a view held by several medieval theologians, was no longer held.
_	Positions range from the view that ADHD is within the normal range of behavior to the hypothesis that ADHD is a genetic condition.
_	While the dates given in this article are estimates based on scientific evidence, there has been controversy between more traditional views of increased biodiversity through a cone of diversity with the passing of time and the view that the basic pattern on Earth has been one of annihilation and diversification and that in certain past times, such as the Cambrian explosion, there was great diversity.
_	Utilitarianism is the view that the laws should be crafted so as to produce the best consequences for the greatest number of people possible.
_	Lagrange and Laplace were the first to advance the view that the constants which describe the motion of a planet around the Sun are "perturbed", as it were, by the motion of other planets and vary as a function of time; hence the name "perturbation theory".
_	They conclude that these data support the view that irisin may have a role in the modulation not only of energy balance but also the aging process.
_	Several readers took the view that it was much too long, and so should be cut.
_	So far, all the history and local researchers were of the view that the founding of the Sonnefeld Monastery in Ebersdorf or Frohnlach was only a plan that did not happen because of all the possible misgivings.
_	Einstein struggled to the end of his life for a theory that could better comply with his idea of causality, protesting against the view that there exists no objective physical reality other than that which is revealed through measurement interpreted in terms of quantum mechanical formalism.
_	Ovidiu Ioan Silaghi, a senator from the National Liberal Party, and Ciprian Mihai Rogojan, member of the Liberal Democratic Party, held the view that the Romanian Orthodox Church should be consulted first.
_	The term "Judaization of Jerusalem" refers to the view that Israel has sought to transform the physical and demographic landscape of Jerusalem to correspond with a vision of a united and fundamentally Jewish Jerusalem under Israeli sovereignty.
_	He enters the garden, greets Pinkerton and Goro, and admires the view that overlooks Nagasaki's harbor and the sea.
_	Furthermore, it seems that authors most critical of the concept "vacant niche" really are critical of the view that niche space is largely empty and can easily absorb additional species.
_	They instead adhere to the view that communities are usually in equilibrium (or at least close to it), resulting in a continual strong competition for resources.
_	The magazine had its own Crimean correspondent, trumpeting the view that the dashing deeds carried out on the field of battle were due in no small part to field sports and the following of manly country occupations.
_	The American historian Gordon A. Craig expressed the view that Hillgruber's choice of the word "Ende" for the Holocaust suggested that the Holocaust was "something that just sort of happened".
_	Though Maiti Nepal has successfully rescued thousands of girls from trafficking, the “critics of Maiti Nepal were of the view that Maiti Nepal did not always respect the will of the women concerned and refused drastic measures to deal with the problem”.
_	The Spartans were supposedly of the view that, with the liberation of mainland Greece and the Greek cities of Asia Minor, the war's purpose had already been reached.
_	The social impact model further explains that social impact is the multiplicative effect of strength (power, status, knowledge), the immediacy (physical proximity and recency), and the number of group members, supporting the view that a minority will be less influential on a larger majority.
_	Abd Allah ibn Abbas and Abdullah ibn Masud, as cited by Abu Hayyan al-Gharnati in his "Bahr al-Muhit", are said to have favored the view that these letters stand for words or phrases related to God and His Attributes.
_	LaVey and the Church espoused the view that "Satanists are born, not made"; that they are outsiders by their nature, living as they see fit, who are self-realized in a religion which appeals to the would-be Satanist's nature, leading them to realize they are Satanists through finding a belief system that is in line with their own perspective and lifestyle.
_	Kalisher maintained the view that the Torah mentioned Tzaraath is not Leprosy but in fact Vitiligo, Yehuda L. Katzenelson quotes Kalisher's view in his work on medicinal talmudic work (הרפואה וחכמת התלמוד berlin, 1928).
_	The notion of utmost good faith, and the view that the insurance contract, or for that matter any other contract, may be a contract of the utmost good faith, was rejected in "Mutual and Federal v Oudtshoorn Municipality".
_	Despite the view that magic is less than rational and entails an inferior concept of causality, in "The Savage Mind" (1966), Claude Lévi-Strauss suggested that magical procedures are relatively effective in exerting control over the environment.
_	The Court took the view that based on these facts – and that the original stab wound had healed – a reasonable jury would not be satisfied that the defendant's acts had been the material cause of the victim's death.
_	In Parliament, he expressed the view that Pākehā were not qualified to make informed decisions regarding Māori, and pressed for Māori and Pākehā MPs to work together on laws for the benefit of both peoples.
_	Later on he discussed the origin of the elevated shell-bearing gravels near Dublin and expressed the view that they were accumulated by floating ice when the land had undergone submergence.
_	Its goal is to promote the view that Christianity is a pro-life faith "which acknowledges Jesus Christ as Lord and Savior and is called to affirm and witness to the Biblical standard of the value, dignity, and sanctity of human life."
_	The latter is the view that humans will always act according to their perceived best interest.
_	The resulting welfare payments meant that, even though Thatcher and her ministers in 1979 had taken the view that "public expenditure is at the heart of Britain's present economic difficulties", it was not until the boom year of 1987 that the expenditure ratio fell below the 1979 level, and for most of the 1980s the average tax take was actually higher than in 1979.
_	Raeder took the view that because of the increasing number of naval "incidents" in the second half of 1941 between U-boats and US ships guarding convoys to Britain, the best thing to do was to declare war on America in order to end all of the restrictions on fighting the U.S. Navy.
_	Some Scots lawyers are of the view that there was no need for this Act to extend to Scotland because the law of Scotland already dealt satisfactorily with harassment and contained no relevant lacuna corresponding to any which existed in English law.
_	In an editorial, the editor of "The Rockhampton Bulletin and Central Queensland Advertiser" described the act as "human vengeance" which had done its worst on the victim, and expressed the view that Griffin was entitled to the rest of his grave and it should have been "sacred from violation as that of any other sinner".
_	It is a theological and political theory based upon the view that the teachings of Jesus Christ urge Christians to support communism as the ideal social system.
_	In fact, he was outspoken in his contempt for such articles, holding the view that Sanskrit ought to be studied not for philological reasons, but for the great literature it opened.
_	This confirms the view that the English text existed in some kind of unalterable, spiritual form rather than that someone had to think through difficult conceptual issues and idioms, always resulting in variants in any translation."
_	In the twentieth century, Anglo-Catholic theologian E.L. Mascall has expressed the view that, "[T]he entry upon the supernatural realm which is bestowed by incorporation into Christ and which is fittingly described as a new birth is also a deliverance from the realm of fallen human nature -- the sphere in which man lies under the curse of original sin -- and an insertion into the realm of the perfect manhood of Christ.
_	After a short period the "Profil" group went separate routes, as authors such as Dag Solstad, Espen Haavardsholm, and Tor Obrestad turned to the newly formed party Workers' Communist Party ("Arbeidernes kommunistparti" or AKP), and become involved in formulating a new political program that based on the view that literature should serve the working people and their uprising against capitalism.
_	I don't buy the view that you can't choose someone to chair this inquiry who is not connected to Leon Brittan and yet the government seem to have been insistent on choosing chairpeople who are very much establishment, very much connected to people involved".
_	Few architects have espoused the view that design can control behaviour but it has long been an assumption amongsts urbanists and architects that architecture can limit and channel behaviour in a predictable manner.
_	She utilizes the Internet in her teaching, taking the view that students "learn best when [the instructor] gets them started and then stays out of their way."
_	The English Government, however, expressed the view that "force had been exercised towards the natives without sufficient warranty" and urged the necessity of maintaining friendly relations with the Aborigines.
_	The Howard Government and most business groups maintained that AWAs were mutually beneficial for employers and employees, often promoting the view that 'flexibility' is paramount:
_	It relates to the view that humans are essentially prosocial beings from childhood and onwards, and loyal to the family in particular.
_	Challenging the widely accepted orthodox view that the atomic bombings on Hiroshima and Nagasaki were the most decisive factor in Japan's decision to surrender, ending World War II in the Pacific Hasegawa puts forward the view that the Soviet entry into the war by breaking of the Neutrality Pact played a more important role than the atomic bombs in Japan's surrender decision.
_	Also, when Hyakumonogatari Kaidankai was becoming popular, there is the theory that they were made by individuals who were requested to tell kaidan stories and about yōkai that was not known throughout society yet, as well as the view that in Hasegawa Settan's paintings in the Edo Meisho Zue, since tōfu sellers were depicted wearing kasa, that tōfu-kozō are the result of changing tōfu sellers in plain clothing into children with gaudy clothing.
_	Some individuals in history have, at least in principle, rejected the view that humans have duties of any kind to animals.
_	The source of both the balsa logs for rafts and the Spondylus and Strombus seashells was in Ecuador, to the north, thus strengthening the view that the Chincha had an extensive reach to their trading activities.
_	Historian Radovan Samardžić is open to the view that maybe the Ragusans gave news of the ostensible betrayal of Montenegrins in the battle in order to disguise their own bad role in the event.
_	Progressionism is the view that evolution is progress towards some goal of perfection, and that it is in some way directed towards that goal.
_	Lamarckism, a philosophy that long predates Jean-Baptiste de Lamarck, is the view that evolution is guided by the inheritance of characteristics acquired by use or disuse during an animal's lifetime.
_	Some Shia scholars who supported the view that the Qur'anic text had been distorted were:
_	The fundamental approach of the project was Neo-Confucianist, based on the view that historical development followed moral laws.
_	Concerning the socio-cultural dimension of nationality, culture and migration, one far-right position is the view that certain ethnic, racial or religious groups should stay separate and it is based on the belief that the interests of one's own group should be prioritised.
_	As the chairman of the Hopi tribe warned, “If the ski resort remains or is expanded, our people will not accept the view that this is the sacred home of the Kachinas.
_	The Committee is of the view that a person's surname [and name] constitutes an important component of one's identity and that the protection against arbitrary or unlawful interference with one's privacy includes the protection against arbitrary or unlawful interference with the right to choose and change one's own name."
_	The "Geer" decision supported the view that the states owned all resident wildlife, but at the time there were no conflicting federal wildlife laws.
_	Jomini took the view that the amount of force deployed should be kept to the minimum in order to lower casualties and that war was not an exact science.
_	Shortly before his death, the right-wing leader had expressed the view that he was being punished for taking money from Lockheed, a company that had built aircraft to fight Japan during World War II.
_	He took the view that as the war was now practically over, it was important to gather as much intelligence about the Soviet army, since this was plainly the new threat.
_	He concludes that the "Jiffs" campaign promoted the view that INA recruits were weak-willed and traitorous
_	He supports the view that Chinese buyers are the cause of Auckland's housing issues.
_	In various writings, Epstein has been a strong advocate of the view that people can deliberately learn to love each other.
_	Type-identity theorists and other skeptics hold the view that consciousness can only be realized in particular physical systems because consciousness has properties that necessarily depend on physical constitution (; ).
_	These findings are compatible with the view that a large number of genes, each with only a small effect, contribute to differences in intelligence.
_	Michael Gorra, reviewing Powell's autobiography "To Keep the Ball Rolling", presents the view that, while the novels are built around Widmerpool, they are not essentially about him:
_	The article expressed the view that the Jews' outstretched hand had been spurned but that they would only redouble their efforts to survive as a self-reliant community.
_	Sharma put forward the view that Jalor was the original home of the Gurjara-Pratiharas, from where they might have emigrated.
_	The problem which troubled Hume of being able to establish the reality of relations from experience, in particular the relation of cause and effect, was solved in another way by Immanuel Kant who took the view that our knowledge is only partly derived from the external world.
_	According to the Kingdom′s Ministry of the Interior′s documents, the local population occasionally displayed hostility towards Russian refugees, usually due to the view that Russians were taking away jobs, but also due to the fact that the left-leaning strata of society tended to see all Russian émigrés as "counter revolutionists".
_	Mussolini had held the view that a small contingent of Italian Jews had lived in Italy "since the days of the Kings of Rome" (a reference to the Bené Roma) and should "remain undisturbed".
_	Perdurantism is usually presented as the antipode to endurantism, the view that an individual is wholly present at every moment of its existence.
_	From the late 1930s, Wilkerson used "THR" to push the view that the industry was a communist stronghold.
_	The 1948 Land Planning Committee of senior civil servants did not wholly agree with Abraham’s recommendations, holding the view that 'African and European enterprise in Nyasaland are complementary and inter-dependent; neither can progress without the goodwill of the other; both must be prepared to co-operate for their mutual benefit and progress'.
_	Biswamoy Biswas supported the view that "nigriceps" (having upper mantle grey and lower mantle rufous) was a hybrid of "tricolor" and "erythronotus".
_	The study also supported the view that "Dorycnium" and "Tetragonolobus" are not distinct from "Lotus" at the generic level.
_	The committee endorsed the view that "all Jews are religiously equal, regardless of their sexual orientation".
_	After its discovery in 1823, its initial editors typically took the view that Q1 was an early draft of the play, perhaps even a revision of the Ur-Hamlet, but John Payne Collier argued in 1843 that it was simply a bad version: a "pirated" text, one of the "stol'n and surreptitious copies, maimed and deformed by frauds and stealths of injurious impostors", which were denounced in the preface to the 1623 First Folio.
_	"I remain resolute on this subject, and am of the view that if the government devises an appropriate national economic plan, finding employment for every citizen will not be beyond us.
_	Chapter 7 takes up the consequences of the view that knowledge consists of the restoration of the unity of the content of the percept and the concept.
_	Then I wanted to search for the view that looked back at my home, so I went to the opposite building, and asked the owner if I could pay her a little bit for permission to got to the top and see back to my home."
_	Boyle was of the view that the organisation should assist in catching criminals, but the role created for them was to enforce the Defence of the Realm Act and to supervise female workers and public decency.
_	Evangelicals held the view that the modernist and liberal parties in the Protestant churches had surrendered their heritage as evangelicals by accommodating the views and values of the world.
_	Moreover, as with Marquis's argument (see below), some theories of personal identity would support the view that the embryo will never "itself" develop complex mental qualities (rather, it will simply give rise to a distinct substance or entity that "will" have these qualities), in which case the "natural capacities" argument would fail.
_	A 2017 Gallup creationism survey found 38% of adults in the United States held the view that "God created humans in their present form at one time within the last 10,000 years" when asked for their views on the origin and development of human beings, which Gallup noted was the lowest level in 35 years.
_	It took the view that these impacts were unavoidable and had to be treated on a case by case basis.
_	In contrast to the view that sex promotes genetic variation, Heng, and Gorelick and Heng reviewed evidence that sex actually acts as a constraint on genetic variation.
_	The contemporary vocal pedagogy instructor Bill Martin seconds the view that the change from chest voice to head voice occurs at around E4 in all voices, including the bass, but Martin states in the coloratura soprano it is more likely to occur at F4.
_	Scientific realism is the view that the universe described by science is real regardless of how it may be interpreted.
_	He supported the view that creation is incomplete and argued that the world is best placed for the full moral development of humans, as it presents genuine moral choices.
_	Arkoun was of the view that Islamic thought had always included a discourse on the rights of God (either public or collective rights) and the rights of man (essentially individual rights), with the former having priority over the latter.
_	Later he took the view that the indigenous people had destroyed the once-fertile environment of Algeria, became a proponent of French colonization and opposed the "Arab Kingdom" policy of Napoleon III.
_	Sunderland were involved in a financial irregularity, when the club's board of directors gave their right back Andy McCombie £100 (£ today) to start a business, with the view that his benefit game would enable him repay the money.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine from Allmusic held the view that "the icy heartbreak of 'Miles Away'" was "a worthy successor of Justin Timberlake's 2006 single 'What Goes Around.../...Comes Around'".
_	The apparent, problematic consequences of this view are “Socratic paradoxes”, such as the view that there is no weakness of will — that no one knowingly does, or seeks to do, evil (moral wrong); that anyone who does, or seeks to do, moral wrong does so involuntarily; and that virtue is knowledge, that there are not many virtues, but that all virtues are one.
_	Many Jews and supporters of Israel, and most Palestinians and supporters of Palestine, take the view that the very existence of the state of Israel is at stake.
_	He returned after five weeks with the view that land reform needed to be more severe and that there could be no compromise with landlords.
_	Other significant correlation patterns indicate that participants took the view that the search for extraterrestrial intelligence may be futile or even harmful.
_	Woodrow Wyatt records in his diary that when he expressed the view that non-white countries have nothing in common with "us", she told him, "I am very keen on the Commonwealth.
_	Mormons hold the view that the New Testament prophesied both the apostasy from the teachings of Christ and his apostles as well as the restoration of all things prior to the second coming of Christ.
_	He supports the view that survivors of the Holocaust cannot forgive God and so must protest about it.
_	Shanahan takes the view that we do not know how superintelligences will behave: whether they will be friendly or hostile, predictable or inscrutable.
_	Though 164 nations refer to the West Bank, including East Jerusalem, as "Occupied Palestinian Territory", the state of Israel is of the view that only territories captured in war from "an established and recognized sovereign" are considered occupied territories.
_	However, his rival Harry Govier Seeley, propagating the view that pterosaurs were warm-blooded and active, argued that "Dimorphodon" was either an agile quadruped or even a running biped due to its relatively well developed hindlimbs and characteristics of its pelvis.
_	He has frequently expressed the view that recent nominees to the court hold extreme views.
_	Modern scholars generally hold the view that the Vandals allowed the Romans in North Africa to carry on with their way of life with only occasional interference.
_	Learned helplessness theory is the view that clinical depression and related mental illnesses may result from such real or perceived absence of control over the outcome of a situation.
_	Montefiore was of the view that "after 1917, he became quadri-national: Georgian by nationality, Russian by loyalty, internationalist by ideology, Soviet by citizenship."
_	The "Sunday Age", however, took the view that increased taxation, and with it increased spending on education, should take priority: "a smarter society will be more productive."
_	Writing in "Politico", Adam Drda expressed the view that Andrej Babis is associated with the decline of Czech democracy more than any other single person.
_	He has supported the view that voluntary repatriation of refugees is the best and most durable solution, specifically in the case of Afghan refugees.
_	Worm's-eye view is a shot that is looking up from the ground, and is meant to give the viewer the feeling that they are looking up at the character from way below and it is meant to show the view that a child or a pet would have.
_	However, if, for whatever reason the court forms the view that the company does not have a reasonable prospect of survival, it must refuse to grant the petition and it must withdraw the court's protection.
_	New Zealand commentators largely took the view that the two All Blacks were just clearing out the ruck and had no intention to injure O'Driscoll.
_	Stevens, J., joined by Blackmun, J., dissenting, expressed the view that
_	So Schleicher took the view that the NSDAP would sooner or later have to support his government because only he could offer the Nazis power and otherwise the NSDAP would continue to disintegrate without power.
_	Robert W. Fuller claims that rankism includes the abuse of the power inherent in superior rank, with the view that rank-based abuse underlies many other phenomena such as bullying, racism, sexism, and homophobia.
_	Churches of Christ, though holding to a closed communion view, in practice do not prohibit visitors from taking communion, on the view that per 1 Corinthians 11:28 the visitor must "examine himself" and decide to partake or decline (i.e. it is not for the minister, elders/deacons, or members to decide who may or may not partake); thus, the practice is more akin to open communion.
_	His "Moral Skepticisms" (2006) defends the view that we do not have fully adequate responses to the moral skeptic.
_	It is because of the existence of the faculty jurisdiction that the “ecclesiastical exemption” from listed building control is provided for in heritage protection legislation, Parliament taking the view that there was already in place, in relation to the buildings and land of the Church of England that were in ecclesiastical use, a satisfactory legal regime controlling their use and alteration.
_	Fred M. Vinson noted that Congress had not issued desegregation legislation; Stanley F. Reed discussed incomplete cultural assimilation and states' rights and was inclined to the view that segregation worked to the benefit of the African-American community; Tom C. Clark wrote that "we had led the states on to think segregation is OK and we should let them work it out."
_	An academic psychologist is a qualified psychologist who endorses the view that psychology is a scholarly and scientific enterprise, not an informal and intuitive practice.
_	Similarly, Harry Thompson expressed the view that Hergé would never have completed the story, and that while "many critics like to think... "Tintin and Alph-Art" was set to be Hergé's last great masterpiece", he disagreed, describing this as "surely just wishful thinking".
_	She felt that men and women were put on the earth for separate reasons and accepted the view that women should not be involved in politics, but rather, they would teach male children to be free thinkers and moral learners and help shape their political ideas.
_	Furthermore, the Alliance Defense Fund takes the view that the concept of "separation of church and state" has been utilized by the American Civil Liberties Union and its allies to inhibit public acknowledgment of Christianity and restrict the religious freedoms of Christians.
_	Walter Schellenberg, a trusted subordinate of Himmler, had long held the view that Germany would lose the war and encouraged Himmler to explore the possibility of a separate peace treaty with the Western powers; in this Sweden could be a useful intermediary.
_	It is, therefore, remarkable that "the so-called social sciences", in holding to the view that a group can be understood in terms of the relationships of its members (it is decidable), are working with a scientific paradigm that has been abandoned by the hard sciences that they have tried so hard to emulate from their inception.
_	The Sarvāstivāda system extended this realism across time, effectively positing a type of eternalism with regards to time, hence the name of their school means "the view that everything exists".
_	Plant-for-the-Planet promotes the view that each tree is a contribution towards environmental and climate protection.
_	Mirecourt held the view that anything physical or moral is wholly depended on the entirely free will of God.
_	Much more critical for German-Americans was the view that outgoing President Woodrow Wilson was deliberately trying to punish Germany and Austria for starting the war, especially via his disregard for England's continuing blockade of Germany.
_	Stressing Harding's German ancestry, the German press drummed up the view that
_	In his book "The Evolution of the Gospel", published in August 1994, Powell said he had arrived at the view that Jesus Christ was not crucified but stoned to death by the Jews.
_	Although Hegel began his philosophizing with commentary on the Christian religion and often expresses the view that he is a Christian, his ideas of God are not acceptable to some Christians even though he has had a major influence on 19th- and 20th-century theology.
_	However, they soon set out to create a unified Western Canadian playoff structure involving the respective provincial champions, with the view that the Western champion ought to be allowed to challenge for the Canadian Rugby Union's new championship trophy, the Grey Cup.
_	According to Daniel Hutto: "Enactivists are concerned to defend the view that our most elementary ways of engaging with the world and others - including our basic forms of perception and perceptual experience - are mindful in the sense of being phenomenally charged and intentionally directed, despite being non-representational and content-free."
_	Supreme Court also held the view that Preamble can not be a part of the constitution but later in Kesavananda Bharati Case (1973), the Supreme Court gave a comprehensive verdict.
_	Though the resulting dogs were undoubtedly used to bay lions, the 2008 Rhodesian Ridgeback World Congress took the view that in its early use, the Ridgeback was more a "hunter's/farmer's ox-wagon dog" than a "lion dog”, and had a general guarding and hunting role, including the hunting of birds.
_	Pertaining to unplanned pregnancies and counselling, Gillard is of the view that women ought to be couselled by someone of their choice – as opposed to only trained professionals referred to by their general practitioners.
_	The courts there have taken the view that such clauses are, subject to some exceptions, not effective in denying or restricting the extent to which the courts are able to exercise judicial review.
_	Although no official reason was provided, several reasons are supposed for the rejection of the first committee's recommendation, including internal disagreement over the inclusion of Ъ (the Big Yer, as used in Bulgarian), and the view that its inclusion made the alphabet "too close" to the Bulgarian alphabet.
_	In that volume he advanced the view that there was little evidence for directional change in the prehistory of Australia and that the archaeological evidence was better seen as documenting a long series of adaptive changes, perhaps operating in multiple directions, rather than progress towards 'intensification' in the recent past (as espoused by archaeologists such as Harry Lourandos).
